This is a book about hypocritical politicians, and about some
of the ways we might learn to view them. There is a lot of
hypocrisy at work in contemporary politics—no doubt we all
have our favourite examples, from the moralising adulterers
to the mudslinging do-gooders. But although it is fairly easy
to point the ﬁnger at all this hypocrisy, it is much harder to
know what, if anything, to do about it. The problem is that
hypocrisy, though inherently unattractive, is also more or less
inevitable in most political settings, and in liberal democratic
societies it is practically ubiquitous. No one likes it, but everyone is at it, which means that it is difﬁcult to criticise hypocrisy
without falling into the trap of exemplifying the very thing
one is criticising. This is an intractable problem, but for that
reason, it is nothing new, and in this book I explore what a
range of past political thinkers have had to say about the difﬁculty of trying to rescue politics from the most destructive
forms of hypocrisy without simply making the problem
worse. The thinkers that I discuss—from Thomas Hobbes to
George Orwell—are not the usual ones who are looked to for
guidance on matters of hypocrisy and duplicity. This is because as champions of a straight-talking approach to politics
they can appear either naively or wilfully cut off from the fact
that hypocrisy is something we have to learn to live with. But
in fact, I believe these are precisely the thinkers who can help
us to understand the role that hypocrisy does and ought to
play in political life, because they saw the problem of hypocrisy
in all its complexity, and were torn in their responses to it. In
1

INTRODUCTION

this introduction, I will explain why I think these particular
authors can serve as a guide to our own concerns about political double standards, and why they are better suited to that
task than the writers—from Machiavelli to Nietzsche—who
are more often assumed to be telling us the truth about the
limits of truthfulness in politics.

Hypocrisy: an “ordinary” vice
One of the best places to begin any discussion of the problem
of hypocrisy in liberal democratic politics is with the classic
treatment of this question in Judith Shklar’s Ordinary Vices
(1984). In that book, Shklar makes the case for ranking the
vices according to the nature of the threat that they pose to liberal societies. The vice that emerges as the worst of all, and by
far, is cruelty. The other vices, Shklar suggests, are therefore
not so bad, and this includes the one with which she begins
her discussion: the vice of hypocrisy. She wants us (the inhabitants of liberal societies) to stop spending so much time worrying about hypocrisy, and to stop minding about it so much.
But it is difﬁcult not to mind about hypocrisy, for two reasons.
First, it is so very easy to take a dislike to it—on a basic human
level, there is something repulsive about hypocrisy encountered at ﬁrst hand, since no one enjoys being played for a fool.
Second, for everyone who does take a dislike to it, it is so very
easy to ﬁnd. “For those who put hypocrisy ﬁrst,” Shklar
writes (“ﬁrst” here meaning ranked worst among the vices),
“their horror is enhanced precisely because they see it everywhere”; and this means, in particular, that they see it everywhere in politics.1
The speciﬁc political problem is that liberal societies are,
or have become, democracies. Because people don’t like
hypocrisy, and because hypocrisy is everywhere, it is all too
tempting for democratic politicians to seek to expose the inevitable double standards of their rivals in the pursuit of
2

INTRODUCTION

power, and votes. Take the most obvious contemporary instance of this temptation: negative advertising. If you wish to
do the maximum possible damage to your political opponent
in thirty seconds of airtime, you should try to paint him or her
as a hypocrite: you must highlight the gap between the honeyed words and the underlying reality, between the mask and
the person behind the mask, between what they say now and
what they once did. And negative advertising works, which is
why it proves so hard to resist for any politician, particularly
those who ﬁnd themselves behind in the polls, and certainly
including those who have promised to foreswear it. Shklar
does not discuss negative advertising, but she does say this,
which is almost impossible to dispute: “It is easier to dispose
of an opponent’s character by exposing his hypocrisy than to
show his political convictions are wrong.”2
Shklar thinks we have got all this the wrong way around,
that we are worrying about hypocrisy when we should be
worrying about our intolerance for it. She highlights the risks
for liberal democracies of too great a reliance on “public sincerity,” which simply leaves all politicians vulnerable to
charges of bad faith. We should learn to be more sanguine
about hypocrisy, and accept that liberal democratic politics are
only sustainable if mixed with a certain amount of dissimulation and pretence. The difﬁculty, though, is knowing how to
get this mixture right. The problem is that we do not want to
be sanguine about the wrong kinds of hypocrisy. Nor ought
we to assume that there is nothing we can do if mild forms
of hypocrisy start to leach into every corner of public life. In
some places, a tolerance for hypocrisy can do real harm. After
all, some forms of hypocrisy are inherently destructive of liberalism itself, even in Shklar’s terms. For example, allowing
people to treat government-sanctioned torture as a necessary
resource of all political societies in extremis, no matter how liberal their public principles, would simply let in cruelty by the
back door. Equally, it would be counter-productive to tolerate
hypocrisy about our tolerance for hypocrisy: it hardly makes
3

INTRODUCTION

sense to permit politicians to get away with renouncing negative advertising while their underlings carry on spreading poison about their opponents behind the scenes. Yet negative
advertising only works because it works on us; so politicians
caught out in this way might legitimately claim that we are the
ones being hypocritical about our tolerance for hypocrisy,
since the reason they keep coming back to the well of poison is
because it is the only reliable way to get our attention. Clearly,
a line needs to be drawn somewhere between the hypocrisies
that are unavoidable in contemporary political life, and the
hypocrisies that are intolerable. But it is hard to see where.
Shklar does not offer much advice about where and how to
draw this line, except to remind us that it will not be easy, because, as she puts it, “what we have to live with is a morally
pluralistic world in which hypocrisy and antihypocrisy are
joined to form a discrete system.”3
This book is an attempt to tease apart some of the different
sorts of hypocrisy at work in the morally pluralistic world of
modern politics, using the history of political thought as a
guide. It is not unusual to see the history of ideas as an appropriate place to look for guidance on these matters. Shklar herself does it in Ordinary Vices, where she draws not just on
philosophers (such as Hegel) but also playwrights (above all
Molière, the man who gave us “tartuffery”) and novelists (including Hawthorne and Dickens) for insights into the intricate
dance of hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy, the constant round of
masking and unmasking that makes up our social existence.
Other authors have sought to supplement Shklar’s account by
going back to the great scourges of well-meaning sanctimony
in the history of political thought, such as Machiavelli and
Rousseau, who together provide the inspiration for Ruth
Grant’s Hypocrisy and Integrity (1997); or Rousseau and Nietzsche, who provide two of the main sources for Bernard
Williams’s meditation on the perils of authenticity in Truth and
Truthfulness (2002). But what is much rarer is an attempt to
seek some answers in the classic liberal tradition itself. Indeed,
4

INTRODUCTION

Grant argues that the liberal tradition is precisely the wrong
place to look. “The appreciation of the necessity for political
hypocrisy,” she writes, “and the perspective of the liberal rationalist are simply at odds with each other.”4 She goes on:
“Liberal theory does not take sufﬁcient account of the distinctive character of political relations, of political passions, and of
moral discourse and so underestimates the place of hypocrisy
in politics.”5 By liberal rationalists, Grant says she means writers like Hobbes, Locke, and Adam Smith. The reason she
thinks we must go back to Machiavelli when considering the
role of hypocrisy in political life is that in her view none of
these other authors have anything of use to tell us on the subject. But Grant is wrong about this, and she is therefore wrong
about the failures of liberal theory to make sense of hypocrisy.
In this book I hope to show why.
There is a weak and a strong version of the case Grant
makes. The weak version says that because liberal rationalists
are precommitted to the importance of truthfulness in politics,
they simply don’t understand why hypocrisy is inevitable.
The strong version says that they do understand, but are simply pretending not to, which makes them the worst hypocrites
of all. This is often what people mean when they talk about
hypocrisy as the English vice, so it is easy to see why English
liberals often strike outsiders as the very worst of hypocrites,
particularly when their liberal rationalism turns into liberal
imperialism. In this book, I will be looking at a broadly liberal
rationalist tradition of English political thought starting with
Hobbes, and stretching up to Victorian imperialism and beyond. Of course, by its very Englishness it cannot be taken to
be deﬁnitive of what Grant calls liberal rationalism (for example, I will only be discussing Scottish Enlightenment thinkers
like Adam Smith and David Hume in passing). Moreover, it
is not the whole of English liberal rationalism, since I will be
bypassing John Locke as well. It includes one Anglicised Dutch
writer (Mandeville) and one American detour, into the arguments surrounding American dependence and independence
5

INTRODUCTION

at the end of the eighteenth century, since these were in their
own ways arguments about the nature of English hypocrisy,
and about whether there was a nonhypocritical way of confronting it. The authors discussed in this book constitute a
highly selective sample in what is a broad ﬁeld. But what connects them is the fact that they have important things to say
about the nature of political hypocrisy, and this is related to
the fact that they were often thought to be the worst of hypocrites themselves.
Certainly it is hard to think of any political thinkers who
have faced the charge of hypocrisy more often than the ones
I will be discussing in what follows: Hobbes, Mandeville,
Franklin, Jefferson, Bentham, Sidgwick, Orwell are some of
the great anti-hypocrites of the liberal tradition, which makes
them in many people’s eyes its arch-hypocrites as well. But
this is unfair, as well as inaccurate: their anti-hypocrisy was
much more subtle and complicated than that would suggest.
These authors have some of the most interesting and useful
things to say about hypocrisy, precisely because they were
conscious of its hold on political life, even as they tried to escape it. In other words, they were struggling with the problem
from the inside, and could see that it was a problem, unlike
those (Machiavelli, Rousseau, Nietzsche) who have looked at
the hypocrisy of liberal (or in an earlier guise, “Christian”)
politics from the outside, and saw only how easy it would be
to pull aside the mask, which is what they did.
The writers that I will be discussing in this book are the
ones who were willing to keep the mask in place, despite or
because of the fact that they were also truth-tellers, committed
to looking behind the mask, and revealing what they found
there. Keeping the mask in place while being aware of what
lies behind the mask is precisely the problem of hypocrisy for
liberal societies; indeed, it is one of the deepest problems of
politics that we face. These writers were also speciﬁcally concerned with problems of language, and the difﬁculty of saying
what you mean in a political environment in which there are
6

INTRODUCTION

often good reasons not to mean what you say. They are therefore the people we should be looking to for help in thinking
about the puzzle that Shklar leaves us with, because it was a
puzzle for them too, and there are no easy answers to be found
here. Thinkers like Machiavelli make it too easy for us to dismiss hypocrisy as a political problem altogether. What’s much
harder to make sense of is why it remains such a problem for
us in the ﬁrst place.

The varieties of hypocrisy
Something else that connects the writers I will be discussing in
this book is that they all understood that hypocrisy comes in a
variety of different forms, which is why it is so important to separate them out, rather than lumping them all together. There is
always a temptation to sweep a range of different practices under the general heading of hypocrisy, and then condemn them
all out of hand. But in reality the best one can ever do with
hypocrisy is take a stand for or against one kind or another, not
for or against hypocrisy itself. We might regret the prevalence
of hypocrisy, but if we want to do anything about it we have to
get beyond generalised regret, and try instead to identify the
different ways in which hypocrisy can be a problem. As a result,
I am not going to try to provide a catch-all deﬁnition of what
hypocrisy is, nor of how it must relate either to sincerity on the
one hand or to lying on the other. A variety of different forms of
sincerity, hypocrisy, and lies will emerge over the course of this
book, and a variety of different relationships between them. But
I do want to offer a preliminary account of how the concept of
hypocrisy is able to sustain such a range of different interpretations, in order to set these later discussions in context. To do so,
it is necessary to go back to the origins of the term.
The idea of hypocrisy has its roots in the theatre. The original “hypocrites” were classical stage actors, and the Greek
term (hypokrisis) meant the playing of a part. So in its original
7

INTRODUCTION

form the term was merely descriptive of the theatrical function of pretending to be something one is not. But it is not difﬁcult to see why the idea should have acquired pejorative
connotations, given the various sorts of disapproval that the
theatrical way of life has itself attracted over the centuries.
People who play a part are potentially unreliable, because they
have more than one face they can display. The theatre sets
some limits to this unreliability by its own conventions (the
stage is a space that provides us with some guarantees that
what we are seeing is merely a performance, though a good
performance will try to make us forget this fact). But actors
encountered off the stage may have the ability to play a part
without their audience being aware of what is going on. To
play a part that does not reveal itself to be the playing of a part
is a kind of deception, and hypocrisy in its pejorative sense
always entails a deception of some kind.
However, this deception, once it is not bounded by the conventions of the stage, can take many different forms. The earliest extension of the term was from theatre to religion, and to
public (and often highly theatrical) professions of religious
faith by individuals who did not actually believe what they
were saying.6 The act here is an act of piety. But hypocrisy has
also come to describe public statements of principle that do
not coincide with an individual’s private practices—indeed,
this is what we most often mean by hypocrisy today, where
the duplicity lies not in the concealment of one’s personal beliefs but in the attempt to separate off one’s personal behaviour from the standards that hold for everyone else (as in the
phrase “It’s one rule for them, and one rule for the rest of us”).
But this is by no means the only way of thinking about
hypocrisy. Other kinds of hypocritical deception include
claims to knowledge that one lacks, claims to a consistency
that one cannot sustain, claims to a loyalty that one does not
possess, claims to an identity that one does not hold. A hypocrite is always putting on an act, but precisely because it is an
act, hypocrisy can come in almost any form.
8

INTRODUCTION

Because hypocrisy always involves an element of pretence,
it might be said that all forms of hypocrisy are a kind of lie.
But it certainly does not follow that all lies are therefore hypocritical. Some lies are simply lies—telling an untruth does not
necessarily involve putting on an act, because an act involves
the attempt to convey an impression that extends beyond the
instant of the lie itself. A lie creates the immediate impression
that one believes something that happens to be false, but that
does not mean that one is not what one seems (indeed, people
who have a well-deserved reputation for lying may by telling a
lie be conﬁrming exactly who they are). Hypocrisy turns on
questions of character rather than simply coincidence with the
truth. Likewise, though hypocrisy will involve some element
of inconsistency, it is not true that inconsistency is itself evidence of hypocrisy. People often do, and often should, change
their minds about how to act, or vary their principles depending on the situation they ﬁnd themselves in. It is not hypocrisy
to seek special treatment for one’s own children—to arrive,
say, in a crowded emergency room with an ailing child and
demand immediate attention—though it may be unrealistic or
even counter-productive to behave in this way; it is only
hypocrisy if one has some prior commitment not to do so. It is
the prior commitment not to be inconsistent, rather than the
fact of inconsistency, that generates the conditions of hypocrisy.
That, of course, is one reason why hypocrisy is such a problem
for politicians.
Broadly speaking, then, hypocrisy involves the construction of a persona (another word, as we shall see in the next
chapter, with its roots in the theatre) that generates some kind
of false impression. Thus one consistent way of thinking about
hypocrisy, and one that will recur throughout this book, is as
the wearing of masks. But the idea of hypocrisy as maskwearing leaves open the question of what it is that is being
masked. It also leaves open the nature of the relationship between hypocrisy and bad behaviour, or vice. The most common way of thinking about hypocrisy is as a vice—that is, to
9

INTRODUCTION

take it for granted that it is always a bad thing to seek to conceal whom one really is. But another way of thinking about
hypocrisy is as a coping mechanism for the problem of vice itself, in which case it may be that hypocrisy is not a vice at all.
One way to cope with vice is to seek to conceal it, or to dress it
up as something it is not. This sort of act—the passing off of
vice as virtue—makes it possible to consider hypocrisy in two
very different lights. From one perspective the act of concealment makes things worse—it simply piles vice on top of
vice, which is why hypocrites are often seen as wickeder
than people who are simply, and openly, bad. But from another perspective the concealment turns out to be a form of
amelioration—it is, in Rochefoucauld’s timeless phrase, “the
tribute that vice pays to virtue.” Hypocrites who pretend to be
better than they really are could also be said to be better than
they might be, because they are at least pretending to be good.
This does not exhaust the range of possible attitudes to vice
of which hypocrisy may be a symptom. Sometimes individuals may ﬁnd it necessary to pretend to be worse than they really are, for the sake of appearances. A democratic politician
might feel the need to conceal some of her moral reﬁnements
of character for fear of appearing holier-than-thou and putting
off the electorate—this is the curious democratic tribute that
virtue occasionally plays to vice. Equally, it is possible for
someone to believe that the categories of vice and virtue are
meaningless in themselves, but nevertheless to wish to give
the appearance of taking them seriously. This does not require
dressing up vice as virtue; instead, it means dressing up
morally arbitrary actions as though they had their own moral
character, for better or for worse. As we shall see, the difference between concealing the fact of vice and concealing the
fact that vice can be hard to distinguish from virtue turns out
to be of deep political signiﬁcance for a body of liberal rational
thought that can be traced all the way back to Hobbes.
Finally, there remains the question of whether hypocrisy
depends on the intention behind the action—that is, whether
10

INTRODUCTION

hypocrites need to know that what they are doing is hypocrisy
for it to count as such. One view is that hypocrisy must involve
the deliberate intention to deceive, and that the more deliberate the deception, the worse the hypocrite. But many people
conceal aspects of their true natures not out of malice or from
other designing motives, but simply because it is the easy option, and one that may even be required by basic standards of
social conformity. It is common to see this latter sort of
hypocrisy—if hypocrisy is what it is—as essentially benign.
Indeed, it is possible to understand many socially useful conventions as hypocrisy of this kind—politeness, for example, is
by deﬁnition a dressing up of one’s true feelings (of course, it
is possible to be motivated by a sincere desire not to hurt
someone else’s feelings, but if one is sincerely motivated by
concern for another, one is being something more than merely
polite).7 It seems absurd to view good manners as on a par
with the more malicious forms of hypocrisy. But precisely because hypocrisy can take these very different forms, it also follows that well-meaning hypocrisy may lack one of the
qualities that is unavoidable among those individuals whose
hypocrisy is of their own design: self-knowledge. Hypocrites
who know what they are doing at least know that what they
are doing is hypocrisy. But hypocrites who lack the sense that
they are responsible for the part that they are playing can also
lack a sense of responsibility for its consequences. In large
groups, this absence of self-awareness can turn into a kind of
collective self-deception. The least one can say for the nastier
kind of hypocrites is that they are not self-deceived.
If hypocrisy is a kind of deception, therefore, it is still very
important to distinguish within hypocritical behaviour between the different kinds of deception for which it allows:
deliberate and inadvertent, personal and collective, selfdeceptions and other-directed deceptions. And these distinctions are the ones that turn out to be of the greatest political
signiﬁcance in the story I will be telling in this book, of greater
signiﬁcance than broader distinctions between hypocrisy and
11

INTRODUCTION

sincerity, or between truth-telling and lies. Once we acknowledge that some element of hypocrisy is inevitable in our political life, then it becomes self-defeating simply to try to guard
against it. Instead, what we need to know is what sorts of hypocrites we want our politicians to be, and in what sorts of combinations. Do we want them to be hypocrites like us, so that
they can understand us, or to be hypocrites of a different kind,
so that they can manage our hypocrisy? Do we want them to
be designing hypocrites, who at least know what they are doing, or do we want them to be more innocent than that? Do we
want them to expose each other’s hypocrisy, or to ameliorate
it? These are the sorts of questions that concerned the authors
I will be discussing in this book, and in their attempts to answer them they tell us something about what it makes sense to
wish for in the hypocritical world of politics.

Hypocrisy then and now
I began this introduction by remarking that there is a lot of
hypocrisy about in contemporary politics. But it would be a
mistake to assume that there is more hypocrisy around than
ever before; there is just more political exposure, in an age of
24-hour news, which makes hypocrisy easier to ﬁnd. It
may be that some of the hypocrisies of the contemporary
world are relatively new, and potentially very dangerous—
the hypocrisies surrounding the politics of global warming,
for example. Others, though, are all too familiar. As religion
returns as a central category of political and intellectual engagement, the question of the authenticity of the religious beliefs of both politicians and citizens is once again an issue, in
domestic politics (particularly in American presidential politics, a subject to which I will return in the ﬁnal chapter) and in
the international arena (for example, in the exchanges between President Bush and President Ahmadinejad of Iran).8 In
this book I will try to use history to provide some insight into
12

INTRODUCTION

these current preoccupations, and to get a sense of the extent
to which we have been here before.
Nevertheless, it is always a mistake to treat the history of
ideas as a repository of timeless wisdom for us to draw on
when we run out of ideas of our own, and to assume that past
authors are talking directly to us, and wanting to help us with
our particular difﬁculties.9 The historical period covered by this
book is a broad one, and there are inevitably substantial differences between the kinds of politics being considered by the different authors under discussion. Many aspects of our politics
would be unrecognizable to them, just as much of their politics
has become deeply unfamiliar to us. In the chapters that follow,
I will highlight the different contexts in which the various authors were writing, and seek to identify some of the particular
historical controversies with which they were concerned. Nevertheless, I do want to try to draw some broader lessons that cut
across these differences of context. The ﬁnal chapter of this
book attempts to bring the story up-to-date, and to explore
what the history of hypocrisy in liberal rationalist thought can
tell us about politics at the beginning of the twenty-ﬁrst century.
The focus of this chapter is on American politics, because it is
in the United States that many of the themes of this predominantly English story are now on most prominent display:
hypocrisy and power, hypocrisy and virtue, hypocrisy and empire. This is not to claim that the United States has replaced the
United Kingdom as the repository for much of the world’s
hypocrisy. Rather it is to note that the questions at the heart of
this book tend to be most acute at the centres of power. It would
perhaps be fair to say that hypocrisy is currently perceived by
much of the rest of the world as the American vice, which from
an American perspective simply serves to emphasise the far
deeper hypocrisy of America’s critics.10
I believe that the history covered in this book can help us
with some of these arguments; if nothing else, it shows us that
many of them have deep roots in the intellectual tradition
from which our politics derives. I also think it can provide us
13

INTRODUCTION

with a sense of perspective on some of our more immediate
concerns, including our endless worries about the way that
politicians use empty words to conceal what they are up to.
Here too we may discover that, for all our heightened awareness of and exposure to spin and counter-spin, the basic problem of fraudulent political language is nothing new, and it
stands at the heart of the liberal tradition. Spin, like hypocrisy,
is pretty repulsive encountered at ﬁrst-hand, and it tends to
make people angry, which is one good reason why it is sometimes helpful to approach it from a more tangential direction.
In the great dance of hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy that is
democratic politics, it is all too easy to get wrapped up in the
constant back-and-forth and to lose sight of the wider picture.
Using a history stretching back over three hundred years to
gain a sense of that wider picture can be hazardous—to ask, as
I do in the ﬁnal chapter, what a philosopher like Thomas
Hobbes might think of a politician like Hillary Clinton is perhaps stretching the limits of the historical evidence. But it is
nonetheless the central claim of this book that there is a line of
thought about sincerity, hypocrisy, and lies in politics that
runs all the way back from our own time to that of Hobbes.
Moreover, this line of thought shows much more obvious
continuity with our current political concerns than does the
body of writing that is usually taken to give us insights into
the nature of political hypocrisy. Hypocrisy is a subject that
lends itself to maxims—Rochefoucauld’s Maxims is sometimes
taken to be the deﬁnitive text on the subject—and it is to maxims that we often look to discover the timeless truth about
what it is for a politician to dissemble and deceive. Truths tend
to look more timeless when they come in neat little packages.
But these maxims, almost by deﬁnition, are taken out of context (Rochefoucauld’s book, for example, is about French
courtly hypocrisy and its relationship to Jansenist philosophy). Of course, context isn’t everything, and there may be
times when philosophers wish to abstract away from the circumstances in which ideas were ﬁrst generated. Indeed, there
14

INTRODUCTION

is a view—often associated with the philosopher and historian of ideas Leo Strauss, himself often associated with current
strands of neo-conservative political thinking—that the deep
truths about politics exist beyond and beneath immediate context, which serves merely as a mask for these timeless ideas.
Straussians see a line of thought that runs from Plato through
Machiavelli and Hobbes up to the present, containing certain
truths about the need for political lies. The idea is that these
truths can be passed on to those in the know, while remaining
hidden from anyone who sees only the surface concerns in
which they are dressed up. In this book, I have deliberately
avoided getting bogged down in the fraught methodological
disputes that swirl around Strauss and the history of ideas
more generally. But in offering a story that begins with
Hobbes, that separates Hobbes off from Machiavelli, and that
takes the surface concerns of political philosophers seriously,
I hope it is clear that I take a different view.
Certainly, I believe that the idea that political morality can
be boiled down to a set of all-purpose maxims is itself an illusion. We are better off looking to the past for help with our
present concerns if it exhibits a deep continuity with the political ideas and institutions that we have inherited, in all their
complexity. Too many participants in the world of contemporary politics, with all its duplicity and double-dealing, think
they need to read Machiavelli’s Prince, or Sun Tzu’s Art of War,
or any one of the other hackneyed manuals of managerial
Realpolitik, in order to understand the nature of the game they
are playing. If they really wanted to understand the nature of
the game they are playing, they would be better off starting
with Hobbes’s Leviathan.

15

]

]

1

HOBBES AND THE MASK OF POWER

Hypocrisy and sovereignty

Throughout his long writing career, Thomas Hobbes (1588–1679) displayed a striking consistency on his central political
concerns: the scope and content of the laws of nature (which
boil down to “the Fundamentall Law of Nature, which is to
seek Peace, and follow it”); the unfettered power of the sovereign to decide on questions of “security” (including what was
to count as a question of security); the threat posed to any
lasting peace that comes from allowing individuals to exercise their private judgment on such questions; and the horrors
of the civil war that might result.1 But he also shifted his attitude in relation to a number of important issues: the role of
rhetoric in political discourse, and its possible uses in the dissemination of “civil science”; the Erastian implications of the
sovereign’s supreme authority over all questions of religious
doctrine; the function of the concept of representation in
building up the idea of the state. All of these areas of his
thought have been the subject of considerable scholarly interest in recent years, and I will come back to them.2 But another
matter on which Hobbes appears to have altered his position,
and one which has attracted far less attention than these others, concerns the dangers of hypocrisy in political life. The
apparent shift can be illustrated by looking at the scope
16

THE MASK OF POWER

Hobbes gives to the problem of hypocrisy in three of his major works on politics: De Cive (1642), Leviathan (1651), and Behemoth (completed in 1668, but only published posthumously
in 1682).3 In De Cive, though Hobbes has things of importance
to say about the need for sincerity on the part of the sovereign, he has nothing at all to say about hypocrisy; he does not
seem to have considered it a problem. In Behemoth, by contrast, Hobbes is obsessed with hypocrisy: it is everywhere
in that book, not least in its opening lines, which blame
hypocrisy (something Hobbes characterises as “double iniquity”) along with self-conceit (“double folly”) for the catastrophe of the English civil war.4 Between these two books comes
Leviathan, where Hobbes is neither as sanguine about
hypocrisy as he is in De Cive, nor as troubled by it as he is in
Behemoth. Rather, it is here that he provides his clearest indications of where he thinks the limits of acceptable hypocrisy
in political life might lie.
Before exploring what Leviathan has to say about the necessary hypocrisies of a civil existence, I want to discuss the wide
gap between his treatment of the subject in the other two
works. Part of the explanation for the different approaches
taken in these two books lies in the kinds of books they are: De
Cive is a work of philosophy (or “science” as Hobbes would
call it); Behemoth is a history, designed to tell the story of, but
more importantly to apportion the blame for, the civil war. It
is much easier to be untroubled by hypocrisy when considering it philosophically, in the abstract or in the round; much
harder, when thinking about an actual sequence of political
events in which hypocrisy is on conspicuous display. Hobbes
is by no means alone in this. David Hume (1711–1776), who
was Hobbes’s intellectual successor in so many ways, also has
a split attitude to hypocrisy in his different modes of writing:
calmly and clinically dismissive of its apparent wickedness in
his philosophical oeuvre, and even more so in some of his private letters,5 he is nevertheless deeply exercised by the hypocritical behaviour of some of the leading protagonists in his
17

CHAPTER ONE

History of England, particularly in the chapters that deal with
the period 1640–1660. Above all, Hume was unable to resist
harping on what he saw as the brazen hypocrisy of Oliver
Cromwell, a subject to which we shall return.6 This serves as
an important reminder when thinking about the problem of
hypocrisy: however much one might recognise its essential
triviality as a vice, it is impossible to avoid its potential significance as a motor of political conﬂict, given its capacity to provoke people beyond measure. Hobbes and Hume also show
how hard it is, even for the most clear-headed political thinkers,
to keep their cool when it comes to the hypocrisy of people
they thoroughly dislike or distrust (as Hume both disliked
and distrusted what he knew of Cromwell’s personality, even
as he acknowledged the hold it gave him over his followers).
Behemoth is perhaps Hobbes’s angriest piece of political writing, and while it is true that the hypocrisy he sees at work
among those who took their part against the king helps to fuel
his anger, it is equally true that his anger serves to fuel his obsession with their hypocrisy. Hobbes would have us believe
that the reason he cannot stand the Presbyterians (the primary
focus of his fury in Behemoth) is because they are hypocrites;
but it is just as likely that the reason he thinks they are hypocrites is because he simply cannot stand them.
Nevertheless, the difference between De Cive and Behemoth
is not simply one of genre or provocation. It is also the case
that Hobbes is making different kinds of arguments in the two
books, though by no means incompatible ones. One way to
capture this difference, and thereby to see the wider continuity in Hobbes’s view of hypocrisy, is to look at what he has to
say in De Cive about the role of sincerity and good intentions
in political life. In a striking note at the end of chapter III,
which follows his lengthy itemisation of the various laws of
nature, Hobbes offers this summary: “Brieﬂy, in a state of nature, Just and Unjust should be judged not from actions but
from the intention and conscience of the agents.”7 In other
words, a just action is one that is sincerely intended to be just.
18

THE MASK OF POWER

One implication of this is Hobbes’s famous contention that the
laws of nature, though they bind internally (in foro interno), do
not always do so externally (in foro externo)—that is, an action
performed with the intention to seek peace is just, even if it
does not accord with the outward observance of the laws of
nature. So, for example, “to steal from Thieves” is, in Hobbes’s
terms, “to act reasonably,” because it is consistent with a desire to seek peace: although natural law says we should behave
towards others with consideration—“the fourth precept of nature is that everyone should be considerate of others”—treating
thieves in this way would just encourage them.8 But more importantly for our purposes here, in chapter III of De Cive
Hobbes also draws the countervailing inference: that to act in
accordance with the natural law without meaning to do so is
injustice. “Laws which bind the conscience,” he writes, “may
be violated not only by an action contrary to them but also an
action consonant with them, if the agent believes it to be contrary. For although the act itself is in accordance with the
laws, his conscience is against them.”9 In other words, if
you happen to do the right thing, that is not enough; unless
you intended it to be the right thing, what you did was still
wrong.
Is this emphasis on the inner motives of political actors a
veiled warning against the dangers of hypocrisy in politics, of
not being on the inside what you appear to be on the outside?
I think not, for two reasons. First, the injunction against insincerity in effect only applies to those who remain subject in
their actions to the laws of nature; that is, it only applies to
sovereigns. On Hobbes’s understanding of politics, sovereigns
are the sole agents who persist in a state of nature; everyone
else is subject to the civil laws.10 So the scope of this injunction
is in political terms pretty narrow. It is true that Hobbes allows
for the possibility that all the members of a state could collectively form the sovereign body, in what he, and we, would call
an absolute democracy. In that case, everyone would be part
of the sovereign power. But it certainly would not follow that
19

CHAPTER ONE

everyone would be living under the laws of nature. Individual
citizens would still be subject to the civil law. Sovereignty
would reside with the artiﬁcial body of the citizens, assembled
together to act by majority rule. It is hard to know what it
would mean to insist that an artiﬁcial body of this kind should
be sincere in all it does. Part of the problem is that it is not
clear what the inner life of the assembly would consist in—an
assembly does not have thoughts of its own beyond those expressed in its collective decisions. But the deeper problem, certainly for Hobbes, is that sincerity is the last thing one would
expect of the individual members of such a body, given the
kind of politics they were bound to be engaged in. Democracies were places of posturing, rhetorical dissimulation, and
grandstanding—“nothing but an aristocracy of orators,” as he
witheringly puts it in The Elements of Law (1640).11 This was
one of the lessons Hobbes learned from Thucydides, whose
translator he had been. The reason monarchies were to be preferred to democracies is precisely because the institutions of
popular rule made political sincerity practically impossible.
Such sincerity could never therefore be a widespread value in
Hobbes’s view of the world.
The second point to make here is that Hobbes’s claim about
insincerity does not straightforwardly translate into an argument against hypocrisy. What Hobbes says is that an action
which happens to coincide with natural law is unjust if it is
nothing more than that: pure chance. For example (and this is
my example, not Hobbes’s, but it is probably the sort of thing
he had in mind), if a sovereign ruler declares war on a rival
power for entirely capricious reasons—boredom, avarice,
cruelty—it may be that the result is to cement peaceful relations between the two states; perhaps the threatened state, terriﬁed by the prospect of war against such a capricious
opponent, surrenders straight away. Still, in Hobbes’s terms,
the act of aggression that produced this outcome is an unjust
one, because the aggressor did not care about peace; mindless

20

THE MASK OF POWER

aggression is wrong whatever its consequences. But aggressive
acts that produce peaceful outcomes are not strictly speaking
hypocritical, because hypocrisy requires more than the coincidence of an ill-intended act with a desirable result. If I commit
a burglary, say, with the result that its victim ends up better off
than before thanks to an insurance payout, that does not make
me a hypocrite. It might make me a fool, if my intention was to
do the victim harm; but fools, like liars, are by no means always hypocrites. Hypocrisy is not about a mismatch between
intentions and outcomes. Rather, hypocrisy is an ill-intended
act dressed up to look like a well-intended one (or, very occasionally, a well-intended act dressed up to look like an illintended one).
Hobbes has nothing to say about this sort of hypocrisy in
De Cive. Indeed, how sovereigns choose to dress up their actions in their relations with each other is not really an issue for
Hobbes. They may well see the need to pretend to be abiding
by the outward demands of the laws of nature even when they
have no intention of doing so—signing a peace treaty they
have no intention of keeping, for example. This would be no
different than stealing from thieves, and may be the rational
thing to do in the treacherous world of international relations,
if it is the only way to achieve security. Certainly, Hobbes had
no great expectations that sovereigns would be open with each
other.12 But sovereigns who sign a treaty they have no intention of keeping because they have no interest in peace or security are behaving unjustly, whether they try to conceal their
real motives or not. Let me illustrate with a more recent
example—was Hitler a hypocrite for signing Neville Chamberlain’s little piece of paper at Munich in 1938, pledging himself to a peace he had no real intention of upholding? Not
really, because he hardly made any efforts to conceal his underlying contempt for what he was doing. But on this account,
that is not the point—what matters is that if Hitler wanted war
for war’s sake, then he was an unjust ruler in Hobbes’s terms,

21

CHAPTER ONE

whatever the outcome of his actions, and however he dressed
them up. Hypocrisy is not the issue for Hobbes. The issue is
justice.
But if hypocrisy is not the issue in the world of sovereigns,
neither is it the issue in the world of subjects, for entirely opposite reasons. Intentions, which are all important under natural law, cease to count under civil law, because what matters is
outward conformity to the will of the sovereign. Conscience,
which may be the test of natural justice, is not the test of what
Hobbes calls “right,” i.e., justice under the laws of a commonwealth. Indeed, it is a large part of Hobbes’s polemical purpose throughout his political writings to reconﬁgure how
people understand the language of “conscience,” so that they
might come to accept that conscientious action simply means
acting in accordance with the will of the sovereign.13 A subject’s internal beliefs or convictions are irrelevant here. So,
Hobbes says in chapter XII of De Cive, “I am not acting unjustly if I go to war at the order of my commonwealth though I
believe it is an unjust war; rather, I act unjustly if I refuse to go
to war, claiming for myself the knowledge of what is just and
unjust that belongs to a commonwealth.”14 And he goes on:
“Those who teach that subjects commit sin in obeying a command of their Prince which seems to them unjust, hold an
opinion which is not only false but one of those opinions
which are inimical to civil obedience.”15 Under these conditions, subjects may have to do things that would fall under
the broad heading of hypocrisy: they may have to perform
actions, or profess beliefs, that are suggestive of an underlying set of convictions that they do not hold. So it is hardly
surprising that Hobbes does not choose to categorise this
sort of behaviour as hypocrisy, with all the pejorative connotations that the term brought with it (which was at least as
true then as it is now). Instead, he wants to emphasise that
the concealment of one’s inner motives on the part of subjects
may be not merely inevitable, but essential to the survival of
the state.
22

THE MASK OF POWER

The hypocrisy of disobedience
In the world of sovereigns and subjects described in De Cive,
there is no real space for worrying about hypocrisy. It is more
or less irrelevant for sovereigns, and more or less unavoidable
for subjects, which is why in neither case does Hobbes label it
as such. How then does hypocrisy become Hobbes’s central
worry by the time he writes Behemoth? The answer is that Behemoth is about a third category of political actor, beyond sovereigns and subjects: it is about the perpetrators of sedition. Of
course, throughout his political writings, Hobbes has plenty of
things to say about disobedient subjects, and how they should
be dealt with. In De Cive, he categorises “the crime of lèsemajesté,” which is punishable by death, as “the deed or word”
by which citizens reveal that they no longer intend to obey their
sovereign. “A citizen reveals such an intention by his action
when he inﬂicts or attempts to inﬂict violence against those
who hold the sovereign power or are carrying out their orders;
such are traitors, Regicides, those who bear arms against their
country or desert to the enemy in wartime. People reveal the
same intention in words when they plainly deny that they or
the other citizens are obligated to offer such obedience.”16 But
the seditious individuals Hobbes is concerned with in Behemoth do not simply belong in one or other of these categories.
The reason is that they did not reveal their intentions in so
“plain” or self-evident a manner, certainly not until the civil
war was well under way—indeed, Hobbes writes, some of
them “did not challenge the sovereignty in plain terms, and by
that name, till they had slain the king.”17 Instead, they sought
to conceal their true intentions behind the mask of their supposed piety. It is this that made them hypocrites. What is
more, it was their hypocrisy, Hobbes suspected, that enabled
them to get away with it. “Who would think,” he writes, “that
such horrible designs as these could so easily and so long remain covered by the cloak of godliness?”18
23

CHAPTER ONE

This deliberate concealment is what makes hypocrisy “double iniquity” as Hobbes understands it: ﬁrst there is the sin,
then there is the sin of attempting to cover it up. It is also what
distinguishes hypocrisy from what Hobbes calls the “double
folly” of self-conceit, which constitutes a form of selfdeception. For Hobbes, the ways in which human beings were
capable of deceiving themselves were many and various. In
Leviathan, his preoccupation is with “Vain-glory,” which arises
whenever men set store by the ﬂattery of others, and glory in
what it suggests about their own power and ability. What
makes this glorying “vain” is that it does not survive the test
of experience: “Vain-glorious men, such as estimate their sufﬁciency by the ﬂattery of other men, or the fortune of some precedent action . . . are enclined to rash engaging; and in the
approach of danger or difﬁculty, to retire if they can.”19 In
other words, once they have to put up, the vainglorious tend
to shut up: this is a sense of self that crumbles under pressure.
But the enemies of the king did not crumble, despite the fact
that they too had an absurdly puffed up sense of their own importance. As such, they suffered from a heightened form of
self-conceit, which adds to the folly of setting store by the
opinions of others the folly of acting consistently on those
opinions. In Behemoth, Hobbes makes clear that vanity (as we
might now understand it) was a large part of the problem in
the political insurrection of the 1640s—the king’s enemies
tended to be men, Hobbes says, “such as had a great opinion
of their sufﬁciency in politics, which they thought was not sufﬁciently taken notice of by the king.”20 But this was not simply
vainglory, in that the illusion was not exposed by acting on it;
rather, it was a form of self-deception, because the illusion
generated the carapace of unjustiﬁed and ultimately selfdestructive actions needed to sustain it. These were people
who had come to believe their own publicity. Hypocrisy and
self-conceit are thus two sides of the same coin: they are both
the result of a gap between appearance and reality. What distinguishes them is that hypocrites are seeking to conceal the
24

THE MASK OF POWER

truth about themselves from other people, whereas those
whose conceit has turned into self-deception are concealing
the truth from themselves.
What, though, was it that the hypocrites who brought about
civil war had been deliberately concealing about themselves?
For Hobbes’s audience, hypocrisy would have meant one sort
of concealment in particular: hiding one’s true religious
beliefs—or more speciﬁcally, the lack of them—behind a façade
of public religious observance. The problem is that it is not
clear that this is the kind of hypocrisy that Hobbes wants to attack. Nor is it clear that he is in a position to attack it, since this
was precisely the hypocrisy that Hobbes and his followers
were themselves being accused of at the time he wrote Behemoth, on the basis of views he had spelled out in Leviathan, but
had certainly not concealed in his earlier political writings,
that subjects were not only allowed but obliged to put on an act
of faith for the sake of conformity to the will of the sovereign.
Had Behemoth been published when it was written—in 1668—
its readers would undoubtedly have been struck by the fact
that Hobbes, the arch-hypocrite, was now accusing others of
hypocrisy (and part of the reason it could not get published
is that this would have inﬂamed further Hobbes’s already
volatile political reputation). For Hobbes to accuse others of
hypocrisy would have looked to his many critics like the ultimate act of hypocrisy in itself. Would they have been right?
This is not a straightforward question to answer. Part of the
problem is that Hobbes is not entirely consistent about what
should be considered culpable hypocrisy in Behemoth, and at
times he gives his critics ammunition for supposing that he
has changed his tune. For example, here he is on the plight of
Charles’s wife, Queen Henrietta Maria, at the hands of the
king’s Puritan enemies, who wished her to renounce her faith:
The Queen was a Catholic by profession, and therefore could
not but endeavour to do the Catholics all the good she could:
she had not else been truly that which she professed to be. But
25

CHAPTER ONE

it seems they meant to force her to hypocrisy, being hypocrites
themselves. Can any man think it a crime in a devout lady, of
what sect soever, to seek the favour and benediction of that
Church whereof she is a member?21

It is hard to imagine that Hobbes ever penned a less convincing passage than this one. For a start, one man who might
think it a crime for someone, however devout, to place sincere
religion above all other considerations was Hobbes himself,
given his previously expressed views about the irrelevance of
personal conviction when the security of the state is at issue. It
could be argued that this case is an exception, because he is
talking about the family of the sovereign, and the sincerity of
sovereigns does trump other considerations. But of course, the
queen herself was not sovereign, only the king was, and again
it is central to Hobbes’s political philosophy that sovereignty
should never be divided. The one genuinely Hobbesian defence of the queen’s religious practices would be that the king
had permitted them, but that is not what he says here; instead,
he says that the queen was sincere, and therefore had no
choice. Finally, it is hard to make sense of Hobbes’s claim that
the reason her enemies wished to force her to renounce her
faith is that they were hypocrites themselves. Why should
hypocrites wish hypocrisy on others? Being hypocrites, they
are free to confound their own principles as they wish, and act
to their own best advantage; in this case that would surely
have meant having the queen continue in her ostentatiously
Catholic ways in order to stir up the people against the king.
So weak is Hobbes’s argument at this point, that some explanation is needed. One possibility is that he simply lost sight
of what he was doing: after all, even the greatest political philosophers can have their heads turned by a queen in revolutionary distress—compare Edmund Burke’s notorious loss of
judgment when it came to Marie Antoinette (“Never, never
more, shall we behold that generous loyalty to rank and sex,
that proud submission, that digniﬁed obedience, that subordi26

THE MASK OF POWER

nation of the heart, which kept alive, even in servitude itself,
the spirit of an exalted freedom!” etc., etc.). But Hobbes is not
Burke, and though he was an old man when he wrote Behemoth (1668 was his eightieth year), it is a lucid and deeply unsentimental book. Moreover, it is a dialogue, and the dialogue
form allows for a certain distance to open up between an author’s intentions and the words on the page. The words about
the hypocrisy of the Queen’s enemies are spoken in Behemoth
by “B,” who is second ﬁddle to “A,” from whom “B” is receiving instruction about the causes of the war.22 Thus a more
likely explanation is that this passage is not to be taken entirely seriously; that it is just window-dressing, designed to act
as cover for the book’s more deliberately provocative passages
(Queen Henrietta Maria was, after all, mother to Hobbes’s
then sovereign, Charles II, and she was still alive in 1668).
The view that this passage is not to be taken at face value
also makes sense, given Hobbes’s own position on hypocrisy:
as someone who has previously shown himself unconcerned
by it, he is free to affect concern when it suits him, since sincerity has no special premium for him. In fact, this was something that struck many contemporaries as an unavoidable
consideration when thinking about how to read Hobbes—if he
is serious about the justiﬁability of dissimulation, then there is
no reason to take at face value the things he himself says, including what he has to say on this score. As Kinch Hoekstra
has put it in an essay on Hobbes’s attitude to the truth: “His
justiﬁcation of simulation and dissimulation was notorious
among his early readers for destabilizing any attempt to interpret the intention of Hobbes and his followers.”23 Indeed,
there is a paradox of a sort at work here, which became a recurring theme in the political thought of the period: advocates
of hypocrisy may ﬁnd it hard to be taken seriously, because if
they really believe what they say, then it serves to render what
they say hard to believe.24
But this does not mean that nothing Hobbes has to say
about hypocrisy is reliable, nor that his underlying political
27

CHAPTER ONE

message is unclear. Hobbes’s primary concern in Behemoth, as
elsewhere in his writings, is to distinguish between the kinds
of duplicity that matter and the kinds of duplicity that do not.
For these purposes, the issue of the queen’s devoutness of
faith is indeed just a sideshow. “A,” the lead voice in the dialogue, does not bother with it—his only concern is what this
antipathy towards the queen’s religion revealed about the intentions of the king’s enemies (essentially, it showed that they
wished to tar the king with the brush of the queen’s “Popery,”
to such an extent “that some of them did not stick to say
openly, that the King was governed by her”).25 On the central
question of whether the state should worry about individuals
who merely pretended to believe what they professed to believe, Hobbes’s position does not shift in Behemoth—what
other people called hypocrisy (i.e., pretended religious faith)
was not his concern. He held to the view that it was not the
state’s business, nor anyone else’s, to pry into the realm of personal faith, simply in order to highlight a mismatch between
outward behaviour and what may lie in someone’s heart.
What’s more, it would be futile. As he says in Behemoth,
“Hypocrisy hath this great prerogative above other sins, that it
cannot be accused [i.e., proved].”26 More importantly still, he
accepts that this feature of hypocrisy cuts both ways. If it does
not make sense to question whether those who obey the law
really believe what they are required to profess, neither does it
make sense to ask whether religious ﬁrebrands and other dissenters who challenged the authority of the king really believed that they were acting on God’s instruction. That’s what
they said—that, as Hobbes puts it, what they preached was
“as they thought agreeable to God’s revealed will in the Scriptures.” And he goes on: “How can any man prove they
thought otherwise?”27
If religious hypocrisy was not really the issue for Hobbes in
Behemoth, what is more striking about the account he gives is
his acknowledgment that it was not really the issue for the ﬁrebrands either. He makes this clear in an extended passage in
28

THE MASK OF POWER

which he discusses how Presbyterian preachers sought to stay
on the right side of their congregations. Hobbes highlights
their readiness to tolerate merely the outward conformity to respectable behaviour. They were careful in their sermons not to
inveigh against what he calls “the lucrative vices”: “such as are
feigning, lying, cozening, hypocrisy or other uncharitableness,
except want of charity to their pastors or to the faithful; which
was a great ease to the generality of citizens and the inhabitants
of market-towns, and no little proﬁt to themselves.”28 This was
pure politics on the preachers’ part—they were aware of how
important it was to retain the support of their public, both
moral and ﬁnancial, and therefore they did nothing that might
jeopardise that support. Indeed, they were behaving in just the
astute way that Hobbes believed anyone who was serious
about power ought to behave—tough on the primary loyalties
of their congregations, but lax about their private failings. The
only difference, of course, was that the sole person Hobbes believed should be behaving in this way was the sovereign.
Yet it was precisely this astuteness on the part of the Presbyterian pastors that revealed the true nature of their hypocrisy,
because it demonstrated that they knew what they were doing. By constructing an image for themselves that furthered
their political ambitions, the Puritan leaders showed that they
understood the nature of politics perfectly well. The clichéd
view of Puritan hypocrisy (particularly of Puritan sexual
hypocrisy) that lingers to this day is that it meant imposing
impossibly high standards of public morality, which no one
could possibly meet, including the Puritans themselves. What
is so distinctive about Hobbes’s account is his view that they
actually set quite low standards (except, perhaps, in sexual
matters, which Hobbes does not mention), both for themselves
and others, and it was this that conﬁrmed their hypocrisy, because it revealed that they knew exactly what they were about;
they were not self-deceived.
In other words, these were consummate political operators. What made them hypocrites was that they had to cloak
29

CHAPTER ONE

their political understanding behind a façade of political
naivety. They had to present themselves as innocent of the implications of the doctrines of subversion that they preached.
“You may count this among their artiﬁces,” Hobbes writes,
“to make the people believe they were oppressed by the King,
or perhaps the bishops, or both.”29 Did they themselves believe what they preached, that the king and/or the bishops
were oppressors? Who can say, since it is impossible to be certain what anyone truly believes. Perhaps they did believe it in
their hearts. What mattered was that even if they did believe it,
they also ought to have known that they could not act on it,
any more than a sincere atheist could act on his atheism. The
hypocrisy of the Presbyterians (or as Hobbes calls it here,
their “artiﬁce”) lay not in concealing their true feelings about
the king or the bishops, but in concealing the fact that they
must have known what such feelings were really worth.

Colouring and cloaking
One way of bringing out the wider implications of what
Hobbes is saying here about political hypocrisy is to look
away from Behemoth, and to turn instead to his treatment
throughout his writings of the problem of paradiastole, or what
Quentin Skinner has called “rhetorical redescription.” Rhetorical redescription is the practice of deploying terms of moral
approval to describe certain types of actions in order to present them in a more favourable light (or alternatively terms of
disapproval, in order to present them unfavourably). So, for
example, to call an action courageous is not merely to describe
it but to commend it; and to call the same action foolhardy is
to condemn it; the result is that in both cases, though it remains the same action, it is the descriptive epithet that determines its character.
In the Renaissance and early modern literature in which
this practice is discussed, there are two main metaphors used
30

THE MASK OF POWER

to capture what is being attempted. The ﬁrst talks about concealing vices under the mantle of virtues—as one sixteenthcentury poet put it, “[using] the nearest virtue to cloak away
the vice.”30 These are what Skinner calls “the metaphors of
masking and concealment,” and clearly they stand close to the
idea of hypocrisy, which has always had some connection
with the business of hiding behind a mask. By contrast, the
other metaphor used for rhetorical redescription is that of
“colour,” or the “colouring” of an action, meaning to give it a
particular moral hue. It is true that this can be understood as
another version of masking—for example, by painting an action, or indeed a face, to hide its true appearance—and some
early modern deﬁnitions of hypocrisy run the ideas of colouring and cloaking together (an OED source from 1555 speaks of
“no coulor nor cloked hipocrisie”). But the metaphors of
cloaking and colouring are not necessarily interchangeable.
An alternative way to think of “colouring” is as the giving of a
moral glow to something that is otherwise morally arbitrary
or colourless. No vices are being hidden here, because there is
nothing to hide (the canvas is effectively blank); rather, the
redescription is designed to introduce moral criteria where
previously there were none.
Of these two ways of conceiving the problem of paradiastole, Hobbes’s primary concern is clearly with the second, not
the ﬁrst—with colouring, not cloaking. When he repeatedly
points out, as he does across his political writings, the dangers of words being used in effect at random to signify either
the approval or the disapproval of certain actions, he is not
worried that as a result some vices will remain concealed. In
the arbitrary world of the state of nature as Hobbes understands it (the celebrated “war of all against all”), there are no
vices to hide; instead, there is simply the endless attempt by
individuals to redescribe what they happen to prefer as virtue,
and what others happen to prefer as vice. As Hobbes puts it in
Leviathan: “For one man calleth Wisdome, what another calleth feare; and one cruelty, what another justice . . . [and so
31

CHAPTER ONE

on]. Therefore such names can never be the true ground of any
ratiocination.”31 It hardly makes sense to call this hypocrisy,
since it is entirely natural to behave in this way when there are
no ﬁxed standards. What is needed to escape this arbitrary existence is a sovereign to ﬁx the meaning of such words, and
any other terms over which men might disagree, by the
wholly artiﬁcial determination of his political authority.
Yet there is still a clear sense in which paradiastole understood as the colouring of morally arbitrary actions counts as a
form of concealment in Hobbes’s terms. One way to illustrate
why this is so is to consider how Hobbes uses morally loaded
terms in his own writing to highlight their relative arbitrariness, and thereby expose their essential superﬁciality. Take,
for example, a word like “conscience,” which Hobbes deploys
in the highly unusual sense of meaning a willingness to act in
conformity with the judgment of one’s sovereign (see above).
Clearly, Hobbes is taking issue with all those who use the
language of conscience to ground the right of an individual to
ignore sovereign judgments of which they happen to disapprove. But so unusual is Hobbes’s understanding of the term
that it seems hard to believe that this is what he thinks it really
means—if “conscience” is just outward conformity, then
surely it doesn’t mean anything at all? And that, of course, is
Hobbes’s point. He is not trying to redeﬁne conscience so
much as show that it is just a word—the moral substance of an
action is determined by its political character as obedience or
disobedience, not by the label that you put on it. In Skinner’s
terms, what Hobbes is doing is “satirising” those who put too
much weight on a word like conscience, and he does so by
sticking the label onto something entirely unfamiliar while indicating that nothing about it has really changed.
He does the same with perhaps the most contested term in
the entire modern political lexicon—“democracy.”32 Hobbes
uses the language of democracy in his own writing to describe
what might otherwise be understood as arbitrary rule—that

32

THE MASK OF POWER

is, he treats democratic regimes as on a par with monarchies
and aristocracies in their reliance on absolute sovereign power
in order to function successfully. This has led some commentators to suppose that Hobbes himself can be understood as a
kind of democrat.33 But it is much more plausible to see him as
suggesting that it is a mistake to overvalue such labels as
“democracy,” since the essential character of the regimes they
describe is unaffected by the terms being used. Indeed, in De
Cive he goes so far as to imply that the words associated with
democracy and monarchy are more or less interchangeable: as
he puts it, in a monarchy “(though it may seem a paradox) the
King is the people.”34 His point is that the more usual democratic claim that “the people is king” is essentially empty—the
word that comes ﬁrst does not matter; what matters is that the
underlying political reality remains unaltered. In this sense,
Hobbes is showing that words like “conscience” and “democracy” are just colour. But he is also showing how that colour
can be used to conceal certain basic political truths, if the word
is taken to be the substance of the practice of which it is merely
a gloss. This can be understood as paradiastole, but not in the
sense that Hobbes is practising rhetorical redescription; rather,
he is exposing it, and thereby seeking to render it redundant.35
Hobbes is trying to prevent colourful political language from
being used to mask political reality. He does so by showing
that a mask is all that it is.
Here, then, is the point at which the business of colouring
links to the hypocritical practice of cloaking. And this is what
Hobbes was trying to expose in Behemoth. If the moral arbitrariness of the state of nature produces the need for sovereign
power, then the need for that power is the one thing that no
one should try to hide behind the colourful language of vice
and virtue. For the one thing that colour terms might mask is
the fact of moral arbitrariness itself, i.e., the fact that there are
no virtues and vices, except on the say-so of the sovereign.
It was colouring of this kind that generated the political

33

CHAPTER ONE

hypocrisy of the 1640s as Hobbes saw it. Throughout Behemoth
he uses the term “colour” to describe the attempts by the
parliamentarians to justify their disobedience to the king. To
seek to colour the king’s actions as unjust or cruel was hypocritical because it deliberately sought to hide the fact that without the king, there would be no such thing as injustice or
cruelty, because the words would lack meaning. Another way
to put this is to say that for Hobbes there is only one certain
virtue in a morally arbitrary world, that of seeking peace,
which means obeying the law. And there is only one vice,
which is to deny that justice means obeying the law. Therefore, there is only one kind of hypocrisy that matters—
concealing the vice of sedition behind the language of
godliness, piety, and other supposed virtues. Hobbes is not
objecting to people who try to pass off political disobedience
as political obedience, since in Hobbes’s terms you cannot really fake political obedience—the outward show is the essence
of the act. Instead, he is objecting to those who seek to pass off
political disobedience as obedience to a set of higher values
than mere politics, given that without mere politics obedience
has no lasting value at all.
Hobbes believed that in the period leading up to civil war,
the vice of disobedience was concealed behind the mask of patriotism as well that of piety: this was a time, as he puts it at the
beginning of Behemoth, when “disobedient persons [were]
considered the best patriots.”36 Patriotism, in this sense, is just
another colour term for Hobbes, one that can be used by hypocrites to hide the truth about politics. But the climate that successfully sustained its hold on the public imagination was one
of collective self-deception—“the people,” Hobbes goes on to
insist, “were corrupted generally.”37 The evidence for the
strength of the delusion is that so many of them were willing
to ﬁght and die on the parliamentary side for the cause of cod
patriotism: they did not run away when they realised that they
had been duped by ﬁne words. Yet Hobbes remained con-

34

THE MASK OF POWER

vinced that there was a core of hypocrisy at the heart of the
madness. It is one of the themes of Behemoth that hypocrisy
and self-deception can feed off each other, so that the same individuals who use language to gloss reality can lose sight of
the fact that the language is just a gloss. Nevertheless, some of
those ultimately responsible for the war understood exactly
what they were doing—they knew it was vice they were trying to conceal, which is why they were at such pains to conceal
it. The best evidence for this is that before the war began they
played the game of rhetorical redescription for all it was
worth; but after the conﬂict came out in the open, they dropped
the pretence that they were ignorant of the basic rules of politics. Some of them became the pure politicians they had been,
but had been pretending not to be, all along.
Thus once Parliament was in a position to set its own arbitrary terms to the king, then it was done, as Hobbes himself
says, with “plain-dealing and without hypocrisy.”38 Things
were called by their proper names: power was power, and obedience, obedience. Parliament told the king what they wanted,
and they expected him to obey. The king was informed that
“treason cannot be committed against his person, otherwise
than as he is entrusted with the kingdom and discharges that
trust; and that they [Parliament] have a power to judge whether
he shall have discharged this trust or not”; moreover, “they
[Parliament] may dispose of the king when they will.”39 In the
end, when the king refused to comply, they did indeed dispose of him (though the Presbyterians, being the ultimate
hypocrites, opposed the execution; it was Cromwell who had
to carry it through, which is something that I will pick up
on in the chapters that follow, where I consider various responses to the vexed question of Cromwell’s own hypocrisy).
By killing the king the parliamentarians reaped the consequences of their hypocrisy and self-deception. But at the
point when they did so, they ceased to be either hypocrites or
self-deceived.

35

CHAPTER ONE

Hypocrites and persons
I want to consider now the question of how this conception of
political hypocrisy relates to the wider argument I have only
touched on to this point: the account Hobbes gives in Leviathan
of the character and purposes of sovereign power. Overall,
what Hobbes says in Leviathan about hypocrisy and sincerity
is broadly consistent with the themes I have drawn on already.
He makes clear that it is not the business of the commonwealth to reconcile the public statements of belief made by individuals with their private convictions; when it comes to this
form of concealment, all a sovereign need concern himself with
is outward conformity to the law. As Hobbes says in his discussion of excommunication in chapter 42 of Leviathan: “A
true and unfeigned Christian is not liable to Excommunication:
Nor he also that is a professed Christian, till his Hypocrisy appear in his manners; that is, till his behaviour bee contrary to
the law of his Soveraign.”40 Professing religion without believing is characterised here as hypocrisy; but Hobbes’s whole
point is that it is nonetheless harmless on this account, and of
no account, unless it leads to political dissent. Nowhere could
it be clearer that Hobbes does not think anything can be
decided simply by calling something hypocrisy—everything
depends on what sort of hypocrisy it is. Hobbes was particularly keen to press this point in Leviathan because the book
was published at a time when England was subject to the
government of the new parliamentary regime, and Hobbes
was adamant that politics should continue to take priority
over religion on all doctrinal and ecclesiastical questions. As
various commentators have pointed out, this strict Erastianism was a large part of what Hobbes wanted to convey in
Leviathan (indeed, it was one of the reasons he wrote the
book rather than simply producing an English translation
of De Cive): regime change gave him an opportunity to emphasise that state religion in England did not mean Anglican36

THE MASK OF POWER

ism, but instead whatever the state determined it to be.41 All
that loyal subjects, even convinced Anglicans, had to do was
obey.
The determination of the new regime to impose its will on
questions of religion—and the fact, as Hobbes welcomed at
the time, that they appeared to favour a policy of Independency, or toleration—meant that the earlier hypocrisy of some of
its leading lights also ceased to matter. They were sovereign
now, and what counted was simply that they had a will to impose. But in Leviathan, Hobbes reiterated the point that as
sovereign their sincerity still mattered. Sovereigns ought to
seek peace sincerely, and also to advertise their sincerity, particularly in matters of religion. This did not mean that they
should let people know what they really believed. Rather, it
meant that they should make it plain that they were sincere
about the relationship between religious conformity and
peace. “Power,” Hobbes states towards the end of Leviathan,
“is preserved by the same virtues by which it is acquired; that
is to say, by Wisdome, Humility, Clearnesse of Doctrine, and
sincerity of Conversation; and not by suppression of the Naturall Sciences, and of the Morality of Natural Reason; nor by
obscure Language; nor by Arrogating to themselves more
Knowledge than they make appear; nor by Pious Frauds, nor
by such other faults, as in the Pastors of Gods Church are not
only Faults, but scandals.”42 Moreover, among the pastors of
God’s Church who stray into politics, these things are not only
scandals; they are also the worst kind of hypocrisy, because, as
Hobbes says, “none should know this better than they.”43
But if pious frauds in politics are hypocrisy, it is because of
the piety, not because of the fraud. Hobbes has no problem in
Leviathan, any more than elsewhere in his work, with political
fraud per se. Sovereigns must be prepared to dissemble, cheat,
and lie if necessary, in order to do what they think best for
their own security, and the security of their state. They may
even lie about religion—Hobbes admired “the First Founders,
and Legislators of commonwealths amongst the Gentiles,”
37

CHAPTER ONE

who pretended that their authority came from God, and who
made sure “that the same things were displeasing to the Gods,
which were forbidden by the laws.”44 This was sincerely done,
because it was in the cause of “keeping the people in obedience, and peace.”45 What was intolerable was to dress up any
deceptions in the language of some higher virtue—some
“piety”—that muddied the necessary connection between the
prerogatives of the sovereign and natural justice. In other
words, the only intolerable hypocrisy for Hobbes is hypocrisy
about the basic principles of political life itself.
What Hobbes has to say about the imperatives of sincerity
in Leviathan is therefore quite consistent with the more general
themes of deception and dissimulation that run not just
through that work but throughout Hobbes’s life.46 Hobbes
never doubted that in politics, it may be necessary to conceal
the truth—he was, in this respect, a lifelong student of Tacitus.47 He knew perfectly well that no one should ever expect to
be entirely open, least of all the sovereign. But there is one further point to add. In Leviathan, Hobbes includes a chapter
which has no equivalent in De Cive, on the role of representation in politics. The chapter is called “Of PERSONS, AUTHORS, and things Personated,” and in it Hobbes connects the
idea of representation, through the language of “personation,”
to the theatrical practice of wearing a mask. As he puts it, “Persona in latine signiﬁes the disguise, or outward appearance of
a man, counterfeited on the Stage; and sometimes more particularly that part of it, which disguiseth the face, as a Mask or
Vizard.”48
Representation is the extension of this practice into the world
of politics. The sovereign representative, in personating the
commonwealth, puts on a kind of mask: this is the mask of
power. After all, to be sovereign is inevitably to engage in a kind
of disguise: it is a wholly artiﬁcial performance, in which human beings play the part of “mortall gods” while retaining
their underlying natural capacities. To be sovereign is to be no
different than the rest of us, yet to be utterly different, because
38

THE MASK OF POWER

of the power sovereigns wield. This remains one of the central
insights of modern politics, and the steady advance of democracy has done nothing to diminish its signiﬁcance. To rule in a
modern state is by deﬁnition to play a kind of double role—that
of the everyman who is also the only person with real power.
Throughout Leviathan, Hobbes is at pains to spell out how
important it is to sustain this performance, and not to collapse it. Sovereigns must preserve the appearance of power—
“Reputation of power,” as Hobbes says, “is Power”—yet must
keep their private identities separate, and must behave in a way
that is in keeping with the ofﬁce they hold.49 But because all
personality—whether natural or artiﬁcial—is a mask for
Hobbes, everyone else has a part to play in the life of the state as
well. Being possessed of “natural” personality in Hobbes’s
terms does not mean being genuinely or truly oneself, as we
might understand the idea today. It simply means that individuals are personally responsible for whatever they say and do—
i.e., that responsibility attaches to people “naturally” rather
than “artiﬁcially”—which is why it is so important that each individual should construct a persona that can survive anything
the world might throw at it. Therefore, natural persons must
also put on the appearance that best suits their role as subjects—
individual subjects have an obligation, not to be themselves, but
to be a civilly sustainable version of themselves. Politics, as laid
out by Hobbes in Leviathan, is one giant act.
So we have two terms—person and hypocrite—both of which
have their roots in the theatre, and both of which denote a
kind of mask-wearing. But one is essential to political life, and
the other is fatal for it. How should we distinguish them? The
answer, I think, comes from one further deﬁnition of hypocrisy
Hobbes offers in Leviathan, this time drawn from the Bible. In
chapter 44, when attacking those who peddle “daemonology”
and other superstitions to scare the public, he refers to them as
“such as speak lies in Hypocrisie (or as it is in the originall, 1
Timothy 4.1, 2. of those that play the part of lyars) with a seared conscience, that is, contrary to their own knowledge.”50 To be a
39

CHAPTER ONE

hypocrite, then, is to act against your own knowledge, but it is
also to play the part of a liar. In some ways, this is an unfortunate formulation, and can’t be exactly what Hobbes means, because he is not talking about people pretending to be liars (this
is by no means impossible—honest people may sometimes
need to pretend to be dishonest in order to get their way—but
this sort of double bluff is not at all what Hobbes has in mind
here).51 Instead, he means people who play lying parts, or play
their parts as liars. Perhaps the most accurate, if also the ugliest, way to put it is that Hobbes is talking about people who
play their parts lyingly. After all, one can play a part honestly,
or play it falsely. An honest performance is one that is in keeping with the knowledge that lies behind it, including the
knowledge that it is a performance, and the rules that govern
that performance. To play a part as a liar is to act in a way that
makes a mockery of the performance itself.
Hobbes wanted sovereigns and subjects to play their parts
truthfully. This did not mean that he thought they should always, or even often, tell the truth about themselves. Sovereigns might lie, deceive, and dissemble, which was entirely as
it should be, so long as it was done in the proper spirit, that is,
in the pursuit of peace. Equally, loyal subjects should be willing to conceal the truth about themselves in their public professions of faith if to do otherwise would be to undermine the
foundations of civil order. It is not hypocrisy to pretend to be
something one is not; indeed, in certain circumstances, that is
the deﬁnition of loyalty. You do not have to believe in what the
sovereign requires you to do; you just have to mean it when
you do it—that is, say it as though you mean it—which is different. Of course, it is easier to say something as though you
mean it if you also happen to believe in what you are saying,
and it seems likely that Hobbes hoped that the gap between
these two positions would close over time. In a state successfully organised on Hobbesian principles, subjects ought to
become progressively freer to speak the truth as they see it, as
sovereigns are able to rely more and more on their subjects’
40

THE MASK OF POWER

innate understanding of the principles of obedience.52 But the
attainment of that level of understanding, Hobbes knew,
would take time. In the interim, everyone is liable to face some
choices between what they believe and what they are required
to do. The beginning of political wisdom, for Hobbes, was to
see that this was no choice at all.

Hobbes, hypocrisy, and modern politics
Let me turn, ﬁnally, to the issue I raised in the introduction—
the question of whether a thinker like Hobbes has anything to
teach us about the nature of political hypocrisy today. There is
no question from the account I have given here that Hobbes
was essentially an anti-hypocrite—that is, when he talks explicitly about hypocrisy in his writings, and calls it by name, it
is invariably to condemn it. Ruth Grant is therefore correct
when she suggests that Hobbes was both unwilling and unable to embrace political hypocrisy in the manner of a thinker
like, say, Machiavelli. But this does not mean that he was unaware of or unable to deal with the inevitable hypocrisies of a
political existence—Grant is entirely wrong about that. Rather,
Hobbes knew just how important it was to distinguish between different kinds of hypocrisy, to be relatively sparing in
how one used the term, and to tolerate all sorts of behaviour
that would count as hypocritical on a conventional understanding of it. Hobbes was at pains not to set the bar for sincerity too high, which would let in the most corrosive forms of
hypocrisy through the back door. But he also believed that
some forms of hypocrisy, unchecked, would render political
life impossible. He therefore offers a model for how to deal
with the problem of hypocrisy in modern politics (what one
might call the “Shklar” problem): what is needed is to tread
carefully, to avoid lumping all hypocrisies together, and to
decide which are the ones that are worth worrying about.
Hobbes does not deny the role that hypocrisy can play in
41

CHAPTER ONE

generating political conﬂict, and he is not immune to its capacity to stir up irrational antipathies. But his work as a whole is
an attempt to put hypocrisy, and its attendant emotions, in
their proper place.
Yet it does not follow from this that Hobbes provides a way
of thinking about hypocrisy than can translate straightforwardly into the politics of today. Two factors in particular
serve to render the gap between Hobbes’s politics and our
own very difﬁcult to bridge. First, though religion is an important factor in contemporary politics, it lacks the absolute centrality it possessed in Hobbes’s time. One sign of this is that
we don’t tend to think of political hypocrisy primarily in religious terms, so that Hobbes’s attempt to rescue the language
of hypocrisy from an unthinking identiﬁcation with religious
insincerity makes little sense now. We do not need that rescue
act. We tend unthinkingly to associate hypocrisy with the
double standards of people who do not practice what they
preach, and Hobbes is not going to rescue us from that, because it was not his primary concern. Second, Hobbes’s views
about the one sort of hypocrisy that he believed was worth
worrying about derive from his insistence on the supreme
virtue of political obedience. This does not sit well with the
liberal democratic presupposition in favour of contestation
and dissent. It would be hard to make a convincing case now
for seeing the exercise of private judgment as the ultimate
vice. For most people, ﬁnding a public space for conﬂicting
private judgments to be heard constitutes the essence of the
liberal way of life. This is one reason why few contemporary
liberal political thinkers have much time for Hobbes.
Nevertheless, Hobbes’s views on hypocrisy may still have
something to teach us. Hobbes’s political thought rests on an
assumption of human equality, which continues to underlie
most forms of modern politics, including our own. Sovereigns
must base their power on what they have in common with
their subjects, and they cannot rely on external sources of authority, divine or otherwise, to tell them what to do. At the
42

THE MASK OF POWER

same time, the fact of their power serves to separate them out
entirely from their subjects, and make them very different
sorts of persons from the people they rule. For Hobbes, the
starkest reminder of this difference is that sovereigns should
act according to their own conscience, while their subjects
should simply abandon the idea that they have a conscience of
their own. We have moved a long way from this position. But
what we have not moved away from is the fact that any politics
founded on the idea of equality will produce politicians who
have to be of a type with the people they rule, and yet recognisably different, given the fact that they also have to rule
them. All political leaders in these circumstances will need to
put on the appropriate mask that allows them to sustain this
tricky double act. They need to be familiar enough so that we
let them rule us, but no so familiar that we cease to regard
what they do as rule.
In these circumstances, Hobbes believed it was absurd to
ﬁxate on hypocrisy, since all politics will be a kind of act. But
what it did make sense to worry about were the kinds of double standards that might render the entire performance of selfjustifying political power unsustainable. In his terms, that
meant in particular sovereigns who downplayed the value
of their own sincerity, or subjects who overplayed the value of
theirs. But his terms are not our terms. We do not think that we
should put all our trust in the sincerity of our political rulers,
because we believe that the judgments of subjects have value
in their own right. We are liberal democrats, and Hobbes was
not. As a result, we should have our own worries about the
sort of hypocrisy that might render our preferred form of politics unsustainable. Sincerity and hypocrisy have no inherent
value in their own terms; they only have value in so far as they
suit the form of politics that they are required to sustain. In
our politics, hypocrisy abounds, whereas sincerity is in short
supply. One possible response to this is to argue for more sincerity, in order to make politics and politicians trustworthy
again. But if our politics is hypocritical in its very nature, then
43

CHAPTER ONE

calls for more sincerity are themselves hypocritical, and may
threaten the entire charade that we, as liberal democrats, are
committed to uphold. This will be a theme of the chapters that
follow, and I will return to it in the ﬁnal chapter, when I consider what value, if any, it makes sense to put on the sincerity
of democratic politicians today. If there is an enduring lesson
from Hobbes on hypocrisy, it is this: it does not matter
whether or not our politicians are all wearing masks, if that is
what is needed to make our form of politics work. What does
matter is if people are hypocritical about that.

44

]

]

2

MANDEVILLE AND THE VIRTUES OF VICE

Faking virtue

In the history of early modern political thought, three men in
particular were thought by their scandalised reading publics
to be devils, or as Hobbes might put it, to be playing the devil’s part. They were Machiavelli, Hobbes himself, and the author whose literal-minded contemporaries were put on notice
of his diabolical intentions just by his name, Bernard Mandeville (1670–1733)—the “Man-devil” as he came to be known.
Mandeville’s The Fable of the Bees (ﬁrst published in 1714, but
only really noticed after a second edition in 1723, at which
point it became a major scandal) was for much of the eighteenth century the most notoriously wicked book of them all,
wickeder than Leviathan, wickeder even than The Prince. As
John Wesley wrote in his journal in 1756: “Till now I imagined
there had never appeared in the world such a book as the
works of Machiavel. But de Mandevil goes far beyond it.”1
What connected these writers in the public mind, and gave
them their diabolical reputations, was speciﬁcally their attitude to hypocrisy, and their apparent willingness to sanction
the dissimulation of godless vice behind a mask of pious
virtue. Yet when one looks at what they actually had to say
about hypocrisy in their writings, rather than simply at their

45

CHAPTER TWO

reputations, then the connection between them is much harder
to discern.
Machiavelli was not particularly bothered about hypocrisy.
It did not feature as a separate category of deception in his
writings—dissimulation is an essential part of the armoury of
the prince, but it does not acquire a particular moral character
simply by being dissimulation; its moral character depends
entirely on whether or not it is successfully achieved. Hobbes,
as we have seen, did believe that hypocrisy retained its own
distinctive character—it was still “double iniquity”—which is
why he was at such pains to limit the social practices to which
the term could reasonably be applied. Only Mandeville can be
said to have actively celebrated certain forms of hypocrisy in
his work, using the term itself in relation to social practices
of which he clearly approved. That is what made him an especially monstrous ﬁgure for his outraged critics. But it also
makes him a rather implausible candidate for playing the devil’s part, since the devil would never have been so open about
what he was up to. Hypocrisy depends for its deleterious effects on its remaining unexposed. Mandeville’s name should
really have been a clue—the devil would hardly have chosen
someone with whom he shared a name to do his dirty work.
Playing the devil’s part means providing the devil with a
name to hide behind, which is why Machiavelli—Old Nick—
has always been a much more plausible candidate for that role.
In truth, there is not much that unites Machiavelli with
Hobbes and Mandeville, beyond their obvious capacity to
shock readers on the lookout for shocks of a particular kind.
Neither Hobbes nor Mandeville were Machiavellians in any
meaningful sense. But if one leaves Machiavelli out of it, along
with the devil, there is a great deal that unites Mandeville
with Hobbes. Mandeville, who was born in Holland in 1670
and trained there as a doctor before moving to settle in London in the mid-1690s, was unquestionably a Hobbesian, both
as part of his Dutch heritage (Hobbes’s inﬂuence in the Dutch

46

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

Republic was extensive at the time of Mandeville’s intellectual
formation) and on his own account. Many other writers than
Hobbes went into making up Mandeville’s distinctive worldview (including the great French student of courtly hypocrisy,
La Rochefoucauld, along with various medical writers, Dutch
humanists, and assorted fabulists stretching back to Aesop).
Nonetheless, Hobbes’s inﬂuence was as great as any of them.
What Mandeville shares with Hobbes are his scepticism, his
egoism, his absolute insistence on sovereignty as the basis for
all forms of political association (“no form of government can
subsist without an arbitrary sovereignty,” Mandeville wrote in
1720, though it might as well have been Hobbes talking), and
his recognition of the essential theatricality of the modern
forms of social existence.2 He also shares with Hobbes a distinctive approach to the problem of hypocrisy in politics,
notwithstanding the far wider role that the term itself plays in
Mandeville’s thought. Though Mandeville appears at various
points to be celebrating hypocrisy in his writings, he is also, at
many others, deeply censorious about it. In fact, his attitude to
hypocrisy is split, between a recognition of its frequently beneﬁcial social effects, and a desire to circumscribe the potentially baneful consequences if hypocrisy is allowed to run
uncontrolled through the sphere of politics. In this, he echoes
Hobbes as well.
Where Mandeville goes beyond Hobbes is in the sharpness
of the distinction he draws between the ubiquitous social practice of hypocrisy, and hypocrisy about that practice; that is, between hypocrisy and hypocrisy about hypocrisy itself. In what
follows I will characterise this as the difference between ﬁrstorder and second-order hypocrisy, though that is not exactly
how Mandeville would put it (one of the joys of Mandeville’s
prose is that he avoids technical language wherever possible).
Nevertheless, I believe a distinction of this kind plays a crucial
role in Mandeville’s thought, and it raises important political
questions whose signiﬁcance we can still recognise, despite

47

CHAPTER TWO

the essential unfamiliarity of the terms of the moral argument
from which they emerge. In particular, it raises questions
about the hypocrisy of politicians, and whether we should
think of it as being, and whether we should want it to be, of
the ﬁrst-order or the second-order kind. To make sense of
these questions, it is necessary to begin by saying something
about Mandeville’s moral philosophy, in order to explain how
the distinction between ﬁrst- and second-order hypocrisy
arises in the ﬁrst place.
Perhaps the best place to start is another point of overlap between Mandeville and Hobbes: their shared recognition of the
role that vanity plays in human affairs, and its capacity to
trump reason unless properly handled. As Mandeville puts it
in The Fable of the Bees: “If Reason in Man was of equal weight
with his Pride, he would never be pleas’d with Praises, which
he is conscious he don’t deserve.”3 Where Mandeville and
Hobbes differ is in the inference they draw from this fact. For
Hobbes, it was essential to control the catastrophic political effects of untrammelled pride by making sure that vain-glorious
behaviour (that is, actions that respond to the pull of ﬂattery despite one’s knowledge of one’s own shortcomings) didn’t spill
over into self-deception (the point at which knowledge of one’s
own shortcomings disappears). The means to achieve this was
provided by the institution of a sovereign power designed to
remind subjects of their very real limitations as political agents,
and certainly not to ﬂatter them. Mandeville, by contrast, saw
clearly the social and political uses of pride, and of ﬂattery. He
was less worried than Hobbes about the need to hold the line
between self-conceit and self-deceit. Instead, he believed that
the job of a skilful politician involved playing on every individual’s desire for praise, however ill-deserved, in order to ensure that human vanity was put to socially beneﬁcial uses.
The social beneﬁts of the political manipulation of human
vanity were summarised by Mandeville in a famous aphorism: “The moral virtues are the political offspring which

48

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

ﬂattery begot upon pride.”4 In other words, people can be encouraged to behave selﬂessly if their self-interested desire for
praise is harnessed in the cause of suppressing their other desires. But Mandeville was adamant that this should never be
understood as virtue in its true sense, because true virtue required the conquest of the selﬁsh passions, not merely the
suppression of one selﬁsh passion in the service of a more
powerful one. “Passions may do good by chance,” Mandeville
wrote, “but there can be no merit but in the conquest of
them.”5 Nevertheless, the good that the passions may do included the simulation of genuine virtue, under the guise of a
praiseworthy selﬂessness. In order that social behaviour
should match the outward standards of virtue, “a Man need
not conquer his passions, it is sufﬁcient that he conceals them.
Virtue bids us subdue, but good breeding only requires that
we should hide, our Appetites.”6
So Mandeville, unlike Hobbes, relied heavily on a distinction between genuine virtue and the socially useful faking of
virtue. For Hobbes, as we have seen, it is effectively impossible
to fake the only really useful virtue—that of obedience—since
it is only really useful so long as you are actually obeying, and
actual obedience is something you cannot fake. But Mandeville did not highlight the social uses of fake virtue in order to
distinguish himself from Hobbes. Rather it was to attack those
contemporary writers whom he believed had failed to understand the socially disastrous consequences of genuine virtue.
The truth about real virtue was that it was very hard to
achieve, since it represented a signiﬁcant constraint on human
behaviour—the conquest of the passions. For that reason, any
widespread achievement of real virtue would be catastrophic
for a commercial society that depended upon the passions—
and in particular greed, pride, and avarice—to keeps its economy thriving. This was the original message of the poem “The
Grumbling Hive” (1705), which provides the basis for The
Fable of the Bees: that true virtue was the enemy of national

49

CHAPTER TWO

prosperity. Mandeville spells it out at the end of the poem,
where he offers this “moral”:
Then leave Complaints: Fools only strive
To make a Great and honest Hive.
T’enjoy the World’s Conveniencies,
Be famed in War, yet live in Ease
Without great Vices, is a vain
Eutopia seated in the Brain.7

Mandeville’s particular target in “The Grumbling Hive”
was Fénelon (1651–1715), whose widely inﬂuential Telemachus
(1699) championed a return to properly virtuous (and austere)
social conduct as a means of economic renewal, which Mandeville saw as a contradiction in terms.8 If virtue were so obviously socially advantageous, it would be easy to be virtuous,
and therefore the virtue could hardly be genuine; if it were
genuine (and therefore genuinely self-denying), its social disadvantages would far outweigh its beneﬁts. But, crucially for
Mandeville, persuading people to fake virtue was relatively
easy, because it was consistent with their own selﬁsh interests.
Pretending to be virtuous was a way of getting ahead, and it
relied on just the same principles of envy and competitiveness
that made commercial societies tick. These societies would
therefore thrive so long as they could content themselves with
vices merely dressed up to look like virtues. Hence the famous
Mandeville thesis: private vices, public beneﬁts.
Mandeville did not believe that it had always been easy to
persuade people to dress up their vices in this way. In the earliest human societies, it had been necessary to rely heavily on
strict codes of honour to condition human behaviour—
individuals had to be ﬂattered into making substantial sacriﬁces, particularly on the battleﬁeld, where they had to be
taught to fear dishonour more than death itself. But as societies evolved, so did their codes of honour, which became
more relaxed, less martial, and gradually developed into
something that the modern world had come to call “polite50

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

ness.” In polite societies, the faking of virtue did not simply
rest on fear, but on the other passions as well, including envy
and greed. Just as in martial societies people were taught to
conquer their fear of death by playing on their fear of dishonour, so in commercial societies people were taught to conquer
their greed for other people’s possessions by their greed for
praise. It is because of the rules of politeness as Mandeville
understands them that people will ﬁght each other to be the
one who takes the smallest piece of cake, or picks up the bill in
a restaurant.

First-order and second-order hypocrisy
The obvious question that follows is this: were the manners of
the most prosperous societies, therefore, to be understood
merely as a form of hypocrisy? Certainly, sincerity was ruled
out as a socially useful virtue in these circumstances, since
speaking one’s mind would undermine the element of pretence on which all politeness depends. “To be at once wellbred and sincere,” Mandeville wrote, “is no less than a
Contradiction.”9 Equally, he was clear that hypocrisy played
an important part in teaching people how to behave. For example, when discussing the pervasive social stigma attached
to appearing envious, which stands in such obvious contrast
to our true passions, which are envious through and through,
Mandeville suggests: “That we are so generally ashamed of
this vice, is owing to that strong Habit of Hypocrisy, by the
Help of which, we have learned from our Cradle, to hide even
from ourselves the vast Extent of Self-Love, and all its different
branches.”10 This is hypocrisy in a distinctive sense: it is not
simply the business of pretending to be virtuous, but the business of forgetting that it is just a pretence, which comes close
to a form of self-deception. Yet without some self-deception,
it is hard to see how society could function at all. Lust, Mandeville writes, untempered by “guile and hypocrisy,” would
51

CHAPTER TWO

reduce men to the level of beasts; so we turn lust into love, “a
product of Nature warp’d by Custom and Education, so the
true origin and ﬁrst motive of it . . . is stiﬂed in well-bred People, and almost conceal’d from themselves.”11 Here, hypocrisy
becomes the price we have to pay for going through with the
performance of publicly acceptable behaviour. As Mandeville
puts it in his essay “A Search into the Nature of Society,”
which he appended to the 1723 edition of the Fable: “It is impossible that Man, mere Fallen Man . . . should be sociable
creatures without Hypocrisy.”12
Nevertheless, as many commentators have noted, and as
Mandeville himself made clear in “A Search into the Nature
of Society,” hypocrisy was also something that he wished to
condemn. His particular targets here were Shaftesbury
(1671–1713) and those other early-eighteenth-century moralists who professed to believe that men were naturally sociable,
and that displays of their sociability were also displays of their
inherent virtue. These writers claimed that it was possible to
be virtuous by being true to oneself, as opposed to the
Mandeville view, which held that virtue was a form of denial
of one’s true nature as a passionate being. “The imaginary Notions that Men may be virtuous without Self-denial,” Mandeville explained, “are a vast inlet to Hypocrisy, which being
once made habitual, we must not only deceive others, but likewise become altogether unknown to ourselves.”13 He makes
the point even more explicitly in the second volume of The Fable of the Bees, which he published in 1729 in response to critics
of the earlier volume: “In the Opinion of Virtue’s requiring
Self-denial, there is greater Certainty, and Hypocrites have
less Latitude than in the contrary system.”14 Here, hypocrisy
is clearly understood as something to be avoided, as is the
self-deception it brings in its wake. It was to free people from
the hypocritical doctrines of the likes of Shaftesbury that
Mandeville is now insisting that he wrote the Fable.
How are we to make sense of the difference between these
two types of hypocrisy, one of which appears to be an un52

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

avoidable feature of prosperous human societies, and the
other an intolerable menace to them? The answer is, in the
end, a political one, and not just because it is clear that
Mandeville, like Hobbes before him and Hume after him, disliked the hypocrisy of his political opponents (though it is certainly clear that he did). It is also political because it relates to
the difference between those whose role it was to police polite
societies (the “politicians”) and those whose role it was simply
to inhabit them. What Mandeville is attacking is the hypocrisy
of the people who ought to know better, because their job was
to keep on top of the hypocrisy that regulates our social existence. Instead, writers like Shaftesbury (who, as Mandeville
pointed out, was noticeably reluctant to take up public ofﬁce)
were abdicating that responsibility.15 There were two possible
explanations for this: either the moralists truly believed the
doctrines they preached, in which case self-deception had
spread to the ranks of those who job it was to manage it, or
they didn’t really believe it, in which case they were simply
concealing the indulgence of their own passions (in Shaftesbury’s case, what Mandeville calls “an Indolent Temper, and
unactive Spirit”), in precisely the manner that their own doctrines sought to deny.16 Either way, the resultant hypocrisy
was intolerable because it was unconﬁned, and the selfdeception to which it led was so dangerous because it was so
complete—we become, in Mandeville’s words, not “almost
conceal’d from,” but “altogether unknown to” ourselves. If the
politicians had succumbed to the thing they were meant to be
controlling, then we were all lost.
To move beyond the immediate terms of his dispute with
Shaftesbury, one might say that what Mandeville is drawing
here is a distinction between ﬁrst-order and second-order
hypocrisy. First-order hypocrisy is the ubiquitous practice of
concealing vice as virtue, which makes up the parade of our
social existence. Second-order hypocrisy is concealing the
truth about this practice, and pretending that the parade itself
is a form of genuinely virtuous, and therefore self-denying,
53

CHAPTER TWO

behaviour. We may need to hide the truth about ourselves in
order to get by in this world, but we oughtn’t to hide the truth
from ourselves that this is what we are doing.
But can this distinction be made to stick? The problem is
that ﬁrst-order hypocrisy appears to involve an element of
self-deception, as Mandeville makes clear—that is, hypocritical social practices have bite because people come to forget
that they are being hypocritical, that their love is in fact concealed lust, and so on—which means ﬁrst-order hypocrisy
leaks into second-order, because thoroughly self-deceived
people will believe they really are being virtuous. Likewise,
second-order hypocrisy—the moralising of the likes of
Shaftesbury—is a social practice in its own right, and therefore
contains elements of ﬁrst-order hypocrisy as well (hence
Mandeville’s suspicion that Shaftesbury’s doctrine of sociability was itself just an act). The simplest way to put this difﬁculty
is to say that while it may be possible to draw a conceptual distinction between ﬁrst-order and second-order hypocrisy, it is
much harder to say who are the ﬁrst-order and who are the
second-order hypocrites.
One possible way round this difﬁculty is to equate these
different orders of hypocrites with the different social orders,
or classes. Some commentators have argued that Mandeville is
in fact offering a class-based account of hypocrisy—that he is
seeking to educate the propertied classes about the true nature
of their own supposed virtues, so that they should not hypocritically seek to impose them on the uneducated, thereby rendering the labouring and servant classes unﬁt for the hard
work on which the better-off depend.17 This is most apparent
in the piece of writing that most scandalised Mandeville’s
contemporaries—his “Essay on Charity and Charity-Schools,”
which sought to expose the second-order hypocrisy of the dogooders who aimed to educate the poor in the path of true
virtue, while ignoring the fact that true virtue was the last
thing that the poor needed, or that their educators were capable of supplying. However, this does not help to ﬁx the dis54

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

tinction between ﬁrst- and second-order hypocrisy, because
Mandeville was not arguing that the poor should be educated
in the ways of ﬁrst-order hypocrisy (or “politeness”). Rather,
he wanted them kept in ignorance of all but the basic struggle
for existence—as he says at the end of The Fable of the Bees, “the
Poor should be kept strictly to Work . . . I have named Ignorance as a necessary Ingredient in the Mixture of Society”—so
that they should be willing to serve their masters.18 The people who needed educating were the do-gooders, whose failure
to recognise that their own “charitableness” was merely a
“vogue” threatened to expose the whole charade of public
virtue, by allowing hypocrisy to leak through the entire system. “A servant can have no unfeigned Respect for his Master,” Mandeville wrote, “as soon as he has sense enough to
ﬁnd out that he serves a Fool.”19 What was needed were not
servants who feigned respect, but masters who were not fools,
and understood the limits of their own hypocrisy. The masters
needed to be ﬁrst-order, not second-order hypocrites.
So what we have here is a distinction between the class of
persons among whom the different orders of hypocrisy are an
issue—those people whom Mandeville tends to classify under
the category of “Gentlemen”—and those for whom hypocrisy
should be no issue at all—the “Vulgar,” as Mandeville calls
them. Gentlemen ought to play the game properly; if they do,
the Vulgar ought to be gulled by it. But this doesn’t answer the
question of how gentlemen are to play the game properly—
that is, how they are to be sure that their ﬁrst-order hypocrisy
is not second-order hypocrisy. “The well-bred Gentleman,”
Mandeville writes, “places his greatest Pride in the Skill he
has of covering it with Dexterity, and some are so expert at
concealing this Frailty, that when they are most guilty of it, the
Vulgar think them the most exempt from it.”20 This is the most
sophisticated version of the game—not merely concealing the
vice, but concealing one’s consciousness of the concealment,
only to make it more perfect. Is it possible to retain genuine
self-knowledge under these circumstances? Perhaps, but
55

CHAPTER TWO

Mandeville has also suggested that this sort of behaviour is a
habit, learned at the cradle, and carefully regulated and
shaped by skilful politicians, who must balance the need for
self-awareness with the requirement that their performance of
virtue be a convincing one. Moreover, the skilful politicians
will by deﬁnition (in this pre-democratic age) be drawn from
among the class of the well-bred gentlemen. They too have to
play the game, even as they are attempting to regulate it. So
the problem remains—how are we to draw the line between
the people who are in control of their hypocrisy and the people who are not? More to the point, are there any guarantees
that hypocritical politicians will be of the ﬁrst-order and not
the second-order kind?

Malicious versus fashionable hypocrisy
The best illustration of the difﬁculty of deciding what sort of
hypocrisy one should expect of politicians comes in one of the
books Mandeville wrote after The Fable had made him notorious throughout Europe. In An Enquiry into the Origins of Honour (1732), he offers a distinction between two different kinds
of hypocrite that cuts across his earlier accounts. The book
is a dialogue between two characters called Horatio and
Cleomenes (it is Cleomenes who plays Mandeville’s part in
these exchanges21):
Cleomenes: There are two sorts of Hypocrites, that differ
very much from one another. To distinguish them by
Names, the one I would call the Malicious, and the Other
the Fashionable. By Malicious Hypocrites, I mean such as
pretend to a great deal of Religion, when they know their
Pretensions to be false; who take pains to appear Pious and
Devout, in order to be Villains, and in Hopes that they will
be trusted to get an Opportunity of deceiving those, who
believe them to be Sincere. Fashionable Hypocrites I call
56

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

those who, without any Motive of Religion, or Sense of
Duty, go to Church, in Imitation of their Neighbours; counterfeit Devotion, and without any Design upon others, comply occasionally with all the Rites and Ceremonies of
Publick Worship, from no other Principle than Aversion to
Singularity, and a Desire of being in the Fashion. The First
are, as you say, the Worst of them; but the other are rather
beneﬁcial to society, and can only be injurious to themselves.
Horatio: Your distinction is very just, if these latter deserve
to be called Hypocrites at all.
Cleomenes: To make a Shew outwardly of what is not felt
within, and counterfeit what is not real, is certainly
Hypocrisy, whether it does Good or Hurt.
Horatio: Then, strictly speaking, good Manners and Politeness must come under the same Denomination.22
How does this distinction between fashionable and malicious hypocrisy compare to the one I have been drawing between ﬁrst- and second-order hypocrisy? One might say that
fashionable hypocrisy, which on Mandeville’s account includes good manners and politeness, is a kind of ﬁrst-order
hypocrisy: it is the way we learn to behave in order to get by as
social animals. But what about malicious hypocrisy? In one
sense, it qualiﬁes as second-order hypocrisy, in that it is an exploitation of the ubiquity of ﬁrst-order hypocrisy in order to
conceal sinister motives. The malicious hypocrite doesn’t simply hide behind the mask of piety but behind the fact that such
masks are readily available, and easy to hide behind. But
Mandeville draws the distinction in terms not just of motive
but of self-awareness: the malicious hypocrite knows what he
is about—knows indeed that he is a hypocrite—whereas the
fashionable hypocrite acts without design. Once the distinction is put in terms of self-awareness, then it becomes much
harder to map it onto the division between ﬁrst-order and
second-order hypocrisy. Mandeville’s point in the Enquiry
57

CHAPTER TWO

appears to be the conventional one that the worst sort of hypocrite is the person who is entirely aware of what he is doing:
his wickedness lies in his self-possession. But if he knows
what he is doing, then there is little danger that he will mistake what he is doing for genuine virtue. This danger is far
greater for fashionable hypocrites than malicious ones.
The danger that fashionable hypocrisy will slip over into
self-deception raises an important set of political questions.
Do we really want to be governed or “policed” by individuals
who lack the guile of the seasoned politician, and so are capable of being self-deceived? Would it not be better if our politicians were fully conscious of what they are doing, rather than
simply being slaves to the fashions that they are endeavouring
to regulate? But if they are fully conscious of what they are doing, does it not follow that their own hypocrisy, which is unavoidable in any social setting, will be of the malicious or
designing kind? Mandeville says that malicious hypocrites are
the ones who deliberately set out to injure others, whereas
fashionable hypocrites can only be injurious to themselves.
But politicians are quite capable of injuring others without
meaning to, simply by dint of the way that they exercise, or
fail to exercise, their power. Moreover, politicians who ape the
fashions of the day, for the sake of a quiet life, might be said to
have abdicated their responsibility to do something more than
that (and it was precisely this—the abdication of political responsibility, the fashionably indolent sociability—that constituted the essence of Mandeville’s attack on Shaftesbury). Can
Mandeville therefore mean it when he suggests that malicious
hypocrites are the only ones we should be worrying about?
I don’t think he does mean it, and the fullest explanation of
why not comes in Mandeville’s lengthy discussion of the character of the politician who had become by the early eighteenth
century, as he was to remain for the best part of two hundred
years, a byword for the problem of hypocrisy in public life:
Oliver Cromwell. In his attitude to Cromwell’s perceived
hypocrisy, Mandeville stands, as in so much else, interestingly
58

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

placed somewhere between Hobbes and Rousseau. One of
the most striking features of the story Hobbes tells in Behemoth
regarding what he calls the “injustice, impudence and
hypocrisy” of the parliamentary side in the English Civil War
is that Cromwell gets off relatively lightly.23 Hobbes treats his
faults with much more circumspection than he does many of
the other actors in the saga. This is in part because Cromwell
arrived on the scene relatively late—he does not feature in
Hobbes’s account of the hypocrisy and scheming that preceded the war itself. But it is also because Cromwell was not
the sort of hypocrite Hobbes most minded about—Cromwell’s
sympathies lay with the Independents, not the Presbyterians,
which meant that there were limits to his piety about political
power.24 It does not follow from this that Hobbes much liked
or admired Cromwell’s character. He recognised that Cromwell
was ﬁckle, scheming, and sanctimonious—all the qualities that
led others to view him as the worst hypocrite of all. But for
Hobbes, what ultimately distinguished Cromwell was his
adaptability in the cause of political supremacy, which is somewhat different from mere political hypocrisy. Hobbes captures
the difference by arguing that Cromwell did not seek to colour
political power as something it was not, but rather took his
own colour from where the power lay: “He were nothing certain,” Hobbes writes, “but applying himself always to the faction which was strongest, and was of a colour like it.”25 In
other words, he was a kind of political chameleon, which is
not necessarily the same as being a hypocrite, at least not for
Hobbes.26 Chameleons, though they may be hiding from their
enemies, are nevertheless colouring, not cloaking, what lies
beneath, because what lies beneath is essentially neutral: just
their own skin, which, like everyone else, they are doing their
best to save.
For Rousseau, in stark contrast, what lay beneath the surface in Cromwell’s case was not neutral at all, but as bad as it
gets. As a moral creature, Rousseau saw him not as a chameleon
but as a corpse. In his ﬁrst Discourse, Rousseau uses Cromwell
59

CHAPTER TWO

to illustrate the anti-Rochefoucauldian claim that “to cover
one’s wickedness with the dangerous mantle of hypocrisy is
not to honour virtue, but to offend it by profaning its standards.”27 He goes on:
The vile and grovelling soul of the hypocrite is like a corpse,
without ﬁre, or warmth, or vitality left. I appeal to experience.
Great villains have been known to return into themselves, end
their lives wholesomely and die saved. But no one has ever
known a hypocrite becoming a good man; one might reasonably have tried to convert Cartouche [a legendary eighteenthcentury villain], never would a wise man have undertaken to
convert Cromwell.28

Rousseau returns to the theme in The Social Contract, where
he describes “the single self-seeker or hypocrite, such as a
Catiline or a Cromwell,” as “the scourge with which God punishes his children.”29 This is why a properly constituted state
is so essential. Political theorists who “make great game of all
the absurdities a clever rascal or insinuating speaker might get
the people of Paris or London to believe . . . do not know that
Cromwell would have been put to hard labour by the people of
Berne.”30
What is interesting about the position Mandeville stakes out
with regard to Cromwell is that it manages to foreshadow
something of Rousseau’s later censoriousness while echoing
much of Hobbes’s earlier ambivalence. Cromwell, he tells us
in the Enquiry, was “a vile, wicked Hypocrite, who, under the
cloak of Sanctity broke through all Human and Divine laws to
aggrandize himself.”31 In this sense, he exempliﬁes the malicious form of hypocrisy. But later in the book, Cleomenes
paints a more complex picture.
Cleomenes: The chief motive of all [Cromwell’s] actions was
Ambition, and what he wanted was immortal Fame. This
End he steadily pursued: All his Faculties were made subservient to it; and no Genius was ever more supple to his
60

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

Interest . . . In the most Treacherous Circumstance, to hasten the execution of his blackest Design, he could counterfeit enthusiasm and appear to be a Saint. But the most
enormous of his crimes proceeded from no more Principle,
than the best of his Achievements. In the Midst of his Villainies, he was a Slave to Business; and the most disinterested Patriot never watched over the Public Welfare, both at
Home and Abroad, with greater Care and Assiduity, or retrieved the fallen Credit of a Nation in less time than this
Usurper. But all for himself . . .
Horatio: I don’t wonder you dwell so long upon Cromwell,
for Nothing can be more serviceable to your system, than
his life and actions.
Cleomenes: Able Politicians consult the Honour of the Age,
and the Conjuncture they live in, and Cromwell made the
most of his.32
What this suggests is that in addition to being a malicious
hypocrite, Cromwell was a kind of fashionable hypocrite as
well. This is not the innocently fashionable hypocrisy of the
occasional churchgoer—there was nothing innocent about
Cromwell in Mandeville’s eyes. Nor was Cromwell keeping
up appearances out of an “aversion to singularity,” but rather
in order to achieve the singularity of unrivalled political
power. Nevertheless Cromwell was, in Mandeville’s own
words, “a slave to business,” forced to play the part of the disinterested patriot, and assiduous in his cultivation of the public welfare. In this respect, his hypocrisy was unquestionably
beneﬁcial to society, which according to Mandeville’s earlier
distinction is the mark of fashionable hypocrisy. Moreover,
along with the intention to deceive, Cromwell’s hypocrisy
contained an element, if not of self-deception, then at least of
selﬂessness, as he played his part to the full. Cromwell was
aware of what he was doing, but he was not fully in control of
the part he had to play. He was forced to adapt to what was
expected of him.
61

CHAPTER TWO

There is another sense too in which a politician like
Cromwell mixed malicious and fashionable hypocrisy. This
was in his readiness to consult the temper of his age. Being a
designing hypocrite, Cromwell knew that he had to play on
the passions of his audience. He was, Mandeville says, “a man
of admirable good sense, and thoroughly well acquainted
with human nature; he knew the force of Enthusiasm, and
made use of it accordingly.”33 But he also recognised the limits
of the ways in which it could be used. Horatio, second ﬁddle
in the dialogue, puts it best:
That his Pretences to Religion were no more than Hypocrisy, I
have allowed; but it does not appear, that he desired others to
be Hypocrites too: On the contrary, he took Pains, or at least
made use of all possible means, to promote Christianity among
his men, and to make them sincerely religious.34

It is important to understand what Mandeville is suggesting
here. He is not arguing that politicians should encourage their
followers to be sincerely virtuous. Rather, he means that the
successful politician will never require the public to play a role
they are incapable of sustaining. That demand would be
second-order hypocrisy, and it would make a mockery of the
business of political obedience: the entire performance would
collapse.
Mandeville’s central point, indeed his primary polemical
purpose in writing about Cromwell in the Enquiry, is to insist
that times have changed. “In Oliver’s Days,” he writes, “what
was intended by a Mask of Religion, and a Shew of Sanctity, is
now arrived at by the Height of Politeness, and a perpetual attachment to the principles of modern Honour.”35 Cromwell’s
genius as a politician was to understand, as a hypocrite himself, that he should not try to turn his supporters into hypocrites, because in the 1640s and 1650s the way to encourage
virtuous-seeming behaviour was to foster it sincerely. But in
the 1720s and 1730s, the way to encourage virtuous-seeming
behaviour was to emphasise simply the outward show. To
62

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

treat army ofﬁcers in an age of politeness as Cromwell treated
his ofﬁcers in an age of enthusiasm would simply turn them
into what Mandeville calls “Bigots,” and allow hypocrisy to
run riot. Much better to take the eighteenth-century man for
what he was—to have an army of what Mandeville calls “dancing masters,” or persons of fashion. If Cromwell had treated
his army as though it were made up of dancing masters, he
would have lost his ability to control them.
What Cromwell’s political mastery suggests, then, is this:
that the mask of virtue must suit what Mandeville calls the
conjuncture of the age, and in some ages it may be best to suggest that it is not a mask. Second-order hypocrisy arises when
this contingency is lost sight of. Thus it is possible to say that
even a moralist like Shaftesbury is not necessarily wrong
about virtue, because there may be circumstances when it is
socially useful to encourage people in the pursuit of virtue. It
is just that for Mandeville, an increasingly prosperous commercial society was not one of them. But Mandeville’s clinical
dissection of Cromwell’s political character points to an additional, if somewhat more complicated lesson about political
hypocrisy: that in order to prevent ﬁrst-order hypocrisy from
sliding into second-order hypocrisy, the politician should be a
mixture of the malicious and the fashionable hypocrite. Malicious hypocrisy ensures politicians know what they are doing;
fashionable hypocrisy ensures that they are in step with the
spirit of the times. Malice without the desire to conform produces a dangerous detachment; fashionableness without designing motives produces a perilous lack of self-awareness.
Either was disastrous in a politician aspiring to play his part to
the full. What was needed was to combine the two.
Thus the Mandevillian politician has to have a kind of split
personality, which means Mandeville is much more modern
than his crude association with Machiavelli as one of the devils of political thought would allow. The genuinely Machiavellian politician leads a double life but is not a split person: he
has abandoned Christian virtue for political virtue, which
63

CHAPTER TWO

means Christian virtue is something he is content merely to
ape. If anything, Mandeville’s split political personality has
more in common with the ethically divided soul of a Weberian
politician, as described in Max Weber’s classic 1919 lecture
Politik als Beruf (a text that is, incidentally, awash with diabolical imagery).36 Weber believed that political leaders had to
combine detachment and involvement. Detachment without
involvement reduced politics to a sterile game (mere malice);
involvement without detachment turned politics into an absurd parade of convictions (mere fashion). The politician who
was simultaneously involved and detached was a kind of contradiction in terms, but a necessary one. The same could be said
of Mandeville’s doubly hypocritical politician—fashionable
enough so that his hypocrisy is not pure malice, malicious
enough so that it is not just the fashion.

Hypocrisy and good intentions
One thing is practically certain, though: the Mandevillian
politician is going to look like a hypocrite to those whose lives
he is policing. There is therefore a further question that needs
to be considered here: how are the wider public meant to be
satisﬁed with politicians who are divided between these two—
and on their own, equally unpalatable—forms of hypocrisy?
The short answer is: they won’t be. In his most overtly political
book, Free Thoughts on Religion, the Church and National Happiness (1720), Mandeville makes it clear that politicians are
bound to appear to be hypocrites to the wider public, because
all politicians are scheming men of fashion. This is what
makes them suited to their role, but it is also what makes them
so hard to take: “The envy, strife and all the feuds and jealousies of courts are so many safeguards to the liberty of the
people,” Mandeville writes, “[yet] they never fail to produce
severe censure of those at the helm.”37 The safeguards come
from the fact that the scheming of politicians is fashioned by
64

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

the political and legal conventions of the age, “which even the
boldest as well as the craftiest stand in awe of, and is a better
security for the people than all the virtues ministers can be
possessed of.”38 Mandeville wishes observers of the charade
of political life to be sanguine about its hypocrisies, as a sign of
its good health, while also being willing to accept that the entire charade of our own social existence is somehow under the
politicians’ control. The fact that they are all making a spectacle of themselves is meant to reassure us that they know what
they are doing. This takes quite a lot of swallowing.
And what makes it even harder to swallow is that as well as
being a book about politics, Free Thoughts is also a highly political book, with its own partisan purposes. Mandeville was
seeking to defend the Whig ministries of the period (in the
run-up to the South Sea Bubble of 1720) against their political
opponents, particularly those high Tories whose readiness to
censure the obvious corruption of public life Mandeville understood as a transparent attempt to restore their own political
fortunes. Tory moralists were moralising scaremongers, which
made them second-order hypocrites, in so far as their awareness of what they were doing served to undermine the very
basis of the public performance in which they were engaged.
As a doctor, Mandeville preferred to put the matter in medical
terms:
No woman in the height of vapours is more whimsical in her
complaints . . . and melancholy madmen have not more dismal
apprehension of things in the blackest ﬁts of spleen, than our
state hypochondriacs are daily buzzing in our ears.39

The only thing worse than hysterics in public life were people
playing the part of such hysterics, which meant that there was
nothing worse than an hysterical Tory.
What, though, was the correct attitude to corruption and
hypocrisy in public life? For all the brilliance of his polemics,
Mandeville cannot hide the essential weakness of his own position. He wants his readers to think about hypocrisy in two
65

CHAPTER TWO

distinct and not easily reconcilable lights. On the one hand,
everyone who knows anything about politics needs to recognise that moralising about it is absurd. If we moralise about it,
we will simply reveal ourselves to be hypocrites and fools. Indeed, Mandeville suggests, it is best to presume the worst, for
fear of being exposed. We should not attack a prince we oppose “for being immodest in his amours,” lest the prince we
prefer turns out to have conducted his “whole life as an entire
scene of unlawful love.”40 (Mandeville is thinking of the King
and the Pretender, but contemporary parallels are not hard to
ﬁnd—one just has to think of Bill Clinton and some of his Republican critics). Likewise, we should not talk up the probity
of our favoured candidates for public ofﬁce. In a warning that
seems as fresh today as when it was written, Mandeville
points out:
Men have had their heads broke for defending the honesty of a
courtier, who at the same time was abed with another man’s
wife, or bribing, over a bottle of Champagne, another minister
who was to audit his accounts.41

Better in these circumstances not to pass judgment at all.
Yet at the same time, Mandeville also wants the public to accept that some politicians are not nearly as bad as the moralisers make them appear. Our understanding of the hypocrisy
of public life should lead us to recognise that things are not
so grim as the politicians paint them, because the politicians
who bleat the loudest are the worst sorts of hypocrites. “He
that knows how courtiers throw their faults upon others,”
Mandeville warns, “will have but little faith in what is rumoured about public ministers.”42 A large part of Mandeville’s
purpose here is to remind his readers that his preferred candidates for public ofﬁce are much better people than their
diehard Tory opponents would have the public believe. The
immediate context is the brief and relatively inconsequential
1718 war with Spain, which many Whigs supported, as did
Mandeville, and many Tories opposed, believing it to have
66

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

been engineered as a distraction from domestic difﬁculties.
Mandeville’s defence of the war, coming from the author of
The Fable of the Bees, is quite staggeringly moralistic (unless of
course it is ironic, but in this political context it is hard to see
how it can be). “We should not complain when the intentions
of men are manifestly good, and they act for the interests of
the nation,” he writes. “An Englishman who loves his country,
and complains of this conduct, must be an arch politician.” So,
he concludes: “That we should not misconstrue the intentions
of princes and politicians, another criterion is requisite, which
is, to avoid reaching out beyond the sphere of our understanding.”43
There is an obvious double standard at work here: we
should not pass judgment on the virtues of politicians for fear
of discovering that they are worse than we thought them;
equally, we should not pass judgment because they will often
turn out to be far better than we imagined. Can this line be
maintained? One way of doing so might be to distinguish between two different types of politician: the true leaders of
men, and the rest, all the hangers-on and fawners and placemen who make up the bulk of the political class. The hangerson will indeed be as bad as it is possible to imagine, since they
will almost all by deﬁnition be either too obsessively malicious or too much creatures of fashion to make it to the top. By
contrast, somewhere at the heart of political affairs will be the
men who, like Cromwell, combine the various elements of political hypocrisy, and therefore manage to rise above it all.
Again, there is a Weberian way of putting this. Weber understood that most people involved in politics were not ﬁt for political leadership because they were either too idealistic or too
bureaucratic—either too involved or too detached—whereas
only a few, a very, very few, managed to see both sides of political life, and therefore succumb to neither. But this argument
cannot work for Mandeville, because he couches his defence
of the war with Spain solely in terms of the good intentions of
its perpetrators: he does not say that they should be trusted
67

CHAPTER TWO

because, like all good politicians, they are a mixture of malice
and a desire to please; he says they should be trusted because
their motives are beyond reproach. Moreover, Weber at least
had a reason for thinking that the best qualiﬁed politicians
would rise to the top, which is the democratic competition for
power. Mandeville is talking about literal princes and their
courts, and the idea that kings and their preferred ministers
will always by deﬁnition possess the rare combination of qualities required of the successful politician would stretch anyone’s faith in the benign workings of politics. It also hardly
seems a suitable vehicle for anti-Tory polemics. Coming from
Mandeville, it would be rank hypocrisy.
Any suggestion that Mandeville does think like this—that
politicians who make it to the top are there because uniquely
qualiﬁed to be so—is dispelled by the account he offers in the
second volume of The Fable of the Bees of the qualities needed
to become prime minister. “There are always ﬁfty Men in the
Kingdom,” he writes, “that, if employ’d, would be ﬁt for this
Post, and after a little Practice shine in it.”44 The reason is simple: prime ministers derive much of their merit from the merit
that is automatically assumed to attach to the ofﬁce of prime
minister. “A Prime Minister has a vast, an unspeakable Advantage, barely by being so, and by everybody’s knowing him
to be, and treating him as such.”45 How then can a writer who
is happy to argue this—or the stronger claim “that any man of
middling Capacity and Reputation may be ﬁt for any of the
highest posts”46—also think that certain politicians having
made it to the highest positions of preferment are therefore beyond reproach, and acting only with the nation’s best interests
at heart? The most straightforward answer is that Mandeville,
like any good hypocrite, was adapting his principles according to his personal taste or distaste for the politicians in question. At the end of the second volume of the Fable, he remarks,
in standard Hobbesian fashion, “how differently men judge of
Actions, according as they like or dislike the Persons that performed them.”47 In 1729 the prime minister was Robert
68

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

Walpole, and Mandeville did not like him, for what appear to
have been entirely personal reasons (Mandeville’s friend and
patron Lord Macclesﬁeld had been the subject of an earlier investigation for corruption instigated by Walpole that resulted
in a £30,000 ﬁne).48 But in 1720, before Walpole had arrived to
dominate the political scene, Mandeville was happy to defend
the Whig ministry of the day, against its Tory and internal
Whig opponents, with the aid of whatever tools were available. The central weapon to hand was the label of patriotism—
the contest to pass one’s own party off as “patriots” was the
primary political struggle of the period—and Mandeville
used it in order to prevent it from being used by the other
side.49 He was simply playing the game of politics as he understood it.
But there is another possible explanation of Mandeville’s
position that goes slightly deeper than this. He is not just distinguishing between his side and the other side on grounds of
personal preference alone. There is a real difference between
the two sides in Mandeville’s eyes: the politicians of whom he
disapproves are second-order hypocrites, whereas the Whigs
he prefers are not. This is what makes certain sorts of Whigs—
the ones who were sometimes known as “independent
Whigs” in the political language of the period—trustworthy
in Mandeville’s eyes: they know how perilous it is to moralise
in politics, which is why when they do make a virtue of their
good intentions they should be taken seriously. Mandeville
does not state this explicitly, but it is implicit in much of what
he says—the only politicians who can be trusted with the language of virtue are the ones who know how little it is usually
worth. Meanwhile, Walpole’s cynicism, as Mandeville saw it,
had become so all-embracing that he had lost the ability to
make even this judgment.
The basic assumption that underlies this line of thought is
by no means unique to Mandeville, nor to his age. It can also
be found, for example, in the words of Oliver Cromwell, who
defended his overseas adventures and his restrictions on civil
69

CHAPTER TWO

liberties in similar terms. His actions, he said in a speech before Parliament in 1655, were absolutely necessary, yet he acknowledged: “It is an easy thing to talk of necessities when
men make necessities. Would not the Lord Protector make
himself great, and his family great? Doth he not make these
necessities? And then he will come upon the people with his
argument of necessity!”50 But what Cromwell is really asking
his audience is this: Do you think I would invoke necessity,
knowing what an arch-politician it must make me look? No—
you can be sure that I will only invoke necessity when it is
truly needed. Anything else would be “blasphemy,” or, as we
might put it, the ultimate hypocrisy.
But if it is an argument of this kind that lies behind
Mandeville’s defence of the sincere politicians of his own age,
it is hard to ﬁt in with the rest of what he has to say about political hypocrisy. The problem is that it looks too much like just
another form of hypocrisy about hypocrisy. Politicians who
cite the ubiquity of hypocrisy in order to carve out an exception for themselves are still wearing a mask—they are like
stage actors who speak in asides to the audience to explain
what they are doing, despite the fact that this is all still part
of the act. In the politicians’ case, they are adding an act
about hypocrisy to what might otherwise be simply an act of
hypocrisy. In so doing, they move from the ﬁrst-order
hypocrisy of faking virtue to the second-order hypocrisy of
trying to ﬁnd a way to make that fake virtue appear real. This
is not the same as the second-order hypocrisy of someone like
Shaftesbury in Mandeville’s eyes: Shaftesbury was using his
apparent faith in the possibility of genuine virtue as a kind of
cover for his own selﬁsh interests. But it is also possible to use
an apparent lack of faith in the possibility of genuine virtue as
a kind of cover. The politician does this whenever he lets his
audience know that they should not be fooled by what they
see—with a nod, and a wink, the politician allows the public a
glimpse behind the charade of political life, and in so doing

70

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

seeks to offer the public some reassurance that he knows what
he is up to.
What makes this second-order hypocrisy is that it is an exploitation of the fact of hypocrisy for political purposes, and
as such it has no limits—it is, in Mandeville’s terms, effectively
unconﬁned. Once politicians start to use their knowledge of
hypocrisy in order to distance themselves from the game of
politics as it is played by others, then hypocrisy has spread to
the ranks of the people who are meant to be in control of it.
Politicians who genuinely believe that their knowledge of the
ubiquity of hypocrisy in political life makes them immune
from it are self-deceived, since no one is immune from it, because it is ubiquitous. On the other hand, if politicians know
they are not immune from it, then the claim that their knowledge grants them a kind of exception is itself just an act.
Knowingness about political hypocrisy is no more an escape
from it than any other kind of inside knowledge, because it
too can be deployed as a mask.
If Mandeville shows us anything, therefore, it is that the
line between ﬁrst-order and second-order hypocrisy is extremely difﬁcult to hold in any political context, and that it
was as hard for him as it was for his contemporaries. In principle, it is possible to distinguish between these two types of
hypocrisy. But in practice it is almost impossible to tell which
is which. Even those rare politicians who appear to stay on the
right side of the line between them will be vulnerable to the
charge that they are exploiting their skill in the management
of hypocrisy to mask what they are really up to. To hold out
for the politician who is invulnerable to the charge of secondorder hypocrisy will mean a very long wait, and, as Mandeville himself says of the problem of waiting for the right sorts
of politicians to come along, “in the meantime the Places can’t
stand open, and the Ofﬁces must be ﬁlled with such as you
can get.”51 We must not expect too much, but even not expecting too much is no guarantee against the most corrosive forms

71

CHAPTER TWO

of hypocrisy, because the most hypocritical politicians will exploit our low expectations to convince us that their hypocrisy
does not matter. Mandeville found no way out of this
dilemma, and his own political writing serves to illustrate it.
So perhaps the real lesson is that it is a mistake to expect any
deﬁnitive answers from the ideas of a political thinker like
Mandeville, for all his insights into the nature of political
hypocrisy. In truth, hypocrisy was not his central concern anyway. His thoughts on hypocrisy were a vehicle for his critique
of wishful moral and economic thinking, rather than the other
way around.52 Equally, he was not a political philosopher, but a
polemicist and satirist of genius. It is dangerous to take what
he has to say too literally, or expect too much overall coherence
from it.
Yet despite what this suggests about the apparent futility of
trying get from Mandeville a generalised understanding of
the limits to political hypocrisy, there is another principle running through his body of thought that might serve as a practical guide to modern politics, including the politics of today.
Mandeville was writing about a society in which hypocrisy
was ubiquitous, which is one of the reasons that it is a society
we can recognise. He wanted to prevent a ubiquitous feature
of his society from becoming a self-defeating one. Attempting
to do this by distinguishing between straightforward hypocrisy
and hypocrisy about hypocrisy leads into some of the difﬁculties I have highlighted in this chapter, particularly in politics.
But there is an alternative way of doing it. That is to argue that
the worst hypocrisy arises when people pass off difﬁcult
things as though they were easy, and easy things as though
they were difﬁcult. Genuine self-denial is difﬁcult to achieve—
no one, least of all politicians, should pretend that it is easy.
Equally, the appearance of self-denial is easily achieved; no
one, least of all politicians, should pretend that putting it on is
hard. These insights, which derive from Mandeville’s work,
apply to it as well. Mandeville’s struggles show how difﬁcult
the line between ﬁrst-order and second-order hypocrisy is to
72

THE VIRTUES OF VICE

hold. This is one more thing that no one, neither Mandeville,
nor Oliver Cromwell, nor anyone else engaged in the great
game of politics, should pretend is easy. Nor, having made it
easy for themselves, should they then pretend it is hard. It is
second-order hypocrisy to pass off tough political decisions as
foregone moral conclusions. Equally, it is second-order
hypocrisy to pass off foregone political decisions as the result
of much tough personal agonising. That seems as true now as
it was then.

73

]

]

3

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION AND
THE ART OF SINCERITY

British hypocrisy and American hypocrisy

No event in modern political history has been so marked by
the problem of hypocrisy as the American Revolution. The
most elementary reason for this can be summarised in a single
word: slavery. The champions of American liberty made universal claims regarding the freedoms that belonged to all human beings which they nonetheless readily denied to the
hundreds of thousands of human beings enslaved on their
own continent. Some of our sense of the grotesqueness of this
double standard is hindsight, and therefore anachronistic, but
by no means all of it is hindsight. As Simon Schama has recently shown, the participants on both sides of the Revolution
were acutely conscious of the hypocrisies involved, well in advance of the real battle being joined. The spectacle of Americans moralising about tyranny and oppression while indulging
in the worst kind of oppression themselves was hard for many
to stomach, and not only among those who were to remain
loyal to the Crown. As Abigail Adams wrote to her husband
John, the future president, in 1774: “It always appeared to me
to be a most iniquitous scheme . . . to ﬁght ourselves for what
we are daily robbing and plundering from those who have as
good a right to freedom as we have.”1
74

THE ART OF SINCERITY

Yet American freedom ﬁghters were also aware that whatever their own hypocrisy, it was more than matched by the
hypocrisy of their critics on the British side. Indeed, to be accused of hypocrisy for perpetuating slavery by a British political establishment that had repeatedly refused to outlaw the
trade on which the practice depended was not difﬁcult to depict as the ultimate double standard. But worse was to come
when the Crown invited American slaves to seek their freedom by taking up arms against their colonial masters.
Thomas Jefferson, in his original draft of the Declaration of Independence, spelled out exactly how far British hypocrisy
went. Not only had the king refused to grant American requests to ban or limit the import of slaves to the colonies,
thereby “prostituting his negative [i.e., his veto]” to the West
Indian sugar lobby, “he is now exciting those very people to
rise in arms against us, and to purchase that liberty of which
he has deprived them, by murdering the people on whom he
has obtruded them.”2
This passage, the culmination of Jefferson’s list of charges
against the British Crown that made a declaration of independence inevitable, was cut by Congress from the ﬁnal version of
the document, to its author’s lifelong chagrin. The reasons for
its exclusion are politically complex—slavery was never an
easy matter on which to secure any kind of political
consensus—but also straightforward. The charge of hypocrisy
was in 1776, as it has remained, a weapon to be handled carefully, because for all its rhetorical force it exposes those who
wield it to an inevitable scrutiny of their own inconsistencies
(as Garry Wills has put it, “Congress had good reason to believe that Jefferson’s morally convoluted charge would just
open it to ridicule”).3 Jefferson believed the Declaration of
Independence was a weaker document for sidestepping the
King’s duplicity on the question of slavery, but it was unquestionably a stronger document for avoiding a direct attack on
the King’s hypocrisy on this matter, given the vulnerability of
those who were to sign it on that score. In this respect, the
75

CHAPTER THREE

issue of hypocrisy in relation to slavery was a “political” as
much as it was a “moral” one—and it is in our tendency to see
it as a moral issue that we run the risk of misunderstanding
the concerns of those involved.
We tend to be preoccupied with the personal hypocrisy of
the slaveholding class to which Jefferson belonged, and to be
repelled by it. For that reason, slavery has provided the focus
for later investigations into whether the American political
thought of this period can be “redeemed.”4 But for Jefferson
and the other members of the class who rebelled against the
King, slavery was simply one of a number of areas where the
problem of hypocrisy had become politically acute. Indeed, it
was not slavery that made political hypocrisy an issue in this
context; rather, it was political hypocrisy that made slavery an
issue, because the slave question was symptomatic of the ways
in which the double standards of empire had made it impossible for the colonists to control their own destiny. But for all
their criticism of these double standards, the Americans had
to be careful that they did not simply replicate them. The American revolutionaries were, after all, subjects of the Crown, and
the entire revolutionary process was shaped by their need to
repudiate that subjection in its own terms—they did not wish
to be seen as traitors, but as patriots, driven to extreme measures by the altogether more extreme treatment to which they
had been subjected. The thrust of the American case against
the British state was that the King had been hiding behind an
empty language of constitutionality and “right” in order to
conceal his mistreatment of his American subjects. Independence was needed to give that language real substance again.
But inevitably, to the King’s supporters, it was the Americans
who were hiding behind a fake language of constitutionality,
because their own deployment of it was impossible to reconcile with their traitorous behaviour.
The challenge for the defenders of the American revolution
was to explain why the fact that they too were British subjects
made it impossible for them to remain British subjects. This
76

THE ART OF SINCERITY

was a delicate task, requiring an acute sensitivity to the politics of hypocrisy (a sensitivity that deserted Jefferson on the
question of slavery, but on very little else). Too close an identiﬁcation with the power they were seeking to repudiate would
render them hypocrites, but so would too much distance,
given that so much of what they wished to say had to be
couched in their opponents’ terms. The problem faced by the
champions of American independence was the one faced by
all revolutionaries—how to overthrow an entire political order
without undercutting their ability to construct a new order in
its place. But in the American case the difﬁculties were acute
for two reasons. First, the language of American political
thought in the pre-revolutionary period was almost entirely
borrowed from British sources—there did not yet exist a
home-grown tradition on which to draw (though that was to
change rapidly in the period leading up to the ratiﬁcation of
the Constitution in 1787–1788), nor were there any obvious
foreign examples to follow (though again that was to change
with the French Revolution). It is true that many American
thinkers of the period were well versed in the classical literature of republicanism, but again this tended to be refracted
through British sources. There now exists a vast and contentious historical literature exploring the ways in which
American revolutionary thought borrowed, adapted, or moved
away from ideas that had their roots across the Atlantic, in law,
theology, and moral and political philosophy.5 I am not going
to attempt to add to these controversies here. Instead, I want to
focus on a more speciﬁc aspect of the tradition of what is
sometimes called “Atlantic” political thought, which is the
role within it of arguments about the limits of sincerity in politics.
This constitutes the second complicating aspect of American revolutionary attitudes to hypocrisy: the fact that many of
the insights into the nature of political dissembling were
drawn from a body of ideas that the Americans shared with
their adversaries. The question of when, why, and how it
77

CHAPTER THREE

might be acceptable to conceal one’s true political principles
and hide behind a mask of piety and virtue had become one of
the major themes of eighteenth-century political argument, in
part because of the deep impact of Bernard Mandeville’s Fable
of the Bees on the way people thought about these questions.
The impact of these ideas extended to North America, where
they became central to the discourse of revolutionary politics.
In this chapter, I want to explore how three of the most prominent American thinkers of the period—Benjamin Franklin,
John Adams, and Thomas Jefferson—adapted and developed
prevailing British ideas about what it might mean to act sincerely in a political setting. (Though many of these ideas were
explicitly English, it is important to retain the epithet of
Britishness at this point because some of them were drawn
from Scotland as well.) In doing so, I hope to address the
wider and more enduring problem, exempliﬁed by the American Revolution but by no means exclusive to it, of how politicians can counter political hypocrisy without becoming
hypocrites themselves.
Nonetheless, for all the impact Mandeville had on the
thought of the period, the one thing I cannot claim here is that
the American response to the problem of political hypocrisy
was an explicitly Mandevillian one. American revolutionary
thought is in some ways an amalgam of the ideas that
Mandeville most distrusted, or would have distrusted had he
lived to see them. Among the thinkers who had the largest direct inﬂuence on the theorists of American independence were
Shaftesbury, the great exponent of natural human sociability,
along more signiﬁcantly with Shaftesbury’s mentor, John
Locke; Bolingbroke (1678–1751), the arch-critic of Whig corruption in the 1720s and 1730s, who contrasted this corruption
with an ideal of patriotic virtue; and Scottish Enlightenment
authors such as Francis Hutcheson (1694–1746), Lord Kames
(1692–1786), and Adam Smith (1723–1790), all of whom championed a conception of innate moral sense that was deliberately designed to rescue moral philosophy from Mandeville’s
78

THE ART OF SINCERITY

impossible paradoxes. From writers like Locke, Bolingbroke,
and Hutcheson came the quintessential American understanding of “right,” “virtue,” and “sentiment,” just the notions
that Mandeville thought were most likely to allow hypocrisy
to run riot in a political setting, and precisely the ideas that
did most to drive the American revolution forward. In this respect, Mandeville looks like an isolated rock around whom the
streams of high-minded eighteenth-century political thought
flowed until they reached America, at which point they washed
him away altogether.
But the American political thought of this period cannot
simply be reduced to anti-Mandevillian ideas such as these. In
part this is because the Anglophone tradition on which the
Americans drew itself had much deeper roots than that would
suggest, stretching back from Smith and Locke to Hobbes and
Francis Bacon (1561–1626), and back from there to the great
names of classical and early modern republican and postrepublican thought (including Tacitus and Machiavelli).6 It is
true that many Americans of the period—including Jefferson—
were at pains to make explicit their rejection of what they understood as the Hobbesian view of human nature, but that is
not true of all of them. John Adams, for example, was considerably more circumspect. Moreover, the political ideas of the
American revolution stretch forward as well as back, towards
the controversies of the early years of the republic, and the bitter party disputes in which both Adams and Jefferson took a
prominent part. Political arguments like this—fractious, moralising, often deeply hypocritical—belong squarely in Mandeville’s view of the world.
The other way in which American revolutionary thought
can be connected to the themes I have discussed in the previous two chapters lies in its preoccupation with some of the
problems that Hobbes and Mandeville pose for any rational
conception of politics. The inﬂuence of Scottish Enlightenment
conceptions of human moral sentiment is a testimony to this:
these ideas were gratefully seized on because they offered a
79

CHAPTER THREE

means of responding to the likes of Hobbes and Mandeville,
who could not simply be ignored. In taking Hobbes and
Mandeville seriously, the Americans also took seriously many
of the puzzles concerning the problem of political hypocrisy
that provide the central strands of the story I am attempting to
tell in this book. The three authors that I will be discussing in
this chapter were all, in their different ways, anti-hypocrites.
But they were also, in their equally different ways, aware of
the perils of anti-hypocrisy, and determined not to fall into the
trap of overstating its signiﬁcance.
The American revolution does provide the example of one
signiﬁcant political thinker who was as pure an anti-hypocrite
as it is possible to meet in the history of modern political
thought, at least the equal of Rousseau in this respect, and in
some ways well beyond him, because a much less complicated
ﬁgure. That man was Thomas Paine, who was well known to all
three of the subjects of this chapter. Franklin helped to discover
Paine (it was Franklin who provided Paine with his initial letters of recommendation before his ﬁrst trip to America); Jefferson cultivated him once in America, and exploited the
connection; Adams, by contrast, loathed and mistrusted him.
It was Paine’s The Rights of Man that provided the catalyst for
the ﬁrst great falling-out between Jefferson and Adams, thereby
initiating one of the dominant story lines of American political
history. But even Jefferson could not fully embrace Paine’s particular brand of political sincerity. Indeed, Jefferson was only
able to exploit his connection with Paine because he was a very
different kind of political operator, much more subtle, much
more shrewd, much more “cunning,” to use one of the terms
that was central to the political discourse of the period. Jefferson was as aware as anyone that sincerity had its limits.
This side of his character, coupled with the prodigious
diversity of his accomplishments, has produced one of the
enduring motifs of Jefferson studies: the view that he was a
man of many masks, almost impossible for anyone to know
fully. The same idea is also frequently applied to Franklin, a
80

THE ART OF SINCERITY

man of equally diverse talents, and equally hard to fathom.
“So who was the real Benjamin Franklin?,” as one recent commentator has framed it:
First American and father of pragmatism? republican patriot
and public servant? ambitious Tory imperialist? natural scientist? utilitarian hero of plodding and middling folk? devotee
of the moral sublime? selﬁsh opportunist? Francophile Deist?
debauched aristocratic wannabe?7

By contrast, John Adams is not quite so complicated nor as
hard to know, and in this if nothing else he has something in
common with Paine, another man who found it extremely difﬁcult to dissemble. But unlike Paine, Adams agonised about
this side of his character—his natural sincerity—which he understood as an obvious failing in the way of life he had chosen
for himself (and unlike Jefferson he did not pretend that his
public prominence had somehow been chosen for him, against
his own wishes). First as a lawyer, then as a revolutionary,
then, like both Franklin and Jefferson, as a diplomat to the
courts of Europe, and ﬁnally, like his great rival Jefferson, by
whom he was eventually eclipsed, as the president of the
United States, Adams discovered how inextricably bound up
with hypocrisy are all the parts of public life. It became a preoccupation with him, but also a challenge, as he sought to
identify which among this morass of hypocrisies were the
ones that really mattered, and therefore where a place might
still be found for the politics of sincerity.
The conclusions Adams reached on this question were
strongly opposed to the views of Jefferson, and would have
alienated Franklin too, had he lived to hear the worst of them.
But the question itself is one whose salience all three recognised: how to prevent political sincerity from becoming its
own kind of hypocrisy. The almost overwhelming historical
signiﬁcance of the long lives of these men, each crammed with
incident, marked throughout by dramatic shifts of fortune,
and encompassing by their end monumental political
81

CHAPTER THREE

changes, means that there is a great deal to be said about how
their own biographies encapsulate the difﬁculty of reducing a
politician’s character to its moral essence. Much of it has already been said, in the many biographies that have been written. In this chapter I want to explore what they themselves had
to say about this difﬁculty, not simply in relation to their own
lives, but also in relation to that body of modern political
thought in which the problem of political sincerity loomed
largest, and to which Hobbes and Mandeville also belong.

Franklin and the habit of sincerity
In his Autobiography, written towards the end of his life, Benjamin Franklin describes his ﬁrst visit to London as a very
young man (he was only eighteen when he arrived in 1724),
in pursuit of printing business and intellectual adventure. At
that time, he believed himself to be a free-thinking Deist, and
it was in this capacity that he produced his ﬁrst piece of
philosophical writing, “a little metaphysical Piece . . . entitled A Dissertation on Liberty & Necessity, Pleasure and pain.”
Franklin was later to consider this production to have been
an “erratum” of his early years, a typical young man’s mistake. However, he also notes that it made a small name for
him in London, and was the means of bringing him to the
attention of some interesting people. One of these was a
surgeon called Lyons, author of The Infallibility of Human
Judgment, who in turn “carried me to the Horns, a pale AleHouse in ——Lane, Cheapside, and introduc’d me to Dr
Mandeville, Author of the Fable of the Bees, who had a Club
there, of which he was the Soul, being a most facetious entertaining companion.”8
It would be wonderful to know what Franklin and Mandeville talked about, and what lessons the young man took away
from this encounter. Unfortunately, we can only speculate.
What is clear, though, is that it did nothing to convert Franklin
82

THE ART OF SINCERITY

to Mandeville’s side in the great moral philosophical disputes
of the day. If anything, the reverse seems to have happened—
when he returned from London, Franklin renounced his earlier Deism and embraced a philosophical position that was
more consonant with traditional conceptions of Christian
virtue. In 1735, he published another pamphlet that made this
shift crystal-clear—as he describes it in the Autobiography, this
was “A Discourse on Self denial, showing that Virtue was not
secure, till its Practice became a Habitude, & was free from the
Opposition of contrary Inclinations.”9 By identifying virtue as
an inclination or habit that could with practise be made secure, Franklin was explicitly rejecting Mandeville’s view that
virtue had to be understood as a form of self-denial that could
only exist in opposition to all our natural inclinations or habits
of mind. In other words, Franklin had come down on Shaftesbury’s side, having decided that virtue was consistent with the
run of human sociability. Hence the pamphlet’s deliberately
anti-Mandevillian title: “Self-denial not the Essence of Virtue.”
However, Franklin’s own explanation for his move away
from the view that human beings are naturally selﬁsh emphasises not the philosophical but the practical demerits of that
thesis. In the Autobiography, he describes his awakening to the
problems posed by the Deist insistence on taking human beings for what they are—exempliﬁed by the line “Whatever is,
is right” that Franklin recalls as having been the motto for his
London pamphlet—in the following terms: “I began to suspect that this Doctrine, tho’ it might be true, was not very useful.”10 Indeed, the assumption that individuals were designed
to pursue their own selﬁsh desires, whatever these might be,
could be considered self-defeating, because Franklin noticed
that the behaviour of individuals who acted in this way
tended to be undesirable, both for themselves and for others.
It was therefore a question of utility: the traditional Christian
virtues, including “truth, sincerity & integrity,” were useful
because they worked to the beneﬁt of the people who practiced them. Franklin’s personal experiences as recounted in
83

CHAPTER THREE

the Autobiography were conﬁrmation of this. Both his own
youthful behaviour and that of his friends, “perverted” as he
says by free-thinking ideas, caused them “great Trouble” (particularly in matters of the heart). By contrast, whenever
Franklin made an effort to be open and honest with people,
and to cultivate a reputation for hard work and reliability, then
he found that his fortunes began rapidly to improve.
Yet once the matter is put in such pragmatic terms, then we
are immediately back in Mandeville territory. The obvious
question that arises, if virtue is to be pursued because of its
beneﬁts, and not because of its inherent value, is why individuals should not simply pretend to be virtuous, and reap the
beneﬁts that way. Franklin’s own account of his progress
through life emphasises the role of his truthfulness and sincerity in making a good impression on people. But if it is simply a matter of making a good impression, then what has
genuine virtue got to do with it? Indeed, it is not difﬁcult to
make a utilitarian case for fake virtue over real virtue, because
the individual who merely cultivates the outward appearance
of truthfulness retains the capacity to lie and cheat when necessary, whereas the individual who is committed to being
honest in all circumstances may sometimes ﬁnd his honesty
being used against him by those less scrupulous than himself.
Franklin was well aware of this problem. His most explicit attempt to address it was given in a short essay he wrote in 1732
entitled “On Simplicity,” which was published in the Pennsylvania Gazette. Here, he makes clear two things. First, that it is a
mistake to think about the rewards of virtue in relation to isolated instances: this is simply fool’s gold. What matters are not
the one-off beneﬁts to be gained in individual cases, but the
more durable beneﬁts that follow from acquiring a particular
habit of mind. Second, that the main source for this insight
long predates the argument between Shaftesbury and Mandeville. It comes a century earlier, in the writings of Francis Bacon.
Franklin’s argument is an amalgam of two of Bacon’s most
inﬂuential essays: “Of Cunning” and “Of Simulation and
84

THE ART OF SINCERITY

Dissimulation.” These essays (ﬁrst published in 1625) had
gained a very wide currency in seventeenth- and early-eighteenth-century political thought, and were among the best
known of all post-Machiavellian attempts to grapple with the
problem of political deception.11 Franklin’s starting point is
the essay on cunning. “Cunning,” for Bacon, meant the kind
of trickery that exploits the blind spots of one’s rivals—it is
the tactic of the cardsharp. To seek to deceive and trick others
in this way can be useful in particular cases, but in the long
run the habit of mind that promotes cunning becomes a
handicap, because it constitutes a limited perspective on human affairs. It precludes an understanding of those circumstances when honesty really is the best policy, and therefore
mistakes what Bacon calls “the real part of business.”12 Cunning men are to be distinguished from the genuinely wise by
their inﬂexibility. Franklin endorses this view, and borrows
an image directly from Bacon to capture its essence: “There is
a great difference between a cunning Man and a wise One,
not only in point of Honesty but in point of Ability; as there
are those that can pack the Cards, who cannot play the Game
well.”13
Franklin wishes to go further than this, however. He also
wants to show why wisdom itself should be equated with honesty, rather than simply with ﬂexibility. For these purposes,
the argument of Bacon’s that matters is the one contained in
“Of Simulation and Dissimulation,” an essay that relates
speciﬁcally to the question of when it makes sense to conceal
or deliberately lie about one’s true intentions or beliefs. This is
a more subtle and complex problem than simply knowing
how to avoid excessive cunning. To understand the choices involved, Bacon insists that it is necessary to separate out mere
concealment from conscious deception. The latter is what he
calls “Simulation,” which occurs “when a man industriously
and expressly feigns and pretends to be that which he is not”;
the former is only “Dissimulation,” as “when a man lets fall
signs and arguments, that he is not that he is.”14
85

CHAPTER THREE

Conceptually, this can be a difﬁcult distinction to maintain—
pretending not to be what you are is not always so different
from pretending to be what you are not—but in practical
terms, Bacon is clear that the difference is a signiﬁcant one.
Dissimulation means concealment, or holding something
back. Simulation requires going out of your way to put something in the public domain that you know to be false. Both fall
short of the whole truth, but only simulation is a deliberate
policy of deception. Dissimulation, by contrast, may sometimes be the best option available in the treacherous circumstances of public life, where full disclosure can be extremely
hazardous (and we should remember that public life for Bacon
meant the deeply hazardous circumstances of late Elizabethan
and Jacobean court politics). So the dissimulator can be said to
hold things back because he has no choice; but the persistent
simulator will ﬁnd it much harder to offer this excuse, because
to simulate is to lie “industriously.”
Because of this difference between them, Bacon argues
that simulation is “the more culpable, and less politic” form
of behaviour, and he concludes that “a general custom of
simulation . . . is a vice.” This does not mean, however, that
simulation is a bad thing in itself—the key term here is “custom.” It is wrong to become habituated to lying, since it may
leave one trapped in a pattern of mendacity that will be hard
to escape and easy for others to dislike.15 But so long as the
lying is not habitual, then even simulation can have its advantages, particularly when it comes with the added element
of surprise. Something similar is true of dissimulation,
notwithstanding the fact that it is a less culpable activity in
itself. “The habit of dissimulation,” Bacon says, “is a hindrance and a poorness,” because it is inconsistent with the
true openness of mind that is the mark of the most successful
men. On the other hand, those men whose minds are truly
open will be open to the idea that dissimulation is often the
best course of action, and they will be able to discern “what
things are to be laid [bare], and what to be secreted, and what
86

THE ART OF SINCERITY

to be shewed at half lights.”16 Likewise, Bacon distinguishes
between secrecy understood as mere silence and the sort of
dissimulation that involves leaving a false trail. Habitual reticence is valuable, because it draws conﬁdences, and teaches
restraint. It is also consistent with that reputation for trustworthiness without which it is very hard to prosper. So, Bacon
says, “an habit of secrecy is both politic, and moral.”17 Vocal
dissimulation sometimes, and active simulation much more
rarely, are necessary to supplement this habit only because it
is not always possible to hold one’s tongue without arousing
suspicion.
Bacon summarises the intricate argument of the essay as
follows: “The best composition and temperature is to have
openness in fame and opinion; secrecy in habit; dissimulation
in seasonable use; and a power to feign, if there be no remedy.”18 Franklin takes the core of this argument, and drops the
qualiﬁcations. He does not distinguish either between dissimulation and simulation on the one hand, or between dissimulation and secrecy on the other. Instead, he equates them all
with cunning, and he runs together Bacon’s views about cunning with his views about concealment:
Cunning, says my Lord Bacon, is a sinister or crooked Wisdom,
and Dissimulation but a faint kind of Policy; for it asks a strong
Wit and a strong Heart, to know when to tell the truth and to
do it; therefore they are the weaker sort of Politicians that are
the greatest Dissemblers.19

Having linked dissimulation with cunning, Franklin then
goes on to identify honesty with wisdom, even though that is
not how Bacon sees it.20 For Bacon, wisdom lies in getting the
balance between honesty and deception right, so that a reputation for honesty is preserved while a capacity for deception is
retained. For Franklin, the only way to avoid the risks of
becoming habituated to deception is to accustom oneself to
honesty, with the result that the ﬂexibility that Bacon prized is
abandoned in favour of a deliberate abdication of personal
87

CHAPTER THREE

discretion on matters relating to the truth. Franklin goes so far
as to say that “wise Men cannot help being honest.” He argues
that any form of concealment will provide an obstacle to “true
Wisdom,” because the man who has something to hide will be
unable to rely on the discretion and judgment of others. For
Franklin, honesty really is the best policy.
Where Franklin also parts company with Bacon is in his
embrace of the quintessentially eighteenth-century virtue of
“simplicity,” which is not what Bacon means by wisdom at all.
“Simplicity of Speech and Manners is the highest Happiness
as well as the Ornament of Life,” Franklin writes, “whereas
nothing is so tiresome to one’s self, as well as odious to others,
as Disguise and Affectation.” This, apparently, is not just a
question of policy but also of pure pleasure: “Even the most
cunning Man will be obliged to own, the high and sincere
Pleasure there is in conversing from the Heart, and without
Design. What Relief do we ﬁnd in the simple and unaffected
Dialogues of uncorrupted Peasants, after the tiresome Grimaces of the Town!”21 If we are a long way from Bacon here,
we are also clearly a long way from Mandeville, who would
suspect, with some reason, that all this was the rankest
hypocrisy. Indeed, it is hard to reconcile what Franklin has to
say about the natural virtue of simplicity with his apparent
readiness to embrace the Baconian idea that life is like a game
of cards, to be played with skill, not just skulduggery. So we
are entitled to ask: what is Franklin thinking of here?
To help answer this question, it is worth comparing the use
Franklin makes of Bacon’s arguments with their deployment
in a very different text that dates from the same decade as “On
Simplicity,” and was to have just as signiﬁcant an impact on
the subsequent development of American revolutionary
thought. This is Bolingbroke’s “The Idea of a Patriot King,”
which was written in late 1738. Bolingbroke’s is an extended,
highly polished, and deeply polemical assault on the corruption of the Walpole years. It attempts to recast Tory patriotism
in the terms of classical (as opposed to Christian) virtue, by
88

THE ART OF SINCERITY

annexing it to the ideal of a monarch who stands above faction. Franklin’s provincial journalism is far removed from all
this high politics. But the link between them is Bacon on simulation and dissimulation.
Bolingbroke uses Bacon to argue that while political life
may be impossible without some dissimulation, it nevertheless remains wrong to confuse this with overt lying.
Simulation is a stiletto, not only an offensive, but an unlawful
weapon; and the use of it may rarely, very rarely be excused,
but never justiﬁed. Dissimulation is a shield, as secrecy is armour; and it is no more possible to preserve secrecy in the
administration of public affairs without some degree of dissimulation, than it is to succeed without secrecy.22

By distinguishing between simulation and dissimulation, Bolingbroke sticks much closer to Bacon’s original account than
Franklin does. He also goes further in exploring some of its
wider implications. Bolingbroke makes clear that while simulation and dissimulation both entail a form of concealment,
only simulation involves the construction of a deliberate disguise. Keeping secrets is not the same as hiding behind a
mask. Moreover, wearing a mask can make it much harder to
keep secrets, because it reveals that one has something to hide.
Bolingbroke insists that a virtuous ruler should not attempt to
hide or conceal his private vices behind a public façade of probity, because such behaviour will eventually be found out, at
which point it will be impossible to conceal anything. If a king
wishes to appear virtuous he must act virtuously at all times,
which means no drunkenness, no debauchery, no petty cruelties taking place behind the scenes. This is clearly an assault
on the idea of private vices/public beneﬁts, just as it is an obvious attack on the corruption of court life under Walpole.
What it is not, however, is an argument in favour of inherent
virtue over the mere appearance of virtue. Quite the opposite,
in fact—Bolingbroke is saying that the only way to keep up appearances is to repudiate the idea that vices can be successfully
89

CHAPTER THREE

disguised. Moreover, the neglect of appearances is a certain
recipe for disaster, no matter how virtuous a king might be in
other respects. “For want of a sufﬁcient regard to appearances,” Bolingbroke writes, “even their virtues may betray
them into failings, their failings into vices, and their vices into
habits unworthy of princes and of men.”23
There is a paradoxical aspect to this argument. The best way
to hide what one is up to is to avoid having to disguise it as
something it is not—and the best way to avoid such disguises
is to concentrate on maintaining appearances. Bolingbroke is
championing what he calls “private decency,” without which
no public reputation of virtue will be secure. This decency cannot simply be an occasional performance, it must become a
habit, because only if it is regular will it serve its purpose of
closing the gap between reputation and reality. Yet once that
gap is closed, then it becomes much easier to avoid prying
eyes and constant speculation about one’s motives. There is for
Bolingbroke a freedom in the apparent constraint of having to
reconcile private with public behaviour, and this freedom extends to the possibility of being able to conceal what one is
really up to. This is the lesson he took from Bacon: the avoidance of routine simulation is the only secure means of ensuring that some things can be kept beyond the reach of one’s
enemies.
Franklin looks to be saying something very different. First,
unlike Bolingbroke, his conception of virtue includes the
Christian ideals of truthfulness and sincerity as well as the
classical ones of honesty and probity, which makes it harder
for him to put so much emphasis on appearances. Second, he
has nothing to say about the importance of keeping secrets.
Third, his bucolic ideal of simplicity seems starkly opposed to
the sophistication of Bolingbroke’s account. But behind all
this, Franklin is making a case that is not so far from Bolingbroke’s. For example, Franklin does not imply that simplicity
has got nothing to do with appearances. Indeed, he pointedly
describes simplicity as a form of dress—it is “the homespun
90

THE ART OF SINCERITY

Dress of Honesty, and Chicanery and Craft are the Tinsel
Habits and the false Elegance which are worn to cover the Deformity of Vice and Knavery.”24 Simplicity is a “habit” (in both
senses of that word) but it is not a mask, because it is the form
of dress worn by those wise enough to appreciate that a deliberate disguise merely advertises the unreliability of its wearer.
“Who was ever cunning enough to conceal his being so?”
Franklin asks. “No Mask ever hid itself.”25 Bacon and Bolingbroke share this view—the only habits worth acquiring are
the ones that do not draw attention to themselves.
Where Franklin really differs is in the scope he gives to this
lesson. Bolingbroke treats the problem of simulation and dissimulation as primarily a political one, and politics as primarily an activity conducted at court. He is arguing that the gap
between public and private must be closed because the potential for its opening up is so great, in a world dominated by ceremony on the one hand and intrigue on the other. The setting
for Franklin’s account is nothing like this, and he does not
limit himself to the environs of power. In fact, he does not limit
himself at all. His view is that these are life lessons in the
fullest sense, not just for princes, or courtiers, or men of business, but for everyone.
Another way to put this is that Franklin’s is the democratic
version of this argument, because it does not rely on any prior
assumptions about who is a public man. We are all public men
and women, which means that the distinction between the
public and private looks increasingly obsolete. Bolingbroke
believed that those who are serious about power should live as
though their private lives were public, because that is the only
way to ensure that some aspects of the public domain remained private. Franklin abandons such distinctions, and
with them the idea of there being a place for secrecy, or for intrigue. This is not, therefore, a democratic understanding of
virtue in any classical political sense. In fact, it is not really a
political conception at all, because it ﬁnds no separate place for
politics. Instead, it is a social conception of virtue, and it treats
91

CHAPTER THREE

all human encounters, from affairs of the heart to the everyday
transactions in a printing press, as occasions to practice the
lessons that Bolingbroke reserves for the few.
This helps to explain the immense impact that Franklin’s
writings—including not just the essays and the Autobiography
but also the Poor Richard maxims, with their homespun versions of the insights of Baconian humanism—have had on almost all aspects of American life, apart from the world of
high politics, where the legacy of Franklin’s example has been
more limited. Yet it is one of the ironies of this story that
among the beneﬁts Franklin derived personally from his attempt to cultivate the social habits of virtue were manifest
political ones. This is not true of the bulk of Franklin’s life—
including that part of it covered by the Autobiography—when
his business and scientiﬁc achievements were not matched by
achievements in the political sphere. He struggled to adapt to
the intrigues and betrayals of court politics that he encountered when serving as a colonial agent in London during the
1750s and 1760s. In this context, Franklin’s faith in the virtues
of sincerity appeared naive. But the Revolution changed all
that. Franklin went swiftly from being an advocate of conciliation between the Crown and the colonies to being one of the
staunchest defenders of American independence. For some,
such a volte-face would have been hard to achieve without appearing hypocritical, but Franklin’s reputation for sincerity
preceded him, and he got away with it. That reputation also
preceded him to France, where he was sent as one of the ﬁrst
American commissioners at the end of 1776.
Franklin’s diplomatic mission to France was the great political triumph of his life, and one of the most signiﬁcant successes of the entire revolutionary period. It was achieved
because of, not despite, the apparently apolitical nature of his
conception of personal integrity. Franklin’s “simplicity”
gained him enormous popularity across French society, from
aristocrats to radical intellectuals, and from the court to the
general public. More surprisingly, it also provided the secret of
92

THE ART OF SINCERITY

his success as a diplomat at a time of high political intrigue between America, France, and Britain. Franklin refused to conduct his ambassadorial affairs with the usual discretion—he
left papers lying around, did not care who opened his letters,
and happily gossiped and ﬂirted with anyone who would listen. As Bernard Bailyn has put it, this appalling lack of secrecy
turned out to be an “adroit manoeuvre,” because it left those
trying to spy on American intentions unable to believe that
things could be as slapdash as they seemed, and convinced
that Franklin’s openness must be concealing a cunning plan.26
They assumed his simplicity was a disguise. It was not, but it
worked to that effect by confounding those who refused to accept that anyone could be so careless of his secrets. This, perhaps, is the ultimate extension of Bacon’s original insight that
the best way to keep things hidden is to act as though one has
nothing to hide.
Yet it would be wrong to read too much into it. Franklin’s
diplomatic success was, in Bailyn’s words, “half contrived,
half lucky.” What’s more, the circumstances in which it was
achieved were so unusual as to defy the thought that this provides a model for other sorts of political behaviour. Franklin’s
fame, his age, and his eccentricity led the French to indulge
him in ways that no diplomat has been indulged since. He
came to France as the representative of a new kind of simple
virtue whose appeal lay in its absence of obvious politicking
motives. No appeal of that kind can last for long in politics. It
is hard to imagine how it could have been extended back into
the fractious party politics of the new American republic. Certainly, Franklin’s ability to get away with anything while in
France was a source at least as much of bemusement as of
pride back home. When he died in 1790, his passing was
treated as a world historical event by the French, who were
just beginning their own experiment with the politics of republican virtue. But his death received a more muted response
from the political elite of the new United States, who were
starting to be concerned with other things.27
93

CHAPTER THREE

Adams and the science of sincerity
Among those who refused to believe that Franklin could be all
that he seemed during his time in France was his fellow commissioner there, John Adams, who did not get along with
Franklin at all. Adams mistrusted Franklin’s brand of sincerity, which he considered to be pure hypocrisy, and cover for
his personal vanity. He was also frustrated by seeing Franklin,
who seemed to make no effort to keep things to himself, ﬂourish in the duplicitous world of European court politics,
whereas Adams, who wished to keep secrets, seemed unable
to do so. In large part, this was a matter of temperament.
Adams was an ambitious, highly intelligent but thin-skinned
man, and he lacked much of Franklin’s sense of ease with himself. He also lacked his ability to convey the impression that he
had nothing to hide, despite the fact that he gave more of himself away. In the words of his cousin Samuel Adams, John
Adams “was equally fearless of men and of the consequences
of a bold assertion of his opinion . . . He was a stranger to
dissimulation.”28
Yet Adams’s inability to dissimulate successfully was not
for want of trying, and nor did it reﬂect a lack of interest in the
philosophical literature on the subject. In a diary entry for August 19, 1770, when he was still making his way as a lawyer in
New England, Adams records his meeting with a Mr. Tyler,
who assures him that “the Author of the Fable of the Bees understood Human Nature and Mankind, better than any Man
that ever lived.” This provokes a series of reﬂections on the nature of “worldly wisdom” that continue in his entry for the
next day:
There are Times when and Persons to whom, I am not obliged
to tell what are my Principles and Opinions in Politicks or Religion. There are Persons whom in my Heart I despize; others I
abhor. Yet I am not obliged to inform the one of my Contempt,
94

THE ART OF SINCERITY

nor the other of my Detestation. This kind of Dissimulation,
which is no more than Concealment, Secrecy and Reserve, or in
other Words, Prudence and Discretion, is a necessary Branch of
Wisdom, and so far from being immoral and unlawfull, that [it]
is a Duty and a Virtue.29

This is close to Bacon, though expressed rather more moralistically (and with considerably more personal feeling). But perhaps conscious of his own problems in holding to such advice,
Adams did not think it wise to draw too many general conclusions on this basis. “It is difﬁcult to establish any certain Rule,
to determine what Things a Man may and what things he may
not lawfully conceal.”30
Adams preferred instead to consider the political implications that followed from the fact that human beings are difﬁcult to read. His political writings, published during and in
the aftermath of the Revolution, do not devote much attention
to the question of when people should be permitted to hide
the truth. Instead, Adams was interested in the constitutional
arrangements that best suit a species that cannot be relied on
to see past appearances. In this respect, Adams’s approach to
the problem of hypocrisy is the opposite of Franklin’s. Where
Franklin was interested in exploring how an individual could
retain a reputation for sincerity in a world of disguises, Adams
wanted to know how to govern a society in which everyone
could be so easily duped.
Adams’s sense that human beings could not be trusted to
recognise genuine virtue did not simply follow from his observations of the success of men like Franklin. It was also the result of his extensive reading in the classics of political realism,
which extended from Aristotle and Tacitus through to Bacon,
Hobbes, Mandeville, and Bolingbroke. On this basis, Adams
was able to construct his own science of the natural superﬁciality of man. He believed that the historical evidence, along
with personal experience, showed: ﬁrst, that all societies divided into the many and the few, and therefore must contain
95

CHAPTER THREE

an aristocratic as well as a democratic element; second, that an
ideal society would be one in which the few were made up of
the naturally virtuous; but third, that what people valued
above genuine virtue was simply the appearance of distinction
in whatever form, and the more visible the better. So real, as
opposed to ideal, aristocracies tended to be made up of the
well-born, the handsome, and the rich. This was not simply a
reﬂection of what human beings looked for in others; it was
also what they sought for themselves, for Adams also believed
that the most basic human desire was simply to be noticed. He
called this the “spectemur agendo”—the motivation to act under
observation—and he argued that no political society could
survive for long unless it took this passion seriously.
Given this, it is not hard to see why Adams, like Hobbes
and Mandeville before him, should have thought that it was a
waste of time to worry too much about everyday hypocrisy.
People can hardly help pretending to be better than they really
are, given that this was one of the surest ways to attract widespread attention. What exercised Adams, instead, was the
hypocrisy of those who sought to overlay the spectemur agendo
with high-blown language about virtue, integrity, and publicspiritedness. The dangers of this sort of hypocrisy were most
acute in a democratic or republican setting, where it might be
tempting to indulge in fantasies about the prevalence of genuine virtue, whereas under a monarchical or aristocratic form
of government the importance of superﬁcial distinctions
would be much more visible, and therefore harder to ignore.
In the aftermath of the Revolution, as Americans debated the
best constitutional arrangements for their new republic,
Adams became increasingly insistent on due recognition being given to the aristocratic element in political life. This led to
repeated accusations that he had been corrupted by his experiences among the aristocracies of Europe, or worse still, that he
had become a closet monarchist. As Thomas Jefferson was to
put it, many years later, “the glare of royalty and nobility, during his mission to England, had made him believe their fasci96

THE ART OF SINCERITY

nation a necessary ingredient in government.”31 But Adams
maintained that this was quite wrong. He was not arguing
in favour of aristocratic or monarchical government. He was
arguing against democratic hypocrisy.
There were many different strands to this argument. In his
extensive constitutional writings—including his monumental
Defence of the Constitutions of the United States (1786–1787)—
Adams drew on classical political thought to insist that political
stability required a balance of aristocratic and democratic orders. He wished to preserve a separate chamber of the legislature for the wealthy and the well-born, so that these superﬁcial
attributes might be on display where everyone could see them.32
He was deeply suspicious of the vogue for a single popular assembly (“unicameralism”) that seduced, among others, his
great rival Benjamin Franklin. The ﬂaw in this scheme was not
that it excluded the aristocratic elite, since it was impossible to
exclude such elites—the undeserving rich, in Adams’s terms,
are always with us. Rather, the problem with pure popular government was that it would provide a cover for aristocratic
machinations, and conceal the extent to which accidental qualities were still a signiﬁcant feature of all forms of politics. The
only way to promote genuine merit in republican politics was
not to make any assumptions about its inevitable triumph.
What was needed instead was a constitutional arrangement that
found space for virtue by separating it out from the mere appearance of distinction. This was the central lesson Adams took
from history: “The virtues have been the effect of the wellordered constitution, rather than the cause.”33
Also needed were the right incentives. Adams was deeply
opposed to the view that politicians should be expected to
serve the republic out of the goodness of their hearts, which
would simply open the door to more hypocrisy. As he put it
in a letter he wrote to the radical English clergyman John
Jebb in 1785: “Although there are enough disinterested men,
they are not enough in any age or any country to ﬁll all the
necessary ofﬁces, and therefore the people may depend
97

CHAPTER THREE

upon it, that the hypocritical pretence of disinterestedness
will be set up to deceive them, much oftener than the virtue
will be practised for their own good.” Hence Adams believed
that politicians should be paid for what they do. But as well
as receiving remuneration, politicians should also be rewarded with signs and symbols of distinction—the titles and
honours that traditionally attached to the holding of ofﬁce.
This would serve two purposes: ﬁrst, it would work on the
natural human appetite for popular attention, and thereby
attract as many people as possible into politics; second, it
would leave the appearance of virtue in the control of the republic, and take it out of the hands of the aristocracy. If a
state chose to avoid public symbols of distinction on the
grounds that they were spurious baubles, this would merely
generate the kind of political scheming it was designed to
forestall, because it would force people to dress up their
baser motives in the language of republican virtue. Without
due attention to the appearance of things, Adams believed,
you would simply end up with “a universal system of Machiavellian hypocrisy.”34
Adams came to these views in the years of turbulence and
political uncertainty that preceded the ratiﬁcation of the new
federal constitution. But the event that really conﬁrmed him
in them was the French Revolution. It inspired him to write
his most contentious work, the Discourses on Davila of 1790
(Davila was a seventeenth-century Italian historian of the
French civil wars whose writings Adams had discovered
through Bolingbroke).35 The Discourses were composed with a
number of audiences in mind, including the French themselves, whom Adams saw as likely to be tempted by their revolutionary adventures into the more absurd reaches of
republican hypocrisy. “frenchmen!,” he wrote,
Act and think like yourselves! . . . Acknowledging and boasting yourselves to be men, avow the feelings of men. The affectation of being exempted from passions is inhuman. The grave
98

THE ART OF SINCERITY

pretension to such singularity is solemn hypocrisy . . . Consider that government is intended to set bounds to passions
which nature has not limited.36

(A handwritten addition to Adams’s own copy of the Discourses ruefully notes: “Frenchmen neither saw, heard, nor felt
or understood any of this. J.A. 1813.”) His main target, however, was his fellow Americans, whom he saw as increasingly
stirred up by the imaginary vision of a new French dawn, and
therefore liable to be tempted into some damaging new
hypocrisies of their own. Adams reminded his readers that he
had lived in France, and though he understood the appeal of
French philosophical conceptions of natural virtue, he also
knew something of the character of the men who had produced them. “Go to Paris,” he wrote, witheringly. “How do
you ﬁnd the men of letters? united, friendly, harmonious,
meek, humble, modest, charitable? prompt to mutual forbearance? unassuming? ready to acknowledge superior merit?
zealous to encourage the ﬁrst symptoms of genius? Ask
Voltaire and Rousseau. . . .”37 Instead of indulging in fantasies
of French public-spiritedness, Americans would be better off
returning to the example of Great Britain, the durability of
whose constitutional arrangements testiﬁed to the importance
of taking men as they are, and balancing their natural impulses against each other. “[As] the world grows more enlightened,” Adams declared, “false inferences may be drawn from
it, which may make mankind wish for the age of dragons, giants and fairies.”38 France was becoming a land of rationalist
fairy tales; Britain, the traditional bogeyman of the American
political imagination, was the place where a realistic conception of politics might still be found.
Unfortunately for Adams, this was the wrong lesson at the
wrong time. Most Americans were in no mood to be told that
they should be looking to the British past, rather than the
French future, for their political inspiration. Equally, as Gordon S. Wood has argued, Adams’s preoccupation with Europe
99

CHAPTER THREE

and its history had perhaps blinded him to the genuine innovations contained in the new American federal constitution.39
Post-1787, politics could not simply be reduced to a choice between classical mixed government and doomed experiments
in the politics of democratic virtue. The U.S. Constitution offered another option, which was a government of separated
powers but not separate ranks, founded on the idea of popular
sovereignty but ﬁltered through the mechanism of political
representation.
Whether or not Adams understood the signiﬁcance of these
changes, he certainly turned out to have a tin ear for their political ramiﬁcations. The real problem with the Discourses was
that their arguments came to be confused in the public mind
with Adams’s error of judgment on the question of the appropriate titles for the high ofﬁces of the new federal state. In 1789
Congress had to decide what to call the new president. The
House of Representatives quickly came down on the side of
the plainest possible appellation—“George Washington, President of the United States.” But Adams, along with others in
the Senate, favoured something more regal, and suggested
“His Highness” or “His most benign Highness” or even “His
Majesty, the President.” Because titles played such an important part in Adams’s political architecture, and because he suspected that those who favoured republican simplicity were
invariably the worst hypocrites of all, he stuck to this position
for longer than anyone else, and far longer than was wise,
once it became clear that public opinion was decisively against
him. The controversy tarnished his reputation, and made him
a ﬁgure of fun (his portly appearance meant that he acquired
the nickname in the press of “His Rotundity”). It also made it
easier to portray his championing of the British conception of
mixed government as not merely old-fashioned, but positively
sinister.
Clearly Adams got himself on the wrong side of this question about titles, so far as his own political fortunes were concerned. But what about the wider question of where to set the
100

THE ART OF SINCERITY

limits of hypocrisy in politics? In many ways, Adams’s obsession with dressing up power in the trappings of distinction
was not so much evidence of his hypocrisy (as many believed)
but of his anti-hypocrisy. He shared a view that we have encountered already in this book: that what mattered was to protect politics from the hypocrisy of those who refused to
acknowledge the role that outward appearances played within
it. In other words, Adams was opposed to the second-order
hypocrisy of modern republicanism, and he contrasted it with
the ﬁrst-order hypocrisy of both classical republicanism and
constitutional monarchy. This did not mean that he wanted a
constitutional monarchy for the United States. Rather, it meant
that he feared a republic caught up in its own rhetoric would
lose control of the politics of superﬁcial appearance, and
thereby become prey to the far more dangerous hypocrisy of
spurious aristocratic virtue dressed up in democratic clothes.
No state could do without ceremony and show, but a state that
believed it was above these things was liable to succumb to
them in their most destructive forms.
Adams remained convinced that the subsequent history of
the French Revolution showed he was right about this. He
also came to suspect that the early history of the American republic also provided glimpses of worse to come. In the Discourses on Davila he wrote: “It is universally true, that in all
the republics now remaining in Europe, there is . . . a more
constant and anxious attention to [the] forms and marks of distinction than there is in the monarchies.” And in a handwritten
note in the margin dating from 1812, he added: “Our mock funerals of Washington, Hamilton, Ames, our processions, escorts, public dinners, balls, &c., are more expensive, more
troublesome, and inﬁnitely less ingenious.”40 If it was just a
question of dinners and balls, this would hardly seem to matter. But underlying all Adams’s warnings was a fear that the inescapable aristocratic element in American life—meaning the
fake aristocracy of birth, wealth, and looks rather than a true
aristocracy of virtue, merit, and talent—would be concealed
101

CHAPTER THREE

beneath the surface of a self-congratulatory democratic politics, where it could do more damage, and where it would remain less accountable. Do we really want to say that Adams
was wrong about this?
Where I think we can say Adams went wrong, however, is
in his failure to appreciate how hard it is to separate out ﬁrstorder from second-order hypocrisy. If anything, it was not that
he went too far in his desire to accommodate signs and symbols in the new democratic order—it was that he did not go far
enough. Adams believed that it ought to be possible to preserve at least one part of political life from empty rhetoric and
showmanship. This domain was the scientiﬁc study of politics, and Adams repeatedly complained that the most important political terms—like “monarchy,” “aristocracy,” and
“democracy”—were too often bandied about for effect, with
little or no attempt to take seriously their true meaning.
Adams revealed his own brand of republican sincerity when
he complained that the scientiﬁc language of politics was being “employed like paper money, to cheat the Widow and the
fatherless and every honest man.”41 Much better, in Adams’s
terms, to call the president “Your Highness” than to use a
term like “republic” without understanding what it really
meant.
But just as paper was destined to become the currency of
the United States, so words like “democracy” and “republic”
could not be preserved from the inevitable human tendency to
inﬂate the value of anything that has a surface appeal. It was
not possible to tolerate the trivial hypocrisies of political performance, yet somehow to preserve the integrity of the language needed to put these hypocrisies in context. This was a
classic academic’s mistake (and Adams, for all his varied career out in the world, was in some ways a classic academic). In
the politics of the new republic, everything was liable to superﬁcial treatment, including “scientiﬁc” arguments showing how
important it was to ﬁnd some accommodation with superﬁciality. Adams failed to appreciate that nothing could be placed out
102

THE ART OF SINCERITY

of bounds so far as political hypocrisy was concerned. In order
to deal with the threat posed by hypocrisy, one had to be prepared to encounter it everywhere, and from anyone.

Jefferson and the politics of sincerity
The politician who did most to exploit the weakness of
Adams’s position after the publication of the Discourses on
Davila was Thomas Jefferson. The occasion he used was the
appearance in the United States of a book that seemed to offer
a rebuke to Adams’s ﬁxation on the old idea of a mixed constitution. That book was Thomas Paine’s The Rights of Man,
which Jefferson passed on to a Philadelphia printer with a
note saying that it would serve as an answer to “the political
heresies that have sprung up amongst us.” When the volume
was published in the spring of 1791 with Jefferson’s endorsement prominent on the title page, most readers clearly understood that the heresies referred to were the ones contained in
the Discourses on Davila. Adams found himself on the receiving end of violent denunciations in the press, where he was accused of being a monarchist, a friend of the British, and an
enemy of republicanism everywhere. His son, John Quincy
Adams, came to his defence by publishing a series of responses to Jefferson under the pseudonym “Publicola,” but
this only made things worst (not least because many assumed
that “Publicola” was Adams senior). When Jefferson ﬁnally
wrote to Adams to explain himself, he pleaded innocence. The
endorsement of Paine, he said, had never been intended for
publication, and he was “thunderstruck” when he discovered
that it had been so used. Blame for the controversy rested with
Publicola, who had stirred things up, and with the increasing
trend for newspaper controversy more generally, from which
Jefferson deliberately kept himself aloof.
This was dissimulation. What Jefferson did not say was that
knew perfectly well that Publicola was not Adams himself but
103

CHAPTER THREE

his son; and nor did he admit that he had had Adams in mind
when he wrote the original note. When Adams responded to
this letter with some anger, Jefferson sent another in which he
moved from dissimulation to simulation, or what we would
now call lying. He told Adams that when he referred to “heresies,” so “far from naming you, I had not even in view any
writing which I might suppose to be yours.”42 Yet when Jefferson had written earlier to Washington to explain himself, he
had acknowledged that Adams was his target (Washington
was one of the people he most wished to be apprised of the
unpopularity of Adams’s views), blaming what followed on
the printer for making public what should have remained private. There can be no doubt that it was Jefferson who behaved
worst throughout this affair, but it was Adams who came out
worst in the end. The damage done to his reputation did not
prevent him from succeeding Washington as president in
1797, but the stigma of heretical monarchism clung to him,
and was ruthlessly exploited by Jefferson’s supporters in the
presidential election of 1800, which Adams lost, and Jefferson
eventually won.
For Bacon, the mark of the truly wise politician is to know
not simply how to dissemble, but also when, in extremis, to
embrace a lie. Jefferson got away with his lie, and once they
were both retired from public life he even managed to repair
his relationship with Adams as well. Yet Jefferson was something more than simply the model of a Baconian politician.
Part of the reason for this is that the type of politics he had to
embrace went beyond Bacon’s distinction between simulation
and dissimulation. The political battle between Adams and
Jefferson, particularly during the virulently abusive campaign of 1800, was carried out in the newspaper press by
proxies happy to peddle whatever dirt could do the most
damage to the opposing camp. Jefferson liked to claim he was
above all this, and that it was not his doing; nevertheless, he
was aware of it, he beneﬁtted from it, and he did nothing to

104

THE ART OF SINCERITY

stop it. Allowing falsehoods to gain currency while keeping
one’s own hands clean is something more than just dissimulating, and Jefferson’s aloofness in this context looks a lot like
hypocrisy—the hypocrisy of the politician who dissembles
about his own reliance on the lies of others. Yet some
hypocrisy is unavoidable here. Journalists, whatever they
might tell themselves, have different habits from politicians,
which means that the maintenance of a reputation for probity
is less important for them than creating a splash. Politicians,
meanwhile, whatever they might tell themselves, depend on
journalists to do their dirty work. In an ideal world, we might
wish politicians to do their own dirty work, but in the real
world, that would simply leave them exposed to the
hypocrisy of their rivals. To put it in Bacon’s terms, once there
exists a class of journalists for whom “the power to feign” has
become the main weapon in their armoury, then politicians
have less need of that power for themselves. Jefferson exploited this fact of modern political life, and he can hardly be
blamed for doing so.
However, it is important to note that Jefferson would never
dream of defending himself in such a “worldly-wise”
fashion—in this respect, Bacon’s terms were not Jefferson’s.
For all his worship of Bacon, it was the scientiﬁc Bacon Jefferson admired, not the purveyor of morally ambiguous snippets
of political wisdom. Like Franklin, Jefferson made it clear that
he rejected the subtlety of many of Bacon’s distinctions when
it came to personal sincerity, and believed instead in a more
straightforward and consistent truthfulness. In a letter he
wrote to his nephew in 1785 offering some advice about personal conduct, he stated:
Nothing is so mistaken as the supposition that a person is to
extricate himself from a difﬁculty, by intrigue, by chicanery, by
dissimulation, by trimming, by an untruth, by an injustice.
This increases the difﬁculties tenfold; and those who pursue

105

CHAPTER THREE

these methods get themselves so involved at length, that they
can turn no way but their infamy becomes more exposed.43

These strictures are hard to reconcile with Jefferson’s own
subsequent behaviour. Then again, this is not advice for a career politician, but for a young man ﬁrst making his way in the
world—it is closer to the advice that Franklin believed should
serve as the default position for everyday life.
Where Jefferson went further than Franklin was in his
explicit rejection of a Hobbesian conception of human motivation. He described the principles of Hobbes’s political philosophy as “humiliation to human nature,” and he held fast
throughout his life to the view that human beings were naturally sociable, and inclined towards virtue. He drew on the
Scottish Enlightenment response to Mandeville to argue that
virtue should not be opposed to our natural inclinations, but
understood rather as a natural tendency distinct from pure
selﬁshness. Doing good, Jefferson maintained, is consistent
with the pursuit of pleasure, because “nature hath implanted
in our breasts a love of others, a sense of duty to them, a moral
instinct in short.”44 This instinct could be cultivated and enhanced with the aid of education. As a result, there was no
need to see virtue as involving a necessary double standard:
with due care and attention, it ought to be possible for human
beings to do good without having to seem better than they really are. Jefferson’s view of the world, more than Franklin’s,
and certainly more than Adams’s, was a deliberate rejection of
Mandeville’s.
Nevertheless, for all this, Jefferson was never an apostle of
personal integrity in the manner of Thomas Paine. Paine’s own
public career was eventually destroyed by the publication of The
Age of Reason (1795), in which he made clear his belief that there
ought to be no limits to the truth, and no excuses for concealing
it, in private life, in politics, and above all in religion. Some of
Paine’s reasoning in favour of the imperative of sincerity was

106

THE ART OF SINCERITY

pragmatic—“so it is with pious fraud as with a bad action,” he
wrote at one point, “[that] it begets a calamitous necessity of going on”—and therefore not far from Jefferson’s. But he goes
further, and establishes a principle of “mental truthfulness”
by which everything else must be judged:
It is impossible to calculate the moral mischief . . . that mental
lying has produced on society. When a man has so far prostituted and corrupted the chastity of his mind as to subscribe his
professional belief to the things he does not believe, he has prepared himself for the commission of every other crime.45

Jefferson sympathised with this position, as he sympathised
personally with Paine when Paine found himself effectively
ruined for attempting to uphold it. But Jefferson never
adopted this position himself. That is, he never suggested that
individuals must always be true to what they really believe. Instead, he limited himself to saying that individuals who lose
the habit of truthfulness in the end lose their ability to know
what it is they believe. At the conclusion of his advice to his
nephew, he says: “This falsehood of the tongue leads to that of
the heart, and in time depraves all good dispositions.”46 Jefferson is working from the outer person to the inner person,
whereas Paine goes from the inner to the outer—from a corrupted chastity to wider moral mischief.
Likewise, when it came to politics, Jefferson reasoned from
the outside in, not from the inside out. He championed freedom of religion so that people might learn to be honest with
themselves, rather than suggesting that they must be honest
with themselves in order to have true freedom of religion. His
faith in democracy—in letting the people choose whom they
should be governed by, instead of seeking to protect them
from those who might exploit them—followed the same logic.
Only by providing the outward forms of democratic openness
could the people learn to recognise what true fraudulence in
politics consisted in. In a letter he wrote to John Adams in

107

CHAPTER THREE

1813, Jefferson claimed, somewhat disingenuously, that this
had been the sole ground of difference between them:
You think it best to put the pseudo-aristoi into a separate chamber of legislation, where they may be hindered from doing mischief . . . I think the best remedy is exactly that provided by all
our institutions, to leave to the citizens the free election and
separation of the aristoi from the pseudo-aristoi.47

By aristoi Jefferson meant the genuinely virtuous; by pseudoaristoi he meant the holders of the empty titles of birth and
rank. Later on in the same letter, he refers to the “tinselaristocracy,” whose fake virtues only democracy can expose.
The phrase is reminiscent of Franklin’s use of the term “tinsel
habits” to describe the superﬁcial wisdom of the cunning.
Democracy, for Jefferson, was the homespun dress of political
honesty, by which the trappings of political privilege might be
exposed.
The problem, though, was that democracy was more than
this, as Jefferson was well aware. It was also a battle for power,
between factions of people willing to deploy whatever weapons
were to hand to secure their own advantage. In the early years
of the republic, these factions took the form of parties who
fought about most things, including the French Revolution,
monarchism, democracy, money, and titles, as well as the personal characters of both Thomas Jefferson and John Adams.
Jefferson, given his attachment to an ideal of democratic sincerity, was publicly committed to seeing all this factionalism
and name-calling as essentially superﬁcial. As he famously
put it in his ﬁrst inaugural address, having emerged victorious
and relatively unscathed from the seething pit of American
electoral politics: “We have called by different names brethren
of the same principle. We are all republicans—we are all federalists.”48 But in his private letters he painted a somewhat different picture. There he suggested that the divisions between
the parties corresponded to a deep division in human nature,

108

THE ART OF SINCERITY

between the “Honest men” on the one hand, and the “Rogues”
on the other. Or as he put it in a letter he wrote in the early
years of his presidency:
The division between whig and tory is founded on the nature
of men, the wealthy and nerveless, the rich and the corrupt seeing more safety and accessibility in a strong executive; the
healthy, ﬁrm and virtuous feeling conﬁdence in their physical
and moral resources, and willing to part with only so much
power as is necessary for their good government.49

Once the ﬁght is put in these terms, there could only be one
winner—the Whigs/Republicans would defeat the Tories/Federalists, because they had right, strength, and the people on
their side. “I believe,” Jefferson wrote in 1797, “and here, I am
sure, that the great mass is republican.”50
Jefferson wanted to believe that underneath the spurious
acrimony of party politics there was a real divide between
courage and cowardice that democracy would bring to the surface. But how then to explain the persistence of acrimonious
party politics, with all its name-calling and chicanery, within
American democracy? One answer was to suggest that this was
in fact a reﬂection of the triumph of republicanism, and that
the party divisions were simply a function of underlying
agreement on principles. “I always expected,” Jefferson wrote
towards the end of his presidency, when the Federalists were
in some disarray, “that whatever names the parties might
bear, the real division would be into moderate or ardent republicanism.”51 As time went on, however, Jefferson started to
believe that something else was happening beneath the surface. When the Federalists abandoned their original name and
started to pass themselves off as Republicans, Jefferson warned
that “the amalgamation is of name only . . . Hence new Republicans in Congress preaching the doctrines of the old Federalists.”52 In 1823, he wrote that the Federalists “have shrunk from
the odium of their old appellation, taken to themselves a partici-

109

CHAPTER THREE

pation of ours . . . under the pseudo-republican mask.”53 And
in one of his last letters from 1825, he declared:
The common division of whig and tory, or according to our denominations of republican and federal . . . is the most salutary
of all divisions, and right, therefore, to be fostered instead of
being amalgamated. For take away this and some more dangerous principle of division will take its place.54

This is not so far removed from Adams, notwithstanding the
fact that it is speciﬁcally designed to make the difference between Jefferson’s party and Adams’s party clear. Better, Jefferson is saying, as Adams had once said, to have the
undeserving lined up where you can see them, rather than
hiding behind the empty titles of republicanism.
Jefferson’s shifts on the question of party politics—from
seeing its divisions as integral to seeing them as superﬁcial
to seeing them as integral again—is a reﬂection of the inherent tension in his idea of democratic sincerity. One the one
hand, the rise of democracy meant that the party of the
pseudo-aristoi—the Federalists—should be defeated, as indeed they ultimately were. On the other hand, the persistence of party politics meant that the defeated party could
hide behind the cover of false names. Another way to put this
is as follows: if democracy worked in the way Jefferson
hoped, then party divisions should become superﬁcial, because under the surface republican principles will have triumphed; but if party divisions have become superﬁcial, that
would work to the advantage of the class of men who had
previously been represented by the Federalists, and were
happiest playing around with titles. Party disputes, according to Jefferson’s view of the world, ought to be trivial, because people are naturally sociable and democratic virtue is
unstoppable. But if we are to have such disputes, it is preferable in the end for them to be nontrivial, so that those who
oppose the Jefferson view of the world should have nowhere
to hide.
110

THE ART OF SINCERITY

This tension caused Jefferson to shift on other questions
too. A free press, for example, which formed a crucial part of
Jefferson’s faith in openness of popular opinion, also caused
him deep misgivings when it failed to live up to its democratic billing. “Nothing now can be believed which is seen in
a newspaper,” he wrote to a friend in 1807. “Truth itself becomes suspicious by being put into that polluted vehicle.”55
Newspapers, like political parties, ought to be nonpartisan
enough to be vehicles of truth, but also openly partisan enough
not to serve as cover for falsehood. It is easy to portray this as
having it both ways. Jefferson liked newspapers that supported his version of the truth and disliked those that did not,
which meant, among other things, that he liked newspapers
that rubbished the purported truths of his enemies. The Jefferson who complained about newspapers in 1807 was also
the Jefferson who rose to the presidency on the back of them
in 1800. Likewise, the Jefferson who wanted democracy to triumph over the party system was also the Jefferson who did
most to ensure the victory of his own party in the rough and
tumble of democratic politics.
This then leads us to the inevitable question: was Jefferson a
hypocrite? All these seeming inconsistencies, coupled with
Jefferson’s obvious relish for power, and his readiness to use it
while president in spite of his own view that a taste for a
strong executive was the mark of a rogue, make it hard to resist seeing him in this light, and that’s before we even get to
the question of slavery. Certainly John Adams, from early on,
thought he knew Jefferson’s type. When, in 1793, Jefferson retired to Monticello, apparently sick of public life, Adams wrote
to his son John Quincy:
Jefferson thinks he shall by this step get a reputation of a humble, honest, meek man, wholly without ambition or vanity. He
may even have deceived himself into this belief. But if the
prospect opens, the world will see . . . he is ambitious as Oliver
Cromwell.56
111

CHAPTER THREE

Others have gone further. In one of the greatest of all novels
about modern politics, Gore Vidal’s Burr (written from the
perspective of Jefferson’s one-time vice president Aaron Burr,
whom Jefferson eventually put on trial for treason), Jefferson
is portrayed as the ultimate hypocrite: a man of limitless sanctimony, vain, preening, cold-hearted and ruthless, always
willing to dress up his personal failings in the garb of republican sincerity—to the extent that he refused to deliver his presidential addresses to Congress in person because that would
be “monarchical,” and therefore had a clerk read them for
him, when the truth was that his weak nerves and reedy voice
simply made him dread public speaking. “Had Jefferson not
been a hypocrite I might have admired him,” Vidal has Burr
say. “After all, was he not the most successful empire-builder
of our century, succeeding where Bonaparte failed. But then
Bonaparte was always candid when it came to motive, and Jefferson was always dishonest.”57
Burr, however, is history written from the loser’s point of
view. The other unavoidable fact about Jefferson, as even Burr
has to concede (“in the end, candour failed; dishonesty prevailed”), is just how successful Jefferson’s brand of hypocrisy
proved. This is the alternative view: that what its victims see as
hypocrisy was from a different perspective simply masterful
politics. Even one of John Adams’s most recent admirers, C.
Bradley Thompson, who has attempted to resurrect Adams’s
reputation as a political theorist, is forced to admit he was
thoroughly outmanoeuvred by Jefferson the politician. “Unlike John Adams, who always put his cards on the table,
Thomas Jefferson was a master at palming his ace. He may
very well have been the greatest politician of his generation.”58
This palming of the ace is an image with strong echoes of
Bacon, suggestive perhaps of great cunning but not great wisdom. But in Bacon’s terms, the successful deployment of cunning is the mark of true wisdom, because it can only reward
those who understand its limits. If this is political wisdom,
Jefferson had it.
112

THE ART OF SINCERITY

Jefferson also had his own understanding of politics as a
game of cards. In a letter he wrote to a political supporter,
John Taylor, in 1798, in the early days of the Adams presidency, he counselled patience:
If the game sometimes runs against us at home, we must have
patience till the luck turns, and then we shall have an opportunity of winning back the principles we have lost. For this is a
game where principles are the stake.59

It is an arresting image, and a quintessentially Jeffersonian
one. Politics is a game played with principles, and shot
through with luck. How, one might ask, can these be genuine
principles if one is willing to stake them? But it is an essential
part of Jefferson’s political outlook to suppose that these two
things can be combined, and what is more, to imagine that in
the great game of politics, those whose principles are the right
ones will be better equipped to ride out the luck and win in
the end. In this way, Jefferson’s conception of politics could accommodate both high strategy and high principles. That, indeed, is what it was designed to do.
It does not make sense, therefore, to accuse Jefferson of the
crude hypocrisy of the anti-hypocrite—to see him as someone
who could not live up to his own standards of political integrity. His standards of integrity were intended to be ﬂexible,
and were not simply anti-hypocritical. He was more ﬂexible
than Franklin, because he was more political, and more ﬂexible than Adams, because he was less rigid in his distinction
between ﬁrst-order and second-order hypocrisy. Even one
of Jefferson’s most famous early statements of political
principle—his declaration, in his 1774 pamphlet A Summary
View of the Rights of British America, that “the whole art of government consists in the art of being honest”—which is often
taken to offer a rebuke to his later political behaviour when in
ofﬁce, is in fact nothing of the sort.60 The key term here is not
“honest” but “art.” Politics, for Jefferson, was an artiﬁcial exercise in honesty, in which what mattered was preserving one’s
113

CHAPTER THREE

room for manoeuvre by preserving one’s reputation for integrity. In this, he was simply following Bolingbroke, almost
to the letter.
But Jefferson went beyond Bolingbroke in a number of respects. He was more successful by far (Bolingbroke’s own career was marked by a conspicuous failure either to achieve his
objectives or to reach high ofﬁce). He also understood the
democratic extension of the art of honesty, which brought in
an element of playing to the gallery that Bolingbroke would
have disdained. But perhaps most importantly, Jefferson had
an extra element to his personality that Bolingbroke lacked,
the one that Adams identiﬁed when he compared him to
Cromwell: Jefferson was ready to take himself at face value—
to believe in the best of himself—which can be crucial in maintaining a reputation for principled political action. He did not
worry too much about whether his high principles could survive being staked in the low game of politics, and he did not
think that they needed to be adapted accordingly. He simply
trusted in his own ability to maintain his integrity. Whether
this should qualify as a form of self-deception, as Adams suggests, is a very difﬁcult question to answer.
What it does suggest, however, is that there is another
model of the successful politician to which Jefferson conforms, and that is Mandeville’s, for whom Cromwell also provided a template. Like Mandeville’s Cromwell, Jefferson
understood the conjuncture of the age in which he lived, and
he sought to achieve a form of political sincerity that suited it.
Equally, as with Mandeville’s Cromwell, that form of sincerity
was a mixture of knowingness and a certain lack of selfknowledge, or at least of self-scrutiny. This enabled him to negotiate the game of politics without succumbing either to
excessive artiﬁce or excessive innocence. Adams saw the political need for artiﬁce but could not ﬁnd a sufﬁcient place for
innocence; Franklin saw the political need for innocence but
could not ﬁnd a sufﬁcient place for artiﬁce. Jefferson found a
place for both.
114

THE ART OF SINCERITY

But it is easier to internalise the conﬂicting dynamics of
political hypocrisy and political sincerity when the political
tides are running your way. The tide started to turn against
Jefferson towards the end of his life, at which point he became a man out of time, as John Adams had been for much of
his political life. The issue that did it, ironically, was slavery.
The Missouri Compromise of 1820, which divided the
United States into slave and nonslave territories according to
a geographical principle adopted by Congress, horriﬁed Jefferson, who believed it spelled the “the knell of the Union.”61
It also spelled the end of the old party divisions, which became subsumed under new distinctions between “democratic” and “national” republicans. It was in the aftermath of
this that Jefferson made his plea to go back to the old divisions between “whig” and “tory,” and the old names, which
at least had the merit of transparency. As it was, political
principle had become attached to “a geographical line,” and
the line between the parties had been overlain with new
names and confused identities. So Jefferson found himself in
the position Adams had been a generation earlier, demanding that a limit be set to political hypocrisy, that “pseudo”principles be lined up where one can see them, and that the
words used to describe the essence of politics should not get
mixed up with more superﬁcial distinctions. The fact that
Jefferson’s warnings were worth heeding, just as Adams’s
had been, and were a mark of intellectual honesty that went
beyond the “art” of honesty that Jefferson had displayed in
government, should not blind us to another fact about his
predicament: this kind of honesty can also be a sign of political weakness.

115

]

]

4

BENTHAM AND THE UTILITY OF FICTION

Hypocrisy and utilitarianism

One way of thinking about hypocrisy, as we have seen, is as
the wearing of masks, with the intention to conceal or deceive.
Countering hypocrisy seems to require the removal of the
mask. In the history of modern political thought, Jeremy Bentham (1748–1832) stands out as a thinker for whom the business of unmasking was integral to everything he did. H.L.A.
Hart, the greatest twentieth-century commentator on Bentham’s work, has described the central theme running through
it as “demystiﬁcation.”1 Bentham himself put it in these terms:
his task was to join with those others “whose care it has been
to pluck the mask of Mystery from the face of Jurisprudence.”2 And not only jurisprudence: throughout his career,
Bentham sought to peel back the layers of obscurity and deliberate deception that had concealed the truth about politics, religion, private and public morality. What Bentham hated, more
than anything, was the hypocritical concealment of the basic
facts of social existence behind a mask of apparently superior
wisdom. It seems to make sense, therefore, to place Bentham
among those political theorists for whom hypocrisy and
truth-telling stand in direct opposition to one another, and
who take the side of openness against concealment. If anyone

116

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

does, it is Bentham who appears to belong in the list of liberal
rationalists who have no time for hypocrisy.
But it is not as simple as that. As always, it very much depends what sort of concealment we are talking about, and Bentham was well aware that not all hypocrisies are the same.
Take, for example, his attitude to that great exemplar of the
problem of hypocrisy in modern politics, Oliver Cromwell. In
his Introduction to the Principles of Morals and Legislation, Bentham borrows an example from Hume’s History of England to
illustrate how easy it is for people to conceal their true feelings
behind an outward show of emotion:
A man may exhibit . . . the exterior appearances of grief, without really grieving at all, or at least in anything near the proportion in which he appears to grieve. Oliver Cromwell, whose
conduct indicated a heart more than usually callous, was as remarkably profuse with tears . . . To have this kind of command
over one’s self, was the characteristic of the excellence of the orator of ancient times, and is still that of the player in our own.3

Even though Bentham hardly shared Hume’s politics, this
passage might suggest that he shared much of Hume’s suspicion of political operators like Cromwell, who could put on an
act as the occasion demanded. Far from it, however. Bentham
adored Cromwell, tears and all. In a letter he wrote in 1817 to
“The Citizens of the United States” (offering, with typical
bravado, to codify their laws for them), Bentham described
Cromwell as “that wonderful man,” and lamented the absence
of his reforming zeal from the world as he now found it: “The
spirit which animated the English in those days is no more—
we are content to be ‘cheated’, we are content to be ‘abused’.”4
What Bentham loved about Cromwell was that he was not content to be cheated or abused, but sought instead to expose the
hidden workings of power, particularly as concealed behind
the mumbo-jumbo of law and established religion. In other
words, Cromwell was himself an unmasker, and the fact that

117

CHAPTER FOUR

he might have had to put on a mask in order to perform that
role was neither here nor there. Bentham saw clearly the
distinction between being a hypocrite in the means of personal conduct and a truth-seeker in public ends.
But Cromwell’s tears were not highlighted by Bentham in
order to make a point about political power. Rather, Bentham
was making a different but related point, that those who make
the law should not fall into the trap of assuming that people
are what they seem. Cromwell’s behaviour shows that the visible manifestations of the human passions are not always to be
trusted, and the legislator who seeks to regulate our affairs
should not take everything at face value. A certain amount of
dissembling is a fact of life. But Bentham goes further than
this, particularly in his later writings—he does not simply
think that dissembling is unavoidable; he also thinks it is socially useful. In his Deontology of 1829, in which he outlines his
understanding of the virtues, Bentham argues in favour of the
merits of the polite concealment of one’s true feelings. For example: “Let a man be naturally ever so stupid, do not let him
see, much less give him to understand, that you think him
so.”5 Likewise, “if a man is doing or saying anything which is
unpleasant to you, instead of directing him to cease, rather
propose something else.”6 The Deontology is a surprising book
in many ways. There is advice on how to behave in all sorts of
tricky social situations, even including an extended passage
on problem of how to behave when someone is suffering from
wind at the dinner table. Like Hobbes, Bentham was very interested in the ways that smells bring out the unavoidable
double standards of human behaviour: smells we don’t mind
when produced by ourselves are repugnant to us when produced by others. So we need to be very careful:
Solid, liquid or gaseous, the contents of one man’s stomach are
not agreeable to the sense of smell of another. As often as a portion of gas makes its way from your stomach, be careful therefore so to direct the course of it, that no person in the whole
118

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

company shall be within range of it. By a turn of the head while
at table, this may always be managed. But if, sitting with his
face to company, a man stops the blast by keeping his lips
closed, and then it suffers to escape without change of position,
the consequence is that, by the tensed state of the lips, the
whole company feel themselves threatened with the explosion,
and whether the smell does or does not reach the organ so as
to affect the sense, uneasiness is produced by the apprehension
of it.7

Bentham being Bentham, this is somewhat complicated advice, and it is not always easy to see how it should be followed.
But what is clear is that he believes that in these circumstances
a certain amount of deliberate concealment of the truth is desirable.
Bentham is very aware in the Deontology that he is giving
what his readers will recognise as eighteenth-century advice
in a nineteenth-century setting. In a striking comparison, he
admits that what he has to say about a whole range of questions of appropriate etiquette is not that different from the
guidance available from Lord Chesterﬁeld, whose Letters to
His Son (ﬁrst published in 1774) had by this point replaced
Mandeville’s Fable of the Bees as the wickedest social manual of
them all.8 Like Chesterﬁeld, Bentham is advocating what
many would regard as rank hypocrisy: the concealment of
selﬁsh motives behind a mask of civilised behaviour. Where he
differs from Chesterﬁeld, Bentham says, is not in the sorts of
dissimulation he sanctions, but in the reasons he is able to give
to justify this kind of behaviour: he, unlike Chesterﬁeld, has a
system that is able to reconcile selﬁshness with social
beneﬁts—it is called the system of utilitarianism. In utilitarian
terms, it is absurd to think of publicly beneﬁcial actions motivated by self-regarding interests as hypocrisy. Instead, such
behaviour is the very deﬁnition of virtue. The other advantage
of Bentham’s system, he claims, is that it reveals the limits of
politeness. “In the forms of politeness so-called,” Bentham
119

CHAPTER FOUR

says, “there is much unnecessary lying.”9 One example he
gives is the Spanish saying “This house is yours (mi casa es su
casa),” which “is to tell a lie to no purpose whatever.”10 Here is
the clearest possible indication that Bentham is not simply on
the side of truth as against lies—he is also on the side of useful
as against unnecessary lies.
In deﬁning virtue in utilitarian terms, Bentham was clearly
distancing himself from Mandeville, for whom socially beneﬁcial selﬁshness is only ever, at best, the simulacrum of true
virtue, and never the real thing. Nevertheless, Bentham
strongly echoes Mandeville elsewhere in his writings when he
makes clear what he does consider to be hypocrisy in moral
matters. In his Table of the Springs of Action (1815), Bentham
contrasts utilitarianism with what had come to be known as
“sentimentalism,” the late-eighteenth- and early-nineteenthcentury doctrine that prized benevolence and fellow feeling as
integral to human nature, whose roots can be traced all the
way back to Shaftesbury and whose inﬂuence extended
through to the political thought of the American Revolution
and beyond. Bentham was a staunch anti-sentimentalist, and it
is perhaps no coincidence that he struck up a personal friendship with Aaron Burr, the most anti-sentimental of all the
American founders—John Adams notwithstanding—and the
man who came to supplant Adams as Thomas Jefferson’s
archrival.11
We do not know what Bentham’s view was of Jefferson—
though if his main source of information was Burr, then we
can be sure it would not have been favourable—but we do
know that what he disliked about sentimentalism was the
scope it offered for hypocrisy. The utilitarian, Bentham believed, can never dress up his self-denial as anything more
than displaced self-interest; the sentimentalist, by contrast,
may come to believe that he has genuinely put the interests of
his fellow creatures ﬁrst. This, says Bentham, is the philosophy of the hypocrite. “The utilitarian can never serve sinister
interests by his doctrine,” Bentham claims. “The sentimental120

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

ist, often [does]. He preaches the doctrine of self-denial, generosity etc., that others may practice it for his beneﬁt.”12 Utilitarian self-denial, in Bentham’s words, “confesses [its]
selﬁshness,” whereas sentimentalist self-denial tries to hide
it.13 Like Mandeville, and in some senses like Adams as well,
Bentham believed that the worst sort of moral hypocrisy was
hypocrisy about the self-serving roots of socially useful behaviour.

Hypocrisy and empty words
In all these respects, Bentham’s attitude to hypocrisy sounds
like an amalgam of ideas we have encountered already. But
what it does not convey is Bentham’s distinctive sense of the
role language can play in disguising people’s true motives for
action. For Bentham, the real danger with hypocrisy was not
that it allowed people to pretend to be what they were not, but
that it left people unable to distinguish between meaningful
discourse and mere babble. We might have to wear masks to
hide our own feelings, Bentham accepted, but words themselves should not become a way of masking reality. The best
way to capture the essence of Bentham’s anxieties here is to
look away from his moral philosophy and instead at what he
has to say about the problem of hypocrisy in the context of a
very speciﬁc controversy, one that combines his worries about
the interplay between the languages of law, religion, and politics.
In 1813, Bentham delivered a pamphlet in Oxford entitled
Swear Not At All (“Containing an Exposure of the Needlessness and Mischievousness as well as Anti-Christianity of the
Ceremony of an Oath”). It is a typical Bentham production—
overlong, hard to follow, endlessly discursive, excessively
technical, but also very funny in places, and with a core of
good sense running all the way through it like a sliver of steel.
It contains Bentham’s views about the absurdity of requiring
121

CHAPTER FOUR

people to swear oaths before taking up certain ofﬁces, binding
them to uphold the terms of that ofﬁce, and binding God to
punish them if they should stray. Its particular target was the
requirement that members of Oxford and Cambridge universities should have to promise by oath to abide by statutes that
governed membership of those two institutions. The central
thrust of his case is given in the pamphlet’s extensive subtitle,
which says, among other things, that it will contain “a Proof of
the open and persevering contempt of moral and religious
principle, perpetuated by [such oaths], and rendered universal in the two Church-of-England Universities, more especially in the University of Oxford.”14
Now, the practice of requiring people to swear to be good in
God’s name before taking up some beneﬁcial position looks
like an obvious invitation to hypocrisy: it will inevitably encourage some people to say things they don’t really believe,
and to affect religious convictions they don’t actually possess,
in order to get on. Bentham’s subtitle seems to promise an argument of this kind. But in fact, that is not his concern at all.
What Bentham detests about oaths is that no one can possibly
mean them, whatever the state of his own religious beliefs:
they are absurd because the words are meaningless in themselves (in particular, Bentham thinks it is pointless to seek to
bind God in some kind of pseudo-contractual arrangement to
punish malefactors—“so help me God,” etc.—since if God is
God, he will punish whom he likes). So the hypocrisy Bentham is warning against is not the hypocrisy of the people
who take these oaths without meaning them, but the
hypocrisy of the people who continue to insist on their necessity. “This instrument of priestcraft,” Bentham writes, “has
been made an instrument of deceit, hypocrisy and mischief in
the hands of lawyercraft.”15 It is the people who draw up
oaths who are the real hypocrites.
Bentham’s essential unconcern with ﬁrst-order hypocrisy is
made clear by the distinction he draws between Oxford and
Cambridge universities in the pamphlet. Every member of
122

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

Oxford University, he says, is a perjurer, because at Oxford it
is a requirement to swear to obey the statutes of the university.
Given that these statutes included such rules as pledging “not
to walk about in an idle manner in the city or its suburbs,” no
one can possibly mean it when he swears to abide by them,
since walking about in an idle manner is more or less the point
of going to university. In Cambridge, by contrast, no one has
ever had to perjure himself, because there the oath only requires that members of the university should agree to submit
to punishment if they do break the rules. This is a difference
Bentham traces back to the civil war: Oxford pledges obedience because it was an essentially Royalist university; Cambridge pledges mere submission because it was a hotbed of
Presbyterianism. But as far as Bentham is concerned, the
pledge of submission is a pointless one: everyone submits to
punishment in the act of being punished, so all the Cambridge
oath means is that anyone who provokes the university authorities to take punitive action will indeed have provoked
them to take punitive action. In the “purpose of sincerity,”
Bentham concludes, Oxford and Cambridge might be considered very different places: Oxford is full of hypocrites, and
Cambridge is not.16 But in point of what Bentham calls “the
impropriety of the ceremony,” the two places are just the
same. This is because in both universities people are required
to utter meaningless pledges under oath, and the pledges are
equally meaningless whether they can’t be upheld (as in Oxford), or they can’t not be upheld (as in Cambridge). Hence
the title of the pamphlet, which is taken from the New
Testament—the injunction there, as Bentham points out, is not
“Ye shall not swear falsely,” but “Swear Not At All.”17
The hypocrisy Bentham hates is the hypocrisy of empty
words masking real power. In the case of Oxford and Cambridge, what is being hidden is a mixture of laziness and
something more sinister: it is the laziness of those who endlessly put off reforming the governance of their universities on
a rational basis, coupled with their sense that were they to do
123

CHAPTER FOUR

so, other irrational aspects of university life (what is taught,
who is admitted, who enjoys the privileges) would be
exposed. Bentham’s overriding conviction is that words that
lack meaning are only insisted on by people with something
to hide. Equally, however, he is happy to accept that words that
do mean something can serve their purpose even when people
do not mean them when they say them. What he calls “imposture” may be a necessary evil, particularly in circumstances of
political oppression—priests, for example, may have to perform ceremonies in which they do not believe in order to curb
the power of military rulers (the example he gives in the pamphlet is that of Jephthah, forced by an oath to sacriﬁce his own
daughter following a victory in battle, not because the priests
genuinely believed such sacriﬁces were divinely ordained, but
because they were a means to establish unequivocally the limits of his power).18 Bentham distinguishes between empty
words and fake beliefs: the former can only ever serve sinister
interests, but the latter may be a useful weapon in the hands
of those who genuinely seek the public good. After all, as Bentham says, “if fraud could never be employed but to the promotion of happiness, fraud would not be vice, but virtue.”19
This line of argument comes at the end of Swear Not At All,
in an extended historical discussion that is designed to teach
an explicitly anti-Hobbesian lesson: that fraud may be needed
to counter despotism, or arbitrary power. Bentham was
adamantly opposed to the Hobbesian idea that rulers should
not be subject to constraint by those over whom they rule.
Hence the need sometimes for priests to dissemble in order to
bring tyrants to heel. But despite these political differences between them, Bentham’s central concerns with the problems of
hypocritical language echo Hobbes in a number of important
respects. Above all, they echo Hobbes’s treatment of the relationship between deceptive language and deceptions about
power. This makes Bentham a kind of anti-Hobbesian Hobbesian, which is not an easy or comfortable thing to be. It leaves
him open to the charge of inconsistency, and perhaps even of
124

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

hypocrisy. But it is one of the themes of this book that just because you are open to the charge of hypocrisy, that does not
mean you are wrong. There is a lot to be said for Bentham’s attempt to circumscribe a Hobbesian view of power with arguments that have their own roots in Hobbes’s ideas about
political language and how it should be deployed. I want to go
back to Hobbes brieﬂy to explore what he has to say about the
misuse of language, before returning to Bentham, to see where
he differs from Hobbes, and where therefore his distinctive
contribution to the understanding of political hypocrisy lies.

Inconstant and insigniﬁcant language
In chapter 4 of Leviathan (“Of Speech”), Hobbes highlights two
particular ways in which language can fail to communicate
properly. One consists of what he calls “words insigniﬁcant”:
these are words that don’t mean anything, that are simply
empty sounds. The other is what he calls “inconstant” names.
These are the names of qualities that mean different things to
different people, “because all men are not like affected with
the same thing,” so that we give things different labels depending on whether they please us or not.20 This is the problem I discussed in the ﬁrst chapter, which Hobbes speciﬁcally
relates to the names of the virtues—the fact that “one man calleth Wisdome, what another feare,” and so on. But the point I
want to make here is that inconstant and insigniﬁcant terms
pose different kinds of problems from each other. Insigniﬁcant
terms are inconstant by deﬁnition—they can mean whatever
you want them to mean—but inconstant terms are not always
insigniﬁcant. That is the problem.
To borrow one example from Hobbes’s own list of inconstant names: “stupidity” is not a word that fails to signify anything meaningful (Hobbes pointedly says that words of this
kind are of “inconstant signiﬁcation” rather than of “insigniﬁcation”). We all pretty much know what “stupid” means—it
125

CHAPTER FOUR

means slow-witted or otherwise unable to think clearly. The
difﬁculty is that we can’t agree who has this defect, because if
we like what someone says and does, we won’t want to call it
stupid—we will call it something else (the antonym Hobbes
suggests is “grave”). Take someone like George W. Bush,
whose entire political career has been dogged by an ongoing
disagreement about whether or not he is in fact stupid. The
problem here is not that we don’t know what it means to be
stupid; the problem is that for people who dislike what Bush
says, the stumbling manner in which he says it is a sign of his
stupidity, but for people who like what he says, that selfsame
manner is evidence of his gravity, or even, for many, of his sincerity, which is precisely another such inconstant term. (There
is, of course, a further possible view, which is that Bush is
merely pretending to be stupid in order to pose as a man of
the people, and mask what he is really up to; but this possibility is hardly likely to resolve the disagreement as to what
counts as stupidity.) In a sense, the difﬁculty with inconstant
terms like these is not that they signify too little, but too
much—not only the perceived nature of the entity referred to,
but also, as Hobbes puts it, “the nature, disposition and interest” of the person who does the perceiving.21
For Hobbes, both inconstant and insigniﬁcant terms are potentially very dangerous—they stand in the way of true ratiocination. The major difference between them, however, is that
the dangers of inconstant language are manageable. Indeed,
the management of these terms is a large part of what
Hobbes’s civil science is about.22 They can be managed in two
ways. First, the dangers of inconstancy can be neutralised by
political authority, which provides a framework of authorised
meanings within which linguistic differences can be contained. In a civil society, it is the sovereign’s job to make sure
that arguments about what counts as courage, say, don’t get
out of hand. The other way inconstancy can be rendered relatively harmless is through metaphor. This is because metaphors, in Hobbes’s terms, can “profess their inconstancy.”23
126

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

And this explains why Hobbes, the champion of clear and
open language, was not being hypocritical in resorting as he
did in Leviathan to metaphors in order to communicate his
vision of politics (the book is replete with them, from its title
on).24 Metaphors can be useful in communicating ideas without unravelling the sense of the terms being used, because
they are not trying to hide anything.
Insigniﬁcant terms, by contrast, are never useful, and never
manageable (and also, by implication, never properly metaphorical). No one should use them, not even—especially not
even—sovereigns. Because they fail to signify anything meaningful, they can only ever be an attempt to obscure the truth.
For instance, it is not clear how an insigniﬁcant term could
profess its insigniﬁcance (as an inconstant term can profess its
inconstancy). If I make it clear to you that in talking gibberish
I am talking gibberish, all I give you is a reason to stop listening. That is why insigniﬁcant language always has to pretend
to be something it is not, which is what makes it, in the term
we still use about it today, “pretentious.”
Hobbes distinguishes between two kinds of insigniﬁcance:
ﬁrst, new words that don’t mean anything, such as the empty
technical language of “the Schoolmen” (i.e., the Aristotelians
who dominated university life in the ﬁrst half of the seventeenth century) and all other such academic jargon; and second, familiar words that can mean something on their own,
but can’t mean anything when used in conjunction with each
other, because they are contradictory, as in the phrase “incorporeal body,” or, more pointedly for Hobbes, “free subject.”
People who talk like this must have something to hide, because there is never a good reason to deploy language in this
way. Inconstant terms, on the other hand, are an important
part of language, and cannot simply be avoided—they need to
be handled carefully. So deploying inconstant terms, as I tried
to show in the ﬁrst chapter, does not make one a hypocrite in
Hobbes’s eyes, except when they are used to hide the truth
about political power (by redescribing disobedience in the
127

CHAPTER FOUR

terms of justice, and so on). But making language insigniﬁcant
is always a form of the worst kind of hypocrisy, because it
seeks to conceal the basis of political order, which is meaningful communication.
Bentham shares more or less entirely Hobbes’s view about
the dangers of meaningless language, though he expresses
it in slightly different terms. Like Hobbes, he thinks that all
meaningful words are the names of things, but that some
words only pretend to be the names of things, when in fact
they don’t refer to anything at all. Some such words are not in
themselves meaningless on Bentham’s account, but nevertheless refer to things that cannot exist, as for example with a
term like “unicorn,” which means something relatively unambiguous (a white horse-like creature with a horn on its head)
but doesn’t refer to anything real. Bentham called such things
“non-entities.” But other words Bentham believed were empty
by deﬁnition. Bentham brings these abuses of language under
the broad heading of ﬁctions, and it was against the inﬂuence
of what he called “nugatory and dangerous” ﬁctions that he
fought throughout his intellectual life. These ﬁctions were
dangerous for Bentham precisely because they were nugatory:
their emptiness was a cover for a multitude of sins. The other
word Bentham used to describe them was “nonsense.” And
the greatest purveyors of such dangerous nonsense, he believed, were lawyers.
As with Hobbes, it is possible to distinguish between two
separate kinds of nonsense here. One way of speaking nonsensically for Bentham was to use meaningful words in a way
that contradicted their own meaning. This is what happened
in most technical legal ﬁctions, which required people to use
language in a manner that must be false—for example, when
treating corporations as though they were persons in their
own right (like Hobbes, Bentham was very suspicious of “incorporeal bodies,” though in Bentham’s case this may have
had something to do with his lifelong fear of ghosts). Bentham calls these legal ﬁctions “wilful falsehoods.” The same
128

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

phenomenon occurred whenever jurists brought words together that only made sense apart, as for example when they
talked about “natural rights”—these words are not nonsensical in themselves, but they are nonsensical in conjunction
with each other, because for Bentham rights are non-natural
(that is, man-made) by deﬁnition. Moreover, when the word
“imprescriptible” is added to the phrase “natural rights,”
what you get, famously, is “nonsense upon stilts,” because a
right that is not prescribed by force is just one more word
piled on top of another.25 The other kind of nonsense is the
meaningless jabber of professional jargon, all the technical
terms and obscure phrases that lawyers use to hide what they
are up to from the public. Such words are not falsehoods as
such, because their obscurity makes it impossible for the outside world to judge them by such standards. What they are is
simply noise.
The term that is sometimes used for the latter kind of nonsense is cant—the singsong of words without meaning (the
word itself comes from the old French canter meaning “to
chant” and was originally used to describe “the whining of
beggars”).26 The term that covers the ﬁrst kind of nonsense—
wilful falsehoods—is lies. Both cant and lies, for Bentham as
for Hobbes, are the marks of hypocrisy, and of the same kind
of hypocrisy—the worst kind—despite the differences between them. A clear illustration of this is provided by Bentham’s argument in Swear Not At All. Broadly speaking, oaths
are in Bentham’s terms empty ﬁctions, which is what makes
them so dangerous. The oath that is sworn in Oxford happens
to be a lie (hence everyone in Oxford is a perjurer); the oath
sworn in Cambridge happens not to be a lie (hence no one in
Cambridge is). But the Cambridge oath is purest cant—it is
just noise, because no one who utters it is in fact saying anything at all.
Now it is important to emphasise here that not all cant is
necessarily hypocrisy, though the two words are often used
interchangeably, just as not all lies are necessarily hypocritical.
129

CHAPTER FOUR

Some writers, indeed, have been at pains to draw quite a
sharp distinction between cant and hypocrisy. One such was
Bentham’s friend William Hazlitt, whose targets in making
this distinction included the man often seen as the antiBentham, Samuel Taylor Coleridge. Hazlitt spells this out in
his essay “On Cant and Hypocrisy”:
Mr Coleridge is made up of cant, that is of mawkish affectation
and sensibility; but he has not sincerity enough to be a hypocrite, that is, he has not hearty dislike or contempt enough for
anything, to give the lie to his puling professions of admiration
and esteem for it.27

Here, cant is viewed as an absence of the deliberate and
scheming forms of deception that are taken to be the mark of
the true hypocrite (this sort of cant is closer to what Mandeville might call fashionable hypocrisy than the truly malicious
kind). Like fashionable hypocrisy, cant may not be a bad
thing—there may be times when the singsong of platitudinous chitchat does not really matter, when it is a mark of
harmless social conformity (though it has to be said that for
someone like Coleridge, as an arbiter of taste, it’s hard to see
when those times would be, and that of course is Hazlitt’s
point). But in the law it always is a very bad thing to cant, because it always gives the lie to a pretended commitment,
which is the commitment of anyone involved in the law to
take the terms in which it is expressed seriously. Canting
lawyers are therefore hypocrites.
So it is with lying. I may tell you a lie without necessarily
being a hypocrite, because I am not necessarily giving the lie
to some other aspect of myself (this is especially likely to be
true if lying on a routine basis is just the kind of thing you expect from me). But if I say things that cannot be true, in a context in which I have some prior commitment to upholding
meaningful discourse (in a work of philosophy, say), then the
“falsehood” (as Hobbes calls it) is also an act of hypocrisy.
Bentham, like Hobbes, believes we have a prior commitment
130

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

to uphold meaningful discourse in matters of law, religion,
philosophy, and, by extension from all these, politics.

Useful ﬁctions
However, Bentham’s account differs from Hobbes in two important respects, and it is on these that I now wish to concentrate. First, with regard to inconstant terms. Like Hobbes,
Bentham believed that people use terms of approval and disapproval according to whether or not they are personally attracted or repulsed by the thing being described. Hobbes’s
solution to this problem was to superimpose political authority on inconstant language. But Bentham’s solution is to concentrate on the two terms that lie at the root of this inconstancy
but that are not inconstant themselves: “pleasure” and “pain.”
Of course, one person’s pleasure may be another person’s pain
(which is why we need politics, to sort out the resulting disputes). But it does not follow from this that we are bound to
use the words pleasure and pain to refer to different things. If
the heat pains me but pleases you, that does not mean that you
cannot accept my description of what I am feeling as pain, or
at least distress. This is different from a term like stupid—if
George Bush pains me but pleases you, you will not be able to
accept my description of him as stupid. Bentham relies on the
fact that pleasure and pain are terms that refer to what he calls
“real homogenous entities.”28 And he does so, in part, because
he does not want to be Hobbes: that is, he does not want to
have to rely on arbitrary power to deal with the problem of inconstancy. He believes consensus can follow from the fact that
we all know what pleasure and pain are, and can therefore
agree on the need to maximise utility.
The second difference between Bentham and Hobbes relates to the broad category of terms that Bentham calls ﬁctions.
Bentham is not opposed to the use of all ﬁctions, particularly
when writing about politics. In addition to nugatory and
131

CHAPTER FOUR

dangerous ﬁctions, there are what he calls “useful and necessary” ﬁctions, which he deﬁnes as “those innoxious ones
which in the state of imperfection to which language stands
forever condemned are necessary to the giving of communication of ideas from mind to mind.”29 The ﬁction to which he appends this unwieldy deﬁnition, and the one to which he most
often resorts in his own discussions of politics, is what he calls
“the ﬁctitious judiciary . . . of a sort of imaginary tribunal that
the force of public opinion must be spoken of as bringing itself
into action.”30 In other words, this is the ﬁction of “the tribunal [or court] of public opinion,” a phrase that remains more
or less familiar to this day—we still sometimes talk about people having been convicted or acquitted in the court of public
opinion. This is not a metaphor for Bentham. It is a ﬁction because it describes something that does not in fact exist—there
is no actual court of public opinion—but it is not a contradiction in terms. There could be a court of public opinion, were
the public capable of passing judgment in some decisive and
authoritative way (whereas there could never be any such
thing as a natural right). Moreover, when public opinion does
prove decisive in some political controversy, it must be assumed that the public has passed a judgment of this kind,
through some form of intermediary. So what we have here is
something that doesn’t exist, but whose meaning can be reduced to entities that do exist (like intermediaries and their
decisive judgments). It is a kind of shorthand, or shortcut to
the truth.
Why does Bentham need these sorts of useful ﬁctions? This
is a complicated question, with a range of possible philosophical and linguistic answers that have been much discussed in
the literature on Bentham.31 But I want to focus on the political
motivations here. Bentham’s primary political use for ﬁctions
of this kind is to establish limits to what governments can expect to get away with, even if that means stretching the limits
of what language can be allowed to do. So it is with “the court
of public opinion”—it is a ﬁction that serves to capture the
132

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

thought that even governing powers can be made to heed the
public interest. Nothing could be clearer from one of the examples Bentham gives of how the court (or as he calls it, “tribunal”) of public opinion actually works in practice. If the
public is to pass judgment, it needs a kind of committee willing to give that judgement voice. “In this strain for example,”
Bentham says, “thought and acted the Members of that Section of the Public Opinion Tribunal by whose warrant, under
the denomination of a warrant by the Members of the High
Court of Justice, the life of Charles the First of England was
extinguished at Westminster in the year 1649.”32 The court of
public opinion authorised the cutting off of the king’s head.
That is why it is not a metaphor.
But this raises an obvious difﬁculty: isn’t there something
fundamentally hypocritical about Bentham, the scourge of ﬁctions, being willing to sanction ﬁctions when he deems them
politically necessary? Of course, as a utilitarian, Bentham cannot be expected to rule out ﬁctions in absolute terms: nothing
is absolutely right or wrong except in so far as it is or is not
useful. If ﬁctions, like frauds, were always useful, they would
not be vices but virtues. But Bentham here does not simply say
that some ﬁctions are useful; he also says they are necessary.
And the difﬁculty arises from what Bentham has to say elsewhere about the idea of necessity: ﬁrst, that the term is itself
a ﬁction (necessity in this sense is a “non-entity,” so that although we might know what necessity means, there is no
more such a thing as necessity out in the world as there is such
a thing as unicorns); and second, that pleas of necessity are
precisely what make legal ﬁctions mendacious. “Behold one of
the artiﬁces of lawyers,” Bentham writes in his Book of Fictions,
“they refuse to administer justice to you unless you join with
them in their ﬁctions: and then their cry is see how necessary
ﬁction is to justice! Necessary indeed; too necessary; but how
came it so, and who made it so?”33 Nor is it any sort of mitigation for lawyers to point out that their ﬁctions often have an element of truth in them. Indeed, this is just further evidence of
133

CHAPTER FOUR

how manipulative their pleas of necessity really are. “The
spice or two of truth,” Bentham writes, “buried here and there
amidst the heaps of falsehood, serve to make the compost the
richer, and the better adapted to deception and misconception.”34
Necessary ﬁctions, then, look like a large part of the problem in the corruption of public life, which makes it hard to
see how they can be part of the solution as well. But in this
diatribe against the legal profession, Bentham implies that
there is a distinction between ﬁctions that are necessary and
those that are “too” necessary. This distinction is important
to make sense of what Bentham means when he talks about
necessity. Fictions are unacceptable for Bentham when they
are used as instruments of power to mask partial (or as he
calls them, “sinister”) interests. So a ﬁction can be considered “too necessary” if the removal of the ﬁction reveals
nothing there but the partial interests of those who deploy it,
rather than the reality for which the ﬁction is a shorthand.
Bentham shares the essence of Cromwell’s view that “men
make necessities.” But he extends this view to ask an earlier
variant of Lenin’s famous question, “Who, Whom?” If you
can tell whose particular interests the ﬁction serves, and at
whose broader expense, then you can see why it is not simply necessary, but too necessary to serve its ostensible
purpose.
Is this distinction enough to rescue Bentham from the
charge of violating his own standards of truth-telling when it
comes to the ﬁction of the court of public opinion? Let us
look again at the example Bentham gives of the workings of
this tribunal—the execution of the king under the double
denomination of a warrant from the High Court of Justice,
itself warranted by the Tribunal of Public Opinion. Now
compare this to what Bentham says about legal ﬁctions: they
are uttered, he says, “for the purpose of giving injustice the
colour of justice.”35 The execution of Charles was an act of
power of which Bentham evidently approved. So by colouring
134

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

it with the justice of warrant from the tribunal of public opinion, isn’t he doing just what he accuses the abusers of legal
ﬁctions of doing? How is this different from the revolutionary tribunals in France, which Bentham abhorred, dressing
up what they did in the language of natural rights? After all,
it is not as if the public actually approved of the execution of
the king (all the evidence suggests that most of them did
not), nor sanctioned it in any meaningful sense. There wasn’t
a vote, and the public didn’t sign the death warrant—the
best one can say is that it was sanctioned by various pamphleteers on their behalf. Moreover, the execution was the act
of a particular interest group within the government (it was
Cromwell and the army against the Presbyterians in their
new alliance with the king). Why isn’t bringing in a ﬁction of
public sanction here just more special pleading, and therefore more hypocrisy on Bentham’s own part and in Bentham’s own terms?
In order to see why not, it is ﬁrst necessary to be clear what
Bentham is saying when he talks about colouring things with
the language of justice. Unlike Hobbes, Bentham did not believe justice was an inconstant term—it is a ﬁction, or a kind of
shorthand, that can be cashed out in the terms of utility as well
as power (thus it is unjust in Bentham’s terms to use political
power for purposes that militate against the greatest happiness of the greatest number). Lawyers who colour injustice as
justice are lying about what they are up to, and hence their
colouring is also a kind of cloaking—words are being used to
hide the truth. What lawyers are hiding is the fact that they are
not in the business of maximising overall utility; they are
merely in the business of maximising their own utility. Dressing up injustice as justice for Bentham is like dressing up disobedience as patriotism for Hobbes (disobedience for Hobbes
being an equivalently constant term, one that can be cashed
out in a way that everyone should be capable of understanding). So the real question is, why can’t Bentham simply say
that the execution of Charles was just (which he clearly
135

CHAPTER FOUR

believed it was), as Hobbes could say that it was disobedient
(which he also clearly believed that it was)? Why does Bentham need to embellish an act of utilitarian justice with the
fake sanction of public opinion?
The answer has to do with the workings of power as Bentham understood them, and gets to the heart of what he has to
say about political hypocrisy. Bentham believed that one of the
tests of the justice of a political act was whether public opinion
would stand for it, because public opinion was expressive of
the widest possible set of interests. The revolutionary tribunals
in France did not pass this test because they were clearly engaged in acts designed to coerce the public. But the killing of
the king in 1649 could pass such a test, because it confronted
arbitrary power with the wider interests of the public at large.
The difﬁculty with public opinion is that the public cannot give
direct voice to its interests, because the public is not a person. It
needs a real person or group of real persons to act for it (hence
the need for a committee). And hence the need for a ﬁction: the
ﬁction that the public is acting in its own right, even though in
fact it is the public that is being acted for (in this case, by the
members of the High Court of Justice).
The really useful ﬁctions in politics for Bentham are the
ones that give people on the receiving end of power the power
to act. It is a theme that recurs throughout his writings. It is
the reason, for example, why Bentham was willing to allow
that even the ﬁction of a “social contract,” though nonsensical
(there never was nor could be such a contract), might once
have been useful; it was a fraud on a par with priestly ceremonies that demanded sacriﬁces of the king, because the idea
of a social contract made kings aware that they were not free to
do what they pleased. In circumstances of absolute rule, Bentham believed, it is hard to see how political progress could
have been achieved without the aid of such ﬁctions. But those
days are now over—“what formerly might have been tolerated
or countenanced under that name would, if now attempted to
be set on foot, be censured and stigmatized under the harsher
136

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

appellations of incroachment or imposture.”36 There is no longer
any need for such crude ﬁctions as that of the social contract,
any more than there is for such crude superstitions as human
sacriﬁce (and perhaps even for such crude politics as the human sacriﬁce of the king). But that does not mean there is no
more need for ﬁctions—what remain, even under more enlightened conditions, are the ﬁctions of democracy.

Democratic ﬁctions
Bentham gives an example of such a democratic ﬁction in his
Political Tactics: “Recognising the fallibility of the people,” he
says, “it is proper to act as though it were infallible; and we
ought never, under pretence of this fallibility, to establish a
system which would withdraw the representatives of the public from its inﬂuence.”37 There are two ways of making sense
of this sort of ﬁction. One is that we must pretend the people
are always right, even though we know that the people sometimes make mistakes, and misjudge what is in their best interests. But another way to put it is that the people are fallible
because the entirety of public opinion can never be captured in
a single judgment—even majority voting is only ever a partial
representation of what the people as a whole think. The truly
infallible voice of the people—the sum total of their wants and
interests—is always mediated through the preferences of particular individuals or groups of individuals, which must be
taken to stand in for the whole. The same applies to the concept of popular sovereignty. We treat the people as sovereign,
although the people as a whole cannot be sovereign, since sovereignty only attaches to speciﬁc persons, who act on the people’s behalf. We treat the people as sovereign so that their
representatives do not forget that theirs is only ever a partial
view of the people’s interests.
It is this line of thought that most obviously sets Bentham in
opposition to Hobbes, but it too has its roots in Hobbes, for
137

CHAPTER FOUR

whom “the people” is also a kind of ﬁction, requiring representation in order to be able to act in the ﬁrst place. The difference
is that Hobbes did not want to allow room for any real persons
to claim to represent the people but the sovereign. So the ﬁction of the people’s collective identity does no work in
Hobbes’s theory, except to emphasise the absolute dependence of the people on their sovereign representative. Bentham,
by contrast, wanted to make sure that no one could claim to be
the sole representative of the people, which is why the ﬁction
of popular rule came to carry so much weight in his theory. In
this respect, Bentham and Hobbes are really opposite sides of
the same coin. For Hobbes, the truly useful ﬁction of modern
politics is, as he puts it in De Cive, that “the king is the people”;
the point of this ﬁction is to establish that the people can have
no personality apart from that of their sovereign. For Bentham, the one truly useful ﬁction is that “the people is king”
(or as he himself liked to put it, “the People is my Caesar”); it
establishes that no single person can claim to represent the
people’s views or wishes. So the difference between Hobbes
and Bentham is essentially this: Bentham was a democrat and
Hobbes was not. But Bentham’s democracy is still just an inversion of the ﬁction that lies at the heart of Hobbes’s theory
of the state.
It is important to emphasise that Bentham was not always a
democrat. In his early career he thought that it was enough to
expose the hypocrisy of those who used legal ﬁctions to hide
the truth about their power, without bringing in the people to
pass judgment. But what he discovered was that exposing the
workings of power is not the same as countering it—when you
pull aside the mask to reveal what lurks there, you discover, as
Bentham did, just how entrenched sinister interests can be.38
Power had to be confronted with power, which meant confronting sinister interests with the wider interest of the general public, under the guise of the tribunal of public opinion.
There are thus two ways of dealing with ﬁctions: one is to expose them, which may well leave the power that lies behind
138

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

them in place; the other is to confront them, which may well
require deploying some ﬁctions of one’s own.
Bentham was never entirely happy with this latter course.
Ostensibly, he put the need for his own use of ﬁctions down, as
he said, to the “imperfections of language” rather than the imperfections of democratic politics. But in the case of the ﬁction
of the court of public opinion, there is more than just linguistic
shorthand at work; there is also a kind of sleight of hand, since
the judgment of the court always resides with particular individuals or groups of individuals representing the public, and
never with the public as a whole. And this is just as true of the
representatives whose judgment Bentham is most often willing to substitute for the judgment of the public, the free press:
the critical opinion of newspapers, as he admits, in the end
boils down to the judgment of their editors. Indeed, in a representative democracy, Bentham believed that the editors of
newspapers were second in importance only to prime ministers.39 Newspapers were needed to give voice to the social
sanction of public opinion, just as politicians were needed to
give voice to its political sanction. But what was true of one
was true of the other: whenever one looks for the court of public opinion in operation, one will always ﬁnd particular persons there instead.
Bentham did what he could to circumvent this fact of political
life: that arbitrary power needs to be confronted with public
opinion, but public opinion can only be expressed by something that takes on the appearance of arbitrary power. The
struggle involved explains why his later career is marked by
two contradictory trends: on the one hand, he became more and
more democratic, keener on exposing the workings of power to
public opinion wherever possible; on the other, his writing became more and more technical, neologistic, precise, longwinded, as he tried to pin down the operations of the people’s
representatives in nonﬁctitious terms. He wanted more democracy, which entailed a kind of ﬁction, but he also wanted the language of democracy—both the language used to describe it and
139

CHAPTER FOUR

the language used by its practitioners—to minimise its reliance
on ﬁction, deception, and rhetorical dissimulation.
So Bentham tried to devise a means of providing public
opinion with something like a real court of its own. He advocated the use of citizens’ juries to scrutinise government representatives, and to subject them to censure when necessary.40 But
citizens’ juries, for all their ability to monitor the people’s representatives, are simply representatives of the people themselves, and require monitoring, which Bentham attempted to
do with his own lengthy stipulations about how they should
operate and under what conditions. Moreover, towards the end
of his life Bentham became increasingly dubious about the use
of the word “representative” itself, unlike his friend James Mill,
who embraced it.41 Bentham feared it was just more cant, an
empty word that can mean whatever you want it to mean. He
thought it ought to be possible to describe the role of these socalled representatives in the more precise terms of their ofﬁcial
functions and aptitudes. But linguistic precision as a means to
pin down the workings of popular politics is self-defeating—
the more precise one is about the functions of the people’s various representatives, the further one is removed from the
necessary ﬁction of the court of public opinion that underlies
their role. That is why we have never been able to dispense
with the idea of “popular representation,” even though the
phrase is something of a contradiction in terms, as Bentham
recognised. It has become our enduring shorthand for one of
the necessary ﬁctions at the heart of democratic politics.
To his many critics, Bentham’s increasing technicality, longwindedness, and neologistic precision were simply their own
kinds of cant. Thomas Macaulay, in his demolition of James
Mill’s essay “On Government” in the Edinburgh Review of
1829—the demolition consisting in pointing out that Mill’s
literal-minded, interest-based utilitarianism could not cope
with the ﬁctions at the heart of the concept of representation—
spares some time to lay into Bentham as well: “It is one of the
principal tenets of the Utilitarians,” Macaulay writes, “that
140

THE UTILITY OF FICTION

sentiment and eloquence serve only to impede the pursuit of
truth. They therefore affect a quakerly plainness, or rather
cynical negligence and impurity of style. The strongest arguments, when clothed in brilliant language, seem to them so
much wordy nonsense. In the meantime, they surrender their
understandings, with a facility found in no other party, to the
meanest and most abject sophisms, provided those sophisms
come before them disguised with the externals of demonstration. They do not seem to know that logic has its illusions as
well as rhetoric—that a fallacy may lurk in a syllogism as well
as a metaphor.”42 Macaulay just about stops short of calling
this hypocrisy, and settles for self-deception instead.
I do not think Bentham was much of a hypocrite, nor was he
particularly self-deceived. He knew that not all political truths
could be reduced to a syllogism, and, like Hobbes, he understood the value of metaphor. But he struggled with his conﬂicting impulses about power: he wanted to expose its deceptions
by his precise use of language, but he also wanted to confront
its deceptions with some necessary deceptions of his own.
Bentham’s struggles suggest an important truth about democracy: that it has some necessary ﬁctions at its heart, and if we
try too hard to circumvent them we will start talking cant, as
Bentham himself did, the cant of an artiﬁcially precise language of politics—we will become lost in a world of jargon,
and end up consoling ourselves with the mere sound of wellmeaning words. We see this all the time in contemporary politics, and we see it in contemporary political science as well.
However, if we become too comfortable with these ﬁctions,
and ignore the fact that they are ﬁctions, then we will start lying, not only to others but to ourselves—these are the lies of
an uncritical faith in democracy. We see this in contemporary
politics, and in much contemporary political theory too. The
temptations of cant and lies are ever present in democratic politics, because democracy is itself a kind of useful ﬁction. This
was Bentham’s insight, and also, in a sense, his curse.

141

]

]

5

VICTORIAN DEMOCRACY AND
VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

Novelists, journalists, and politicians

In this chapter I want to explore the fraught territory of Victorian hypocrisy and Victorian anti-hypocrisy, and their relationship to the unstoppable rise of democratic politics. I want
to do so by looking at three eminent Victorians for whose political and intellectual concerns the question of hypocrisy was
central. The three are Anthony Trollope (1815–1882), John
Morley (1838–1923), and Henry Sidgwick (1838–1900). Of
course, the phrase “eminent Victorians” is itself redolent of
hypocrisy, because of its indelible association with Lytton
Strachey’s volume of debunking biographies under that title.
The last two of the three authors I am going to discuss were
eminent Victorians in the Strachey sense, in that they both
stand somewhere in the immediate background to his book.
Morley was, among many other things, the biographer of
William Gladstone, and it was Morley’s sort of biography—
reverential, sequential, remorselessly public in its emphasis—
that provided the pattern that Strachey wished to undo.
Sidgwick was one of the characters whom Strachey had considered for inclusion in Eminent Victorians, but eventually decided against, perhaps because too much of what he wanted to

142

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

say about him was overtly sexual in nature. Strachey believed
that Sidgwick belonged among that group of Victorian intellectuals whom he considered to be literally as well as metaphorically impotent: they shared, he said, “an innate incapacity
for penetration—for getting either out of themselves or into
anything or anybody else.”1
Trollope was a very different sort of Victorian, from an earlier generation and full of bluff and hearty worldliness (indeed, many of his contemporaries wondered how so crass a
man could write such psychologically astute novels). I want
to connect Trollope to these others for two reasons. First, the
book of Trollope’s I wish to discuss—Phineas Redux, the second of his Phineas Finn novels and the fourth novel in the
Palliser sequence about high Victorian politics—appeared in
1874, the same year that saw the publication of Morley’s On
Compromise and Sidgwick’s The Methods of Ethics, which I take
to be two of the central texts for understanding liberal Victorian attitudes to political and moral hypocrisy.2 The year 1874
was important politically in its own right—it was the year that
Benjamin Disraeli reaped the electoral rewards for the most
brazen act of political opportunism in modern parliamentary
history, the Tory passage of the 1867 Reform Act. Disraeli’s
victory in the 1874 election marks the beginning of the Conservative Party’s dominance as a modern election-winning
machine (before 1874, the Tories were out of ofﬁce more years
than they were in; since 1874, notwithstanding Tony Blair’s
recent hegemony, they have been in ofﬁce more years than
they have been out). Disraeli’s rise to power provides the
backdrop to the political events described in Phineas Redux.
The second reason I want to talk about Trollope’s book is that
it contains, not least in its treatment of Disraeli (lightly concealed behind the character of Mr. Daubeny, who takes on the
formidable Liberal leader Mr. Gresham, who is of course
Gladstone), perhaps the clearest-eyed account of the workings of political hypocrisy of the entire Victorian period.

143

CHAPTER FIVE

As we have seen, it is not unusual to look to nineteenthcentury novels for insights into the great dance of hypocrisy
and anti-hypocrisy: Judith Shklar makes use of Hawthorne
and Dickens; other novelists who get drawn into these discussions include Jane Austen (particularly her most “theatrical”
novel, Mansﬁeld Park), and George Eliot, whose Middlemarch is
one of the holy texts of hypocrisy studies. But what all these
writers have in common is that they tend to be much more
sensitive to the nuances of private hypocrisy than the public
or political kind. George Eliot, for example, while fully comprehending the difﬁculties and compromises that the pursuit
of virtue demands of us in the private sphere, tends to see
virtue as its own reward in politics, which is one of the reasons
why her “political” novels, such as Felix Holt, are among her
least successful. As one commentator puts it, George Eliot’s
political narratives “punish egoism and reward virtue, and
therefore refuse to admit that calculating political players
sometimes win.”3 In Phineas Redux, the reverse is true. Trollope
is more sensitive to, and about, the hypocrisies and deceptions
of politicians than he is to the deceptions and dissimulations
that can exist, say, between husbands and wives, or parents and
children, where his approach tends to be more melodramatic.
In the private sphere, Trollope likes to see virtue triumph, and
if it won’t, to see its defeat as evidence of the wickedness of the
world; whereas in politics, at least in this novel, he understands
that things are not so simple. This is why, even if he is not a
great novelist per se, he is a great political novelist.
Phineas Redux is also far more sensitive to the problems of
political hypocrisy than Trollope himself was in an earlier incarnation as a social critic in the mould of Thomas Carlyle. In
1855, Trollope wrote a book called The New Zealander (the title
is a reference to Macaulay’s celebrated vision of the demise
of England in the face of the enduring strength of Roman
Catholicism, and of the day when “some traveller from New
Zealand shall, in the midst of a vast solitude, take his stand
on a broken arch of London Bridge to sketch the ruins of
144

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

St. Paul’s”—an image of doom that became one of the great
clichés of the age).4 In The New Zealander, Trollope set out
many of the ideas that lay behind his later political novels. The
book was never published in Trollope’s lifetime (the reader at
Longman’s to whom he submitted it rejected the book as a
“feeble imitation of Carlyle,” which is unfair, but not all that
unfair).5 Its interest lies in what it has to say about the problem
of political hypocrisy, and what it says about the difﬁculty of
taking a stand against it.
The central theme of Trollope’s criticism in The New Zealander is the corrosive hypocrisy of the English political establishment. Public life in England, in Parliament and in the press,
had become a battleground of inﬂated demands for purity, in
which no one really believed, and behind which the worst sort
of impurity could ﬂourish. “It is the trade of the opponent to
attack,” Trollope wrote, “it is the trade of the newspaper to be
indignant, it is the trade of the minister to defend; and the
world looks on believing none of them.”6 In these circumstances, it might be expected that Trollope would take the Judith Shklar line, and argue for a greater understanding of the
unavoidability of hypocrisy in politics, in order to prevent the
inﬂation of hypocritical claims generated by the prevalence of
anti-hypocrisy. But in fact Trollope takes the opposite, inﬂationary route. If all this talk of purity is merely hypocrisy, he
says, then what is needed is not a greater acceptance of insincerity, but a greater intolerance for it. People in public life, particularly members of Parliament, need to start saying what
they mean and meaning what they say; above all, they need to
start voting in accordance with what they know to be true.
“Each honourable member,” Trollope declares, “who is induced by any circumstances to vote that Black is White does
whatever in him lies to destroy the honour of England.”7
The political background to this outpouring of indignation
lay in the parliamentary hearings that had been taking place at
the beginning of 1855 into the adulteration of food and drugs.
What emerged from these hearings was that most of what was
145

CHAPTER FIVE

on sale in London was fake: padded, substituted, tricked up,
and fraudulent. What was more, the worst of these adulterations often coincided with the brazen advertising of their purity: coffee sellers who promised that their products were not
mixed with chicory turned out to be the ones whose coffee
was nothing but chicory.8 Throughout The New Zealander, Trollope harks back to this theme: England had become a country
of self-advertised purity, full of hyperbole, sanctimony, and
hypocrisy, in which retailers, newspapers, politicians were all
outdoing each other to prove they were whiter than white,
whereas it was becoming increasingly clear that what they
called white was in fact black—colouring, in Trollope’s terms,
is unequivocally a form of cloaking, in all walks of life. Trollope demands a return to a reliable standard of public integrity, in which fraudulent concealment is exposed for what it
is. But this demand is incoherent, which is the main reason
why The New Zealander is such an unsatisfactory book. After
all, it was thanks to Parliament that the coffee merchants were
getting their comeuppance, and thanks also to the star witness
of the parliamentary hearings, a scientist called Arthur Hill
Hassall, who had literally put coffee under the microscope.
But Trollope has no answer to the question of who can expose
Parliament. There are no microscopes for detecting fraudulent
political behaviour; there are only other politicians, and the
newspaper press. Yet to demand Parliament be exposed by its
own members is to demand that politicians question each
other’s integrity, which is merely to inﬂate the conditions of
anti-hypocrisy—opponents will attack, ministers will defend,
newspapers will become indignant, and the whole round will
carry on as before.
Phineas Redux returns to some of these themes, particularly
the hypocrisy of members of Parliament when it came to corrupt electioneering, which they all condemned and from
which they all stood to beneﬁt. “The House was bound to let
the outside world know that all corrupt practices at elections
were held to be abominable by the House,” Trollope writes.
146

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

“But Members of the House, as individuals, knew very well
what had taken place at their own elections.”9 Nonetheless,
Phineas Redux is a far better book than The New Zealander, for
two reasons. First, it is a novel, so it does not need to suggest
solutions; it is content merely to paint the picture for what it is.
Second, the political circumstances had changed, both for
Trollope, and for the country. The 1867 Reform Act had promised to close the gap between political rhetoric and political reality, by cleaning up some of the lingering scandals of the
electoral system; but of course, it succeeded merely in opening
up a new gap between rhetoric and reality, as Trollope well
understood—both a gap between democratic purity and the
impure motives of politicians needing to get elected, and a gap
between parliamentary purity and the impure motives of the
politicians who schemed to get the bill passed. What’s more,
Trollope had his own personal experience of post-1867 politics: he stood for Parliament as Liberal candidate in the Yorkshire constituency of Beverley in 1868, and though Gladstone’s
Liberals swept the election, Trollope lost to an unscrupulous
Tory opponent who was willing to bribe his constituents.
Eventually the result was overturned following the complaints
of disgruntled local Liberals, but Trollope did not get the seat
as a result; instead, the constituency of Beverley was abolished. The ﬁrst Phineas Finn novel, written in 1867, is quite a
sunny book, but also quite a moralising one; Phineas Redux is
much darker, but also much more resigned—it is the book of
someone who has seen a bit of politics as it is, and understands that cleaning it up once and for all is fool’s gold.
But by 1874, Trollope had also witnessed what was perhaps
the most remarkable feature of post-1867 politics, the ongoing
progress of Benjamin Disraeli to the very pinnacle of English
public life, and subsequently of European public life as well—
as Bismarck was later famously to remark of Disraeli at the
Congress of Berlin in 1878, “Der alte Jude, das ist der Mann.”
One of the nauseating sub-Carlyle features of The New Zealander had been its treatment of Disraeli: all Trollope will say of
147

CHAPTER FIVE

him there is that “the English people cannot suddenly be
made great and good by the wisdom of a Jew.”10 Phineas Redux
offers a much more complex picture. Disraeli’s Jewishness (in
the character of Daubeny) is not emphasised; instead, what is
emphasised are his magical qualities. He is Cagliostro, the
magician, the man who can make something out of nothing,
and turn any situation to his own advantage (in the book, in
what is a double satire both of the 1867 Reform Act and of the
subsequent disestablishment of the Irish Church, Daubeny is
shown persuading the Tory party to vote for disestablishment
of the Church of England, in order to outﬂank Gresham by
forcing him either to go against his political interests by backing a Tory government or to go against his moral principles
by opposing a “Liberal” measure; the result is a sequence of
political cross-dressing that would put Tony Blair and David
Cameron to shame). Many contemporaries (including, it has
to be said, the man himself ) understood Disraeli’s political inspiration to be primarily Machiavellian; but for Trollope,
Daubeny is both more artful and more artless than this, a man
who has no principles and no ends in view.11 He simply enjoys
the game for what it is, and revels in his own ability to conjure
something unexpected out of it.
What this means, among other things, is that for Trollope,
Disraeli is not a hypocrite, which was the other most common
characterisation of the time. Instead, the hypocrite is Gladstone, who in the book, after much conspicuous agonising,
chooses to bring down the government and oppose disestablishment, in the cause of the higher good of capital-L Liberalism. Gladstone is a hypocrite because he has principles that he
chooses to subvert in practice. Disraeli has no principles; all he
has are words.12 This has echoes of Hazlitt’s earlier distinction
between hypocrisy and cant, though Disraeli in Trollope’s
eyes is not so much canting as incanting, making words do
magical things. The perils of the Disraeli approach to political
life is that while he remains in control of himself, he has little
or no ultimate control over the politics he creates, because it is
148

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

conjured out of thin air. This is an image of political mischief
that has long roots in the tradition I have been discussing: it is
there in Hobbes, in his preface to D’Avenant’s Gondibert,
where he describes the foibles of “conjurers, that mistaking
the rites and ceremonious parts of their art, call up such spirits, as they cannot at their pleasure allay again; by whom
storms are raised, that overthrow buildings, and are the cause
of miserable wracks at sea.”13 Hobbes’s analogy is of course
political, and it relates to the politics of his time (he is writing
in 1650, a year before he published Leviathan). Nevertheless,
this could easily be Trollope on Disraeli. But not Trollope on
Gladstone. For by contrast, the perils of the Gladstone approach is that in order to retain political control, and to avoid
such miserable wracks, he loses control of his own moral identity. Trollope does not take sides in Phineas Redux between the
incautious magician and the wary hypocrite (his account of
both men is in some ways remarkably sympathetic, and he
does a good job of capturing the hold they each have on their
respective parties). Instead, he paints the two as locked together in a giant charade, part of what Shklar would call the
“discrete system of hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy,” of sanctimony and cant, that is democratic politics.
Where Trollope does take sides is in the endless struggle between the political class itself and those who are goading the
politicians on from the outside. In the New Zealander, Trollope
had portrayed the hypocrisy of the House of Commons as the
apex of a pyramid of public sanctimony. In Phineas Redux, the
worst hypocrites of all are not in the Commons, but outside it,
in the press, particularly in the form of the odious popular
journalist Quintus Slide, editor of The People’s Banner. Slide
hides behind the sanctity of “public opinion”—the idea that
the people must scrutinise, the people must know, the people
must judge their representatives—in order to pursue an entirely personal agenda of malice, jealousy, and destruction. In
a way, this looks like a satire of Benthamism, with its blind
faith in public opinion in general and the scrutinising role of
149

CHAPTER FIVE

newspapers in particular; and if so, the effect was deliberate.
Trollope was, in Phineas Redux, as he remained throughout his
life, appalled by what he understood as crude utilitarianism,
with its selﬁsh virtues and its fake public morality. In the book,
Phineas himself becomes the victim of a selﬁsh society that
cannot accommodate his gentlemanly virtues and comes close
to hanging him for a murder he did not commit. In the earlier
novel, Phineas Finn, it is politics that has no room for its hero’s
scruples, and ultimately Phineas chooses to abandon political
life altogether; it is a mark of how much darker the second
book is in general that it is society as a whole that now has no
room for Phineas, and nearly destroys him, not as a politician
but as a man. In the end, he has a kind of nervous breakdown.
This is the melodrama I referred to earlier. But the melodrama
stops short of politics: no one in the upper reaches of political
life as described by Trollope has a breakdown (though in a
later book Plantagenet Palliser, another gentleman and also by
this point prime minister, comes close). Certainly Gladstone
and Disraeli do not contemplate retreat from the scene; they
just keep on going.
Yet it is one of the ironies of Trollope’s book, and one of the
reasons why I am interested in it here, that although so up-todate in its politics, it was rather out of date in its conception of
utilitarianism. By 1874, the dominant strands of utilitarianism,
as Trollope would have been increasingly aware, did not mean
Benthamism, certainly not so far as that implied a benign faith
in the “censorial” workings of public opinion.14 John Stuart
Mill had seen to that, under the inﬂuence of, among others,
Coleridge and Carlyle. In truth, the leading utilitarians of the
age were worried about precisely the same things that Trollope was worried about, and if anything, more so; in some
respects, their anxieties about the impurities of public life,
the readiness of politicians to pretend that black is white, and
the delight of the newspapers in cheering them on, were more
like the super-censorious Trollope of The New Zealander than
the beady-eyed novelist of Phineas Redux. This was true both at
150

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

the practical end of the utilitarian movement in the mid-to-late
Victorian period, as exempliﬁed by Morley’s On Compromise,
and the philosophical end, as exempliﬁed by Sidgwick’s The
Methods of Ethics. It is to these writers, and their conceptions of
political hypocrisy, that I now wish to turn.

Compromise and the political spirit
John Morley was at this point in his career—1874—the editor
of the Fortnightly Review, a journal that Trollope had helped to
found twenty years earlier. It was a career that would eventually take him into the Commons, and then into the Cabinet,
and ﬁnally into the India Ofﬁce as its secretary of state. On
Compromise itself, however, is a fairly uncompromising book
about the nature of political ambition, and in it Morley gives
full rein to his anxieties about what he calls “the triumph of
the political spirit,” by which he means the abandonment of
principle and the readiness of politicians of every stripe to dissimulate and compromise in the cause of party. The background, as for Phineas Redux, lay in the parliamentary debates
about disestablishment in Ireland, and particularly surrounding its consequences for university education, over which both
parties twisted and turned for party advantage. In his later biography of Gladstone, Morley described the contortions involved in the defeat of Gladstone’s Irish University Bill (which
had itself been heavily watered down to appease Irish opinion
in the Commons) by a coalition of Irish members and Disraeli’s Conservatives: “The measure that had been much reviled as a dark concordat between Mr. Gladstone and the
pope,” he wrote, “was now rejected by a concordat between
the pope’s men and Mr. Disraeli.”15 At the time, he put it more
bluntly: “It is hard to decide which is the more discreditable
and demoralising sight. The education of chiefs by followers,
or followers by chiefs, into the abandonment in a month of the
traditions of centuries or the principles of a lifetime, merely to
151

CHAPTER FIVE

induce the rapid and easy workings of the [party] machine.”16
Many of Morley’s targets in On Compromise are familiar from
Trollope, and they include the daily newspaper press (though
Morley was himself to try his hand as editor of the Pall Mall
Gazette in due course), which he described as “that huge engine for keeping discussion on a low level, and making the political test ﬁnal.”17 Like Trollope, Morley feared that the press
and the politicians would feed off each other, and off each
other’s sanctimony and hypocrisy, until the line between truth
and convenience became impossible to draw.
Nevertheless, unlike Trollope, Morley was a follower not
only of Carlyle, but of John Stuart Mill as well. As such he
needed to do more than rail against things and demand something better. He needed to ﬁnd a rational and workable solution. The one he came up with was relatively clear-cut (though
it has been missed by some commentators, who have seen him
as a kind of mirror of Carlyle, all condemnation and no compromise).18 Morley accepted that compromising on the truth
was unavoidable in politics, but he argued that it was unacceptable in other areas of life, where it was corrosive and
stultifying—compromise was what he called “the House of
Commons view,” which he described as “a view excellent in
its place, but apt to be blighting and dwarﬁng out of it.”19 He
did not believe the House of Commons view to be hypocrisy
per se, and when it was, he accepted that the hypocrisy was often well-meaning. But in a line that could have come straight
from Mill, he wrote that “a well-meaning hypocrisy in individuals [could result] in a profound stagnation in societies.”20
So how was the line to be drawn between the unavoidable
compromises of political life and the intolerable hypocrisies to
which they could lead? Morley offers two distinctions to serve
as a guide. First he distinguishes between words and actions:
between the “expression of an opinion” and what he called
“the positive endeavour to realise that opinion.”21 In undertaking the ﬁrst, no compromise should be allowed: one should
always speak the truth about one’s convictions. But in attempt152

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

ing the second, trying to make what one believes come to pass,
compromise is unavoidable, and some concealment may be
necessary; these are the necessary compromises of politics.
The other distinction Morley drew was between words and silence, echoing a thought that goes back at least as far as Bacon:
no one, Morley claimed, should pretend to hold to opinions
that were knowingly false, but it was certainly permissible to
remain silent on questions over which speaking out would result is speaking falsehoods. So he distinguished between what
he called “wise reserve,” which was allowable in some circumstances, and “voluntary dissimulation,” which was not. You
could conceal the truth about yourself by your silence, and you
could compromise with the truth in order to improve your
chances of realising it in practice; but you should never lie
about what you fundamentally believe.
In political terms, this line of argument led to the sharpening of two dividing lines, and the blurring of a third. One line
that Morley sharpened up was between religion and politics.
Essentially his book is saying that the House of Commons
spirit should never be allowed to infect questions of religion,
where speaking the truth was all-important; those who had
doubts about their faith should not compromise on those
doubts (in particular, they should not sign up to the creed of
the Anglican Church for the sake of convenience). Morley, like
Sidgwick, who had famously resigned his fellowship at Trinity College, Cambridge in 1869, was one of those members of
Oxford and Cambridge universities who had found themselves unable to subscribe to the Thirty-Nine Articles, and had
had to leave as a result. In Morley’s case this decision also led
to a painful and permanent breach with his own father. On
Compromise is a defence of this form of religious sincerity—
sincerity about one’s doubts—and it spoke to a generation
who had shared these experiences.
The other line that Morley’s argument served to sharpen
was between Liberals and Tories. Unlike Trollope, Morley
thought that Tories were the worst of the hypocrites in public
153

CHAPTER FIVE

life, and they certainly come off worst in his book. To be a
Tory, he believed, was to subscribe to certain principles, including a faith in the timeless mysteries of the constitution.
Tories who play political games with the constitution are
therefore going against their own beliefs, and handing their
party over to “aristocratic adventurers and plutocratic parasites” (and this is a line that could have come from the earlier
Trollope).22 Liberals, by contrast, have among their principles
an openness to practical considerations—they believe, in Morley’s words, that “the conditions of social union are not a mystery, but the result of explicable causes, and susceptible to
constant modiﬁcation.”23 So the necessary compromises of political life are less of a compromise for Liberals. (Though this
did not mean that Liberals could afford to get wholly consumed by the art of compromise—“If those who are the
watchwords of Liberalism were to return upon its principles,
instead of dwelling exclusively on practical compromises, the
tone of public life would be immeasurably raised,” Morley
said.24) This is a variation on an argument we have seen before:
when principled Liberals compromise, you can trust to their
compromises precisely because they take compromise so seriously; just as Mandeville had suggested that when Whigs take
the moral high ground, you can trust them, because they
know just how treacherous the moral high ground is. As I said
before, I do not think this is a good argument: it is too transparently self-serving. But it is an argument that has consistent
appeal, at least for Liberals.
The line Morley’s book serves to blur is within the realm of
political activity itself, between speech and action, or ideas
and practice. After all, in politics it is not at all easy to distinguish words from actions—to put your ideas into practice, you
have to persuade people, among other things, of their truth.
Words are weapons, so it is not clear how much help it is for
politicians, or for those observing them, to discover that you
should never compromise in the expression of your opinions,
only in the attempt to realise them in practice. Equally, it is not
154

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

easy to distinguish political reserve from political deception—
politics is an adversarial business, and questions demand answers. Not answering the question is of course a time-honoured
way for politicians to avoid an outright lie. But politicians
can’t avoid answering the question by saying nothing; if they
do, they make it too easy for journalists to expose them to
ridicule. As Bacon put it, in a slightly different context: “They
will so beset a man with questions, and draw him on, and pick
it out of him, that, without an absurd silence, he must shew an
inclination one way; or if he do not, they will gather as much
by his silence as his speech.”25 Politicians have to say something. So their reticence will be a voluble sort of reticence, and
if it is to avoid the unacceptable forms of hypocrisy, it will
only be by ascending to the status of cant.
Out of this sharpening of two distinctions, and muddying
of a third, three practical political lessons emerge from Morley’s account that explain the wide impact that his book had
on his contemporaries. The ﬁrst lesson is that one should stick
to the beliefs one brings to politics from the outside—
particularly one’s beliefs about the most appropriate forms of
religious expression—without compromise; somewhere in the
hinterland of any politician there should be a person of principle. Second, once in politics, it will be much harder to say
where compromise should cease; words and actions will tend
to get jumbled up, which means that compromise may be
quite widespread. But third, if one is a Liberal, one can at least
be conﬁdent that one’s compromises are less morally objectionable than those of the other side, and that Liberal cant is
preferable to Tory hypocrisy. This was a hugely attractive message for a generation of Liberal politicians who came into politics wishing to do good, having broken with conventional
religion but seeking a more appropriate outlet for their religious impulses, unwilling to compromise on their beliefs but
aware of the compromises that politics would require of them,
and conﬁdent only that their party was likely to be on the right
side of any compromises that might be made, and the Tories
155

CHAPTER FIVE

on the wrong side. These were the “new” Liberals who eventually emerged from under Gladstone’s shadow, and whose
legacy runs through to British politics today, all the way to
“New Labour.” It is a truism of political history that this generation of politicians fell under the intellectual spell of T. H.
Green (1836–1882). But it is also true that many of them fell
under the spell of Morley’s On Compromise as well (including
Asquith, Haldane, and Grey—prime minister, lord chancellor,
and foreign secretary respectively in 1914, when Britain went
to war—all of whom cited the profound inﬂuence of Morley’s
book on their moral and political outlooks), making it one of
the most inﬂuential political books of its era. Morley’s biographer calls On Compromise a “Prince [i.e., Machiavelli’s The
Prince] for Victorian liberalism.”26 But this doesn’t seem right,
or fair. For its intended audience, it had a far deeper resonance than that.

Politicians, priests, and lawyers
Certainly it was much more politically inﬂuential than Sidgwick’s Methods of Ethics, published the same year. Nevertheless, Sidgwick’s book is the one that has lasted—it is the one
that is still studied in universities today. This is because Sidgwick, who was exercised by many of the same concerns that
exercised both Morley and Trollope, attempted to provide
something that was not on offer from these others: an account
of the deep philosophical roots of the double standards of
public life. I cannot possibly do justice here to the subtlety of
Sidgwick’s argument in Methods of Ethics, nor to the intensity
of his lifelong engagement with the question of hypocrisy,
which forms the subject of Bart Schulz’s massive biography
of Sidgwick, Eye of the Universe (and in which the focus is on
the relationship between this preoccupation and Sidgwick’s
deeply sublimated sexuality). Instead, I will try to pick out
some related themes.
156

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

The ﬁrst is that Sidgwick clariﬁed perhaps more completely
than anyone had before or has since just why the dilemmas of
when and where to compromise are ubiquitous in moral, social, and political life: they have their origins in the basic
dilemma of morality itself, which is how to reconcile the competing demands of self-interest and the general good. Sidgwick set out to show how these demands could be reconciled
and concluded that in the end they could not, except in the
case of a few, rare individuals blessed with a peculiarly selfless temperament (and that was an accident of psychology, not
a result of philosophy). Utilitarianism was true for Sidgwick,
but it was a deeply divided philosophy, offering a justiﬁcation
both for the pursuit of one’s own interests and for the sacriﬁce
of one’s own interests for the sake of the greater good. This
meant that there were no easy answers, either in ethics or in
politics, to the question of where to draw the line between personal and public integrity. It also meant that Sidgwick was
highly suspicious of attempts to impose one-size-ﬁts-all political solutions on the ongoing struggle between self-interest and
collective interest, including those of earlier utilitarians. In an
essay on “Bentham and Benthamism” that Sidgwick wrote in
1878 for the Fortnightly Review, in response to a personal commission from its editor John Morley, he stated: “The difﬁculty
that Hobbes vainly tried to settle summarily by absolute despotism is hardly to be overcome by the democratic artiﬁces
of his more inventive successor.”27 Benthamism, for Sidgwick,
was no great advance on Hobbism in this respect; and a blind
faith in the workings of democracy and public opinion was no
advance at all on a blind faith in absolute power.
The Methods of Ethics itself does not have much to say about
politics. The testing ground that Sidgwick was most interested
in, throughout his life, for the puzzles of when and where to
compromise with the truth was religion, from his 1870 essay
on “The Ethics and Conformity of Subscription,” written in
the aftermath of his decision to resign his Cambridge fellowship on grounds of conscience, through to his articles on “The
157

CHAPTER FIVE

Ethics of Religious Conformity” written in the late 1890s,
shortly before his death. Overall, Sidgwick’s approach to the
problem of when a person may conceal the truth about his
own religious beliefs can appear (particularly in retrospect)
absurdly casuistical, as he endlessly slices and dices the
dilemmas in the search of ever ﬁner distinctions. But it is also
openly casuistical: Sidgwick uses the word himself to convey
his sense that nothing can ever be truly decided here except on
a case by case basis.
Nevertheless, he is able to offer some general guidelines for
the cases as they arise. First, like Morley, Sidgwick distinguishes between dissimulation and silence: it is generally
wrong to say things that one does not believe, even to lay a
false scent, but it may often be right to refuse to say anything at
all. Sidgwick practiced this principle himself with regard to his
own religious doubts: having resigned his fellowship because
he could not openly pledge himself to the Thirty-Nine Articles,
he then kept silent on questions of faith for utilitarian
reasons—“The reason why I keep strict silence now for many
years,” he later wrote in a letter, “with regard to theology is
that while I cannot myself discover adequate rational basis for
the Christian hope of happy immortality, it seems to me that
the general loss of such a hope, from the minds of average human beings as now constituted, would be an evil of which I
cannot pretend to measure the extent.”28 Second, Sidgwick distinguishes between membership and leadership within a religious community: it may be permissible for members of a
congregation to say things they do not strictly believe when
reciting the creed that it would be wrong for an ofﬁciating minister to say, given the extra burdens of responsibility of that ofﬁce. Third, Sidgwick distinguishes between metaphors and
non-metaphors (and this is where he can appear at his most casuistical): it may be possible to express faith in Christ’s having
“ascended” into heaven without literally believing it, because
“ascension” can be a metaphor for some kind of spiritual uplift, but no one can take the virgin birth to be a metaphor—
158

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

virginity has what Sidgwick calls “a perfectly simple and deﬁnite negative meaning.”29 So any cleric who doubts that Christ
was born of a virgin should resign his ofﬁce.
However, Sidgwick also thinks that it is crucially important
that some doubters remain within the church, or else religion
will never “progress.” So when ministers ﬁnd themselves
forced to utter as statements of faith things about which they
have doubts, but do not consider those doubts sufﬁciently serious to require them to quit their ofﬁce, they must make their
doubts known. That is, they must publicise their own compromises with the truth. Otherwise there is a danger that the
morality of religious conformity will become esoteric, and to
the mildness of the original deception will be added a more
serious deception about the standards of truth itself. Equally,
there is a danger that Protestant clerics who are not open
about their own doubts will lose sight of what is distinctive
about the faith to which they belong. Sidgwick, like Hobbes
and Mandeville before him, takes it for granted that Catholics
are inveterate hypocrites, in the sense that play-acting is of the
essence of the Catholic faith. But the reason all these writers
nevertheless worry more about Protestant than Catholic
hypocrisy is precisely because in the Catholic case it is unavoidable, whereas Protestants have the capacity to exercise
discretion and personal judgment. Moreover, concealment on
the part of Protestant clergy will leave them not merely compromised on their own account, but also in a far weaker position to criticise Catholic hypocrisy when they would wish to.
Overall, this is complicated advice, allowing for considerable ﬂexibility within fairly strict limits. It is advice that one
can easily imagine having some political analogies: if one replaces creed by party program, then it could be said that some
“doubters” must remain in the party if it is to progress, that
manifesto commitments need not always be read entirely literally, but that politicians who wish to be in a position to castigate the obvious hypocrisy of their opponents must be careful
about their own compromises with the truth, and so on.
159

CHAPTER FIVE

However, the important point is that Sidgwick himself did not
see this general advice as naturally translatable into other
spheres of human activity. He believed that in different areas
of social existence the guiding principles also had to differ
about the necessary deceptions. What is most striking about
Sidgwick’s overall position, certainly in comparison to Morley’s, is that he does not consider party politics, or the House
of Commons, to be among those places where one could afford to be more lax about dissimulation and false statements of
faith than in matters of religion, or, as Morley might have put
it, more “political.” If anything, the reverse is true. Sidgwick
came to loathe how “political” politics had become. Certainly
in his later writings—and above all in his major work on politics, The Elements of Politics (1891)—Sidgwick is more censorious about dissembling politicians than he is about
dissembling priests, for whom he appears to have much more
obvious sympathy.
He is also more censorious about dissembling politicians
than he is in The Methods of Ethics about two other categories of
potential dissimulators: lawyers and philosophers. Lawyers,
Sidgwick accepts, must have their own professional code of
ethics, which will allow them to protest their clients to be innocent even when they have the gravest suspicions that this is
not true. Philosophers, as laid out in a notorious passage from
The Methods of Ethics, may have to embrace not just esotericism, but esotericism about their esotericism, because freespoken utilitarianism can be “dangerous” to certain useful
social practices, including religion. This is what has come to be
known as “government house” utilitarianism. “The Utilitarian
conclusion, carefully stated,” Sidgwick says, “would seem to
be this: that the opinion that secrecy might render an action
right which would not otherwise be so should itself be kept
comparatively secret; and similarly it seems expedient that the
doctrine that esoteric morality is expedient should itself be
kept esoteric.”30 This, as has often been noted, seems to allow
philosophers to say almost anything.31 So philosophy, like law,
160

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

can have its own code of morality when it comes to telling the
truth. Why not politics?
In order to see why not, let us take the comparison between
politics and law ﬁrst. Lawyers, for Sidgwick, have two advantages over other dissemblers. First, everyone understands that
the legal profession is built on a certain amount of play-acting.
In that sense, unlike clergymen, lawyers do not have to advertise their doubts about the veracity of what they are saying.
But Sidgwick is aware it is not as simple as this, because to be
an effective advocate, one must go out of one’s way to stiﬂe the
doubts of one’s audience. “Though jurymen are perfectly
aware,” Sidgwick writes in The Methods of Ethics, “that it is
considered the duty of an advocate to state as plausibly as possible whatever he has been instructed to say on behalf of any
criminal he may defend, still a skilful pleader may often produce an impression that he sincerely believes his client to be
innocent; and it remains a question of casuistry how far this
kind of hypocrisy is justiﬁable.”32 It is in these testing circumstances that the second advantage kicks in: courts of law don’t
just have juries, they have judges as well, able to rein in the
histrionics.33 This is what Sidgwick most mistrusted about
democratic politics—as he says in The Elements of Politics, it is
like playing to the jury without a judge. He makes the point
by way of an extended analogy:
Every plain man knows that a lawyer in court is exempt from
the ordinary rule that binds an honest man only to use arguments which he believes to be sound; and that it is the duty of
every member of a jury to consider only the value of the advocate’s arguments, and disregard, as far as possible, the air of
conviction with which they are uttered. The political advocate
or party leader tends to acquire a similar professional habit of
using bad arguments with an air of conviction when he cannot
get good ones, or when bad ones are more likely to be popularly effective; but, unlike the forensic advocate, he is understood, in so doing, to imply his personal belief in the validity of
161

CHAPTER FIVE

his argument and the truth of the conclusions to which he desires to lead up. And the case is made worse by the fact that political advocacy is not controlled by expert and responsible
judges, whose business is to sift out and scatter to the winds
whatever chaff the pleader may mingle with such grains of
sound argument as his belief affords; the position of the political advocate is like what that of the forensic advocate would be,
if it was his business to address a jury not presided over by a
judge, and largely composed of persons who only heard the
pleadings of the other side in an imperfect and partial way.34

On a case by case basis, there may perhaps be times when
politicians, like lawyers, need to fake sincere belief. But because politics does not operate on a case by case basis (the
cases all run into each other), there is nothing and no one to
hold the line between acceptable dissimulation and unacceptable hypocrisy. As a result, Sidgwick believed, hypocrisy in
democratic politics was out of control. If the politicians won’t
control it, the jury of public opinion certainly can’t. The court
of public opinion is, as even Bentham recognised, nothing
more than a ﬁction.
Sidgwick’s solution was to encourage his readers to cultivate within themselves a judicial capacity—indeed, he writes,
“it might be regarded as the duty of educated persons generally to aim at a judicial frame of mind on questions of current
politics.”35 He would also prefer better educated people to
stay out of party politics altogether. In other words, he wanted
to supplement democratic politics with an aristocratic component, made up of individuals able to sift out the truth from the
chaff of political rhetoric. One advantage of this would be to
escape the endless hypocrisy of democratic politics. But another advantage would be to create a political class who would
be in a position to dissemble or conceal where necessary,
though always in a controlled way. Sidgwick has two different
understandings of what it means to be a “politician.” One is to

162

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

be a party political huckster, the kind that caused him to
despair about democratic politics. The other is to be what he
called “a sincere utilitarian,” which is by deﬁnition not to be a
party political huckster, but also by deﬁnition to be someone
who will understand the limits of sincerity in judging what is
for the best; someone, that is, who may need to engage in
some concealment, or double standards, of his own.36
Notoriously, the place where this esoteric utilitarian morality tended to play itself out was in the international sphere,
and particularly within the politics of empire. Sidgwick’s
view of international politics was one that has obvious resonance today. He was a federalist, who believed in fostering
semi-formal ties between developed nation-states (particularly within Europe) and wished to encourage all states to see
themselves as subject to international law. But he also accepted
that in some circumstances it was necessary to ﬁght wars for
the sake of the greater good, and that in such circumstances
the highest standards of international morality could not be
met. Equally, he recognised that within the civilising mission
of imperial politics, uniform standards of truth-telling could
hardly be expected to hold, and in some special cases pious
frauds might even be necessary. What was distinctive about
the sphere of international politics for Sidgwick, as opposed to
domestic politics, was that it ought to be possible to remain in
control of any necessary deceptions or double standards, because they would not be subject to the vicissitudes of public
opinion.
This did not mean that public opinion had no part to play in
shoring up political morality. In a late essay on “Public Morality” (1896), Sidgwick criticises what he sees as the crude prevalence of “neo-Machiavellianism” in late nineteenth-century
international politics, by which he means the view that political morality is distinct from personal morality. Sidgwick believed that this was a false distinction, because in both cases
the moral agent is torn between self-interest and the greater

163

CHAPTER FIVE

good. Both for individuals and for states it is hard to say for
sure when self-sacriﬁce is the morally right thing to do. But in
the case of states, there is at least the advantage that when
politicians believe that some higher cause trumps the national
interest, they can put it to the test of the wider public: “The
government may legitimately judge that it is right to run a risk
with the support of public opinion that it would be wrong to
run without it.”37 In this way, democratic politics provides a
kind of safeguard against the risks of quixotic behaviour in international relations, because its tempering effects can be
brought in when needed; whereas in domestic politics, public
opinion is what creates the dangerous illusions in the ﬁrst
place, precisely because it is itself untempered by anything.
What is striking about Sidgwick’s views concerning international politics is that they are so similar in tone to Sidgwick’s views about truth-telling in religion: sensitive to the
endless compromises that may be necessary, alive to the case
by case differences, conscious of the tensions between the individual and the general view. The essay on “Public Morality”
is of a piece with Sidgwick’s writings on morality in general—
it is recognisably the work of the author of The Methods of
Ethics. But it is not of a piece with his views about party politics, which are very far from being so nuanced. When it came
to the working of public opinion in domestic politics, Sidgwick was generally dismayed and much more sweepingly censorious. And he was particularly dismayed and censorious
when domestic party politics got mixed up with international
moral obligations. He was, at the end of his life, disgusted by
the Boer War and particularly by the ghastly Tory jingoism
that accompanied it. Sidgwick was a liberal imperialist, which
meant that he liked his imperialism to be progressive, sensitive to circumstances, and accompanied with a certain amount
of hand-wringing when necessary (though not when not).
Above all, he liked it to be detached from the miserable “blackis-white” world of the party political machines.

164

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

This leads me to two observations by way of conclusion to
this account. Sidgwick’s approach to the problem of when it is
permissible to compromise with the truth is in some ways the
opposite of Morley’s. Sidgwick was prepared to countenance
all sorts of compromises in all sorts of areas of human existence, so long as it was possible to remain in control of any
compromises that had to be made. This was true in law
(thanks to the wisdom of the judge), in religion (thanks to the
scruples of the minister), even in international politics (thanks
to the philosophical detachment of the liberal imperialist). But
he could not see how it was possible within the ghastly posturing of party politics. Hence he sought to escape from the
unacceptable hypocrisies of party democracy by focussing his
attention on those areas of moral existence in which compromise could be rendered acceptable by remaining bounded by
philosophical judgment and casuistry. Morley took the opposite view. He saw that political compromise was unavoidable,
and felt it could only be rendered safe by being accompanied
by an uncompromising approach to the truth in all other areas
of social existence. Morley believed that the uncompromising
truth-teller could only survive in the compromised world of
the House of Commons by recognising that the Commons
was a place apart. Sidgwick believed that because the Commons was a place apart, and truth had become thoroughly
compromised there, meaningful compromise was only possible outside. So Sidgwick, as a follower of John Stuart Mill, remained apart as far as possible from the messy world of party
politics, whereas John Morley, who was also a follower of John
Stuart Mill, plunged right in.
Yet it is one of the ironies of this story that Morley, though
arriving there by quite a different route from Sidgwick, ended
up in something like the same place: trapped in an imperial
refuge from the messiness of domestic politics. Morley, unlike
Sidgwick, was an anti-imperialist; also, unlike Sidgwick, he
was a supporter of Home Rule (Sidgwick saw it as a fateful

165

CHAPTER FIVE

compromise on liberal principles—“a pusillanimous surrender of those whom we are bound to protect, and posterity,” he
called it).38 Both were horriﬁed by the Boer War, Sidgwick
because it conﬁrmed his suspicions of democracy, Morley
because it undermined his faith in it. In the shake-up of British
politics that followed the war, Morley returned to the Cabinet,
and from 1905 to 1910 was Secretary of State for India. In that
role, he suffered many agonies of conscience about the things
he was required to do politically that did not sit well with his
principles. The government had hoped to use him as a kind of
cover, to “colour” their actions: if the author of On Compromise
was at the India Ofﬁce, then it was hoped that no one would
mistake the government’s policy for an unacceptable compromise. But of course, precisely because Morley’s appointment
looked like cover, that’s what many people did, accusing him,
as he reported it in a letter, of “ ‘shelving the principles of a
lifetime’ [and] ‘violently unsaying all that he has been saying
for thirty or forty years.’ ”39
Morley himself turned for comfort to thoughts of what
strong men of the past would have done in his circumstances,
particularly Oliver Cromwell (whose biography Morley had
also written). When confronted with the necessity of repressive measures that sat ill with his liberal conscience, he longed
for some of Cromwell’s certainty. He also hankered after some
of Cromwell’s short way with advisers who displeased him.
He felt that the only way he could keep his integrity in the position he occupied was to remain apart from the rest of the
business of government, and out of the Commons as much as
possible. He wished to be simply an “ofﬁcial,” making administrative judgments, and not swept along by the needs of the
party machine. In the end, Morley’s approach to politics became positively Sidgwickian. And as with Sidgwick, it seems
to have made him miserable and left him politically unfulﬁlled. In the end, there is no escape from the messy and unmanageable hypocrisies of domestic democratic politics in the
seemingly cleaner and crisper compromises of liberal imperi166

VICTORIAN HYPOCRISY

alism. In fact, there is no escape at all. Trollope, who was an
arch-imperialist, and no philosopher, and a failed and embittered politician, unlike Sidgwick, who didn’t even try, and
Morley, who succeeded better than he can have wished, saw
this more clearly than either.

167

]

]

6

ORWELL AND THE HYPOCRISY
OF IDEOLOGY
Anti-intellectual intellectualism

Of the thinkers I have looked at so far in this book, perhaps
none had such an abiding ﬁxation with the problem of
hypocrisy as the person I will be discussing in this chapter,
George Orwell. It was, in many ways, the central theme of his
work (this is a view I will attempt to defend in what follows).
The only one similarly obsessed by hypocrisy was Sidgwick,
who was haunted by its spectre throughout his life. But Sidgwick was a philosopher, and philosophy provided him with a
way to think through and around his concerns, even if it provided him with no ultimate escape from them. Orwell was not
a philosopher; he was a writer. Moreover, for most of his working life, he was not simply a writer; he was a book reviewer
(that was how he earned his living, and he carried on reviewing up until almost the end of his life), which meant that
hypocrisy was not simply an intellectual concern for Orwell—
it was also the calling card of his profession. In this respect,
the authors I have discussed whom he most resembles are
Mandeville and Trollope. Mandeville was not a philosopher
and he wasn’t just a writer; he was also a doctor, which he considered, with good reason, to be among the most hypocritical
of all vocations (as he pointed out, it is a very short step from
168

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

Hippocratic to hypocritic principles), and it was from the
medical profession that Mandeville drew much of his own understanding of the double standards that animate all human endeavours, even—especially even—the noblest-seeming ones.1
There are not many professions, or callings, that can claim to rival medicine for the range and varieties of hypocrisy that
they place on display. But book reviewing is certainly one of
them.
When it comes to hypocrisy, book reviewing has it all. It has
the common-or-garden hypocrisy of being able to dish it out
but not being able to take it: the reviewers who dole out criticism with abandon but squeal like stuck pigs when someone
dares to misunderstand or misrepresent one of their own
books. It has the classic hypocrisy of pretended knowledge or
wisdom: the reviewers who pass magisterial judgment on a
book they only got half-way through, or were not equipped to
understand, or, most likely, both. And of course, it has the
ubiquitous hypocrisy of private score-settling routinely
passed off as impersonal truth-telling: all book reviewers (and
as an occasional book reviewer, I would of course include myself in this description) have been kinder—or crueller—about
a book than they might have been, for reasons that they felt
were best excluded from the review itself. It is no coincidence
that the British satirical magazine Private Eye devotes almost
as much space to the double standards of the book-publishing
and book-pufﬁng world as it does to politics (and slightly
more than it does to medicine). The world of books is kept
aﬂoat on an ocean of hypocrisy.
This was Orwell’s world, as it had been Trollope’s before
him, and both men understood its foibles very well. Trollope, if
anything, was the more censorious, and the shallow hypocrisy
of literary London disgusted him throughout his life, even as
he moved effortlessly within it. The novel that he wrote immediately after Phineas Redux was originally intended to be a satire
of this aspect of Victorian commercialism, though it turned
into a larger and more biting satire of ﬁnancial speculation as
169

CHAPTER SIX

well. The book is The Way We Live Now, and its ﬁrst chapter
(“Three Editors”) remains one of the great mocking accounts
of the moral economy of the literary world. Orwell’s celebrated short essay “Confessions of a Book Reviewer” is more
sympathetic towards the reviewer’s plight, as beﬁts a man
who was less reviewed against than reviewing. Nevertheless,
it makes clear that much of a writer’s existence is taken up
with what is “in essence humbug. He is pouring his immortal
spirit down the drain, half-pint at a time.”2 Orwell was also
perfectly clear about why writers nevertheless keep going, despite all the moral hazards of their vocation—in “Why I
Write” he lists as the primary motive for all literary enterprises
“sheer egoism . . . it is humbug to pretend that [it] is not.”3 So
humbug played a big role in Orwell’s sense of what it meant to
be a writer, and he felt it was crucially important not to be a
humbug about that.
How does Orwell’s own literary career fare, judged by these
standards? In the magniﬁcent new edition of Orwell’s Collected Writings, in which everything he wrote—occasional
journalism, letters, diary entries—is reproduced in chronological order day by day, it is possible to see the little moral crises
of the book reviewer’s life approaching, and how Orwell dealt
with them. So, for example, in 1936 Orwell starts to allude in
various letters to the imminent prospect of having to review
Cyril Connolly’s novel The Rock Pool. He even writes to Connolly telling him how eager he is to get hold of a review copy.
Connolly was a contemporary of Orwell’s from Eton, and a
friend; more importantly, he was a patron for Orwell, who was
still struggling to make his way as a writer, and who therefore
depended on Connolly’s good opinion. So it is with a mild
sense of dread and embarrassment that one awaits the reproduction of the review itself. And it is with something like
shock that one discovers that despite all his motives to the contrary, Orwell was wonderfully dismissive of The Rock Pool,
with even the token praise (“The book looks like it has been
worked at over a period of years . . . I criticise Mr. Connolly’s
170

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

subject matter because I think he could write a better novel if
he concerned himself with ordinary people”) hardly designed
to sooth the author’s feelings.4 It is a fantastically patronising
review considering he was discussing the work of his own patron. Clearly, in George Orwell, the sheer egoism of the writer
and the impulse to tell the truth stood in an unusual relation
to one another. Or so it appears. But the Collected Works have
been supplemented by a ﬁnal volume, called The Lost Orwell,
which draws together newly discovered material missed out
in the earlier volumes. In it, there is a letter Orwell wrote on
May 2, 1936, two months before his Connolly review appeared. Orwell’s third novel Keep the Aspidistra Flying had just
been published, and Orwell describes it as having received
“the most awful (critical) slating . . . Even Cyril Connolly has
deserted me.”5 His treatment of Connolly in return is therefore not so unusual after all.
Does any of this really matter? For some people, it does,
and is symptomatic of a deeper malaise: the malaise of the
hypocritical anti-hypocrite. On this account, Orwell’s much
vaunted “honesty” is seen as a cover for, rather than a confession of, his own authorial egotism. Stefan Collini, in a notably
critical essay in his book Absent Minds: Intellectuals in Britain,
complains that Orwell’s book reviewing habits were artiﬁcially designed to preserve his integrity in the face of personal
temptations. He cites as evidence Orwell’s refusal to have anything to do with Auden, Isherwood, and Spender, whom Orwell christened the “pansy poets,” for fear that he might
actually like them in person and so feel unable to lay into
them in print. When he did ﬁnally meet Spender, who visited
Orwell in hospital in 1938, he found he did indeed like him,
and he did then stop attacking him. This sort of double standard is not unheard of among book reviewers, and some professional reviewers will make a point of spurning the company
of authors in order to avoid falling into this kind of trap
(though it is not clear what you can do when you are stuck in
hospital). Nevertheless, it remains true that it is a recognisable
171

CHAPTER SIX

form of hypocrisy to behave in this way, and one that is consistent with a certain kind of artiﬁcially induced sincerity,
which can manifest itself in a variety of different guises.
For example, in his book about Truth, the philosopher Simon Blackburn addresses the problem of the false sincerity of
those who deliberately insulate themselves from reasonable
doubts in order to maintain the convictions they know they
need to prosper. Among the examples Blackburn gives are
those of mid-to-late-nineteenth-century clerics who possessed
a sincere faith but suspected that they would lose it if they
were to read the latest scientiﬁc research throwing doubt on
the Bible story. So they chose not to read it, and remained relatively, but also artiﬁcially, serene in their sincerity.6 There is a
political analogy here too. If, say, one were a democratic politician sincerely believing that another regime posed a threat to
national security because of its weapons programme, and also
recognising that maintaining the sincerity of one’s convictions
was crucial to persuading the public of this threat, then one
might seek to insulate that sincerity from reasonable doubts,
by deliberately avoiding any evidence that might raise such
doubts. In this way, the politician remains sincere, and is able
to act in “good faith.” But the politician is still a hypocrite. The
old adage says: “If you can fake sincerity, you’ve got it made.”
This is usually treated as a paradox or simply a joke, but the
truth is that it is in fact quite easy to fake sincerity in philosophy or in politics, though it certainly doesn’t mean that you
have got it made. All you have to do is wrap your sincerely
held beliefs in epistemic cotton wool.
Orwell’s book reviewing habits resemble these forms of
fake sincerity, though the resemblance is only a faint one—it
is unlikely that meeting Spender made Orwell think more
highly of his poetry, only that it made him less comfortable
saying what he really thought about it. Certainly they seem
to belong very much at the mild end of the spectrum. Not for
Collini though, who sees all this as symptomatic of a wider
problem in Orwell’s thought, which turns out to be a wider
172

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

hypocrisy. Collini convicts Orwell of the hypocrisy of the antiintellectual intellectual, which he calls “that most unlovely
and least defensible of inner contradictions.”7 It may well be
true that Orwell, in his desire to castigate fellow leftists for the
slipperiness and sloppiness of their thought, for the fraudulence of their values, and for the simple-mindedness of their
judgments, overlooks the extent to which he is himself guilty
of some simple-mindedness, and some fraudulence, of his
own. But the question I am interested in here, as elsewhere in
this book, is not whether this is hypocrisy, but whether it is the
kind of hypocrisy that matters. Why is anti-intellectual intellectualism the least defensible hypocrisy of all? Collini gives
as an example of this vice Orwell’s attitude to Jean-Paul Sartre,
whom Orwell dismissed on the grounds that he couldn’t
make head or tail of the philosophy, and didn’t want to try, but
whose books he nevertheless felt qualiﬁed to pass judgment
on. Clearly this is not ideal in a book reviewer. But if the corollary of this hypocrisy was that Orwell saw through totalitarianism in ways that Sartre did not, isn’t it a price worth
paying?
Part of the problem here is that the question of Orwell’s
hypocrisy is still a raw political one. How to understand the
hypocrisy (or otherwise) of Hobbes, Mandeville, Bentham,
and Sidgwick now seems like a series of historical problems
lacking any enduring political heat (Jefferson, because of slavery, is different). But that was not how it was in their lifetimes,
nor for a generation or two after their deaths. We are sufﬁciently close to Orwell that we can still feel the heat, and Orwell is still cited in anger as part of the most acrimonious of
contemporary political debates. What someone like Collini
is doing in insisting on a warts-and-all account of Orwell’s
hypocrisy is not just getting at Orwell, but getting at those like
Christopher Hitchens who have turned Orwell into a secular
saint, and then mobilised him in that capacity on their own
side in the ongoing controversy about the Iraq War. Hitchens
has recently published his own intellectual biography of
173

CHAPTER SIX

Orwell, in which he says that having read through the entire
collected writings, he ﬁnds almost nothing of which Orwell
admirers need to be ashamed.8 (Collini’s review of this book
was published under the self-explanatory title “ ‘No Bullshit’
Bullshit.”) More to the point, Hitchens also believes that Orwell still serves to remind left-wing intellectuals of what they
ought to feel ashamed of. Orwell loathed the hypocrisy of leftists who would happily criticise Churchill and Roosevelt, but
would not say a word against Stalin. Replace Churchill and
Roosevelt with Blair and Bush, and Stalin with Saddam (or bin
Laden, depending on your preference), and Hitchens believes
you have history repeating itself. Hitchens, like a number of
other supporters of the Iraq War among the British journalist
class, was himself once on the far left, but the arrival of war
has turned him into a scourge of his former allies.9 It is not
hard therefore to see why he wants Orwell to have been right
about everything. And it is not hard to see why others might
want to suggest that Orwell was not all he has been painted as
being.
The one thing that tends to get lost sight of in these contemporary arguments is what Orwell himself actually had to say
about the role of hypocrisy in political life. Orwell has become
a kind of talisman for different sides of a ferocious battle for
the banner of political integrity. Yet what is immediately apparent from his own writing is that the problem of hypocrisy
for Orwell, as for the other authors I have discussed, was not
a simple one, and certainly goes well beyond his view of the
intolerably facile moralising of various left-wing intellectuals.
For Orwell, political hypocrisy, and indeed political integrity,
constituted an area of human existence where a series of ﬁner
distinctions were needed, not just right or left, never mind
right or wrong. Orwell does not directly connect to the tradition I have been discussing so far (in fact, there does not appear to be a single reference to Hobbes, Mandeville, Bentham,
or Sidgwick anywhere in his collected writings, though unsurprisingly as a lover of “good bad” ﬁction, he does have
174

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

quite a lot to say about Trollope), but nevertheless he shares a
good deal in common with these other authors. He was an
anti-hypocrite who sharply distinguished between different
kinds of hypocrisy, who accepted that some forms of hypocrisy
were inevitable, and who ended up celebrating aspects of the
hypocrisies that he felt democratic politics could not avoid,
while eviscerating those hypocrisies by which he believed
democratic politics might be destroyed.
He shares other characteristics with the wider English
liberal rationalist tradition as well. Orwell was not remotely
impressed by Machiavellianism (“this shallow piece of naughtiness” as he called it).10 Equally, like Hobbes and Bentham, he
was deeply suspicious of obscure, clichéd, or fatuous language. In a sense, he was more like Hobbes than like Bentham,
in his loathing of neologism, technical elaboration, and intellectual pretension, as he made clear in his celebrated essay on
“Politics and the English Language.” Like Bentham, Orwell
believed that good prose should aim for precision, but unlike
Bentham he understood precision as a kind of transparency
(“good prose,” he famously wrote, “is like a window pane”),
which meant that Bentham’s elaborate linguistic constructions, building up the truth like a series of Russian dolls, were
self-defeating in Orwell’s terms. As did Hobbes, Orwell preferred a robust metaphor—one that made clear exactly what
its author was up to—to an intricate piece of linguistic expertise. But no metaphor, Orwell believed, should be used when it
has become “worn-out,” because such language has lost the
power to profess its inconstancy. Dying metaphors, like what
Orwell calls “pretentious diction” and “meaningless words,”
profess nothing of themselves, but only that “the writer is [no
longer] interested in what he is saying.”11
But what Orwell most obviously has in common with both
Hobbes and Bentham is his sense that obscurantist language is
most dangerous when it attempts to conceal the truth about
political power. “In our time,” he wrote, “political speech and
writing are largely the defence of the indefensible . . . Thus
175

CHAPTER SIX

political language has to consist largely of euphemism,
question-begging and sheer cloudy vagueness.”12 Orwell’s
particular hatred of the hypocrisy of left-wing intellectuals,
and of their readiness to hide behind platitudes, derived from
his sense that those platitudes were also serving to conceal
their attitude to power. This was not true of all forms of political dishonesty, some of which, one might say, were sincerely
dishonest in Orwell’s terms. So, as Orwell wrote in 1945, “any
large organisation will look after its own interests as best it
can, and overt propaganda is not a thing to object to.”13 It did
not make sense to complain that Pravda wouldn’t print a word
against Stalin, any more, as Orwell put it, “than one would expect the Catholic Herald to denounce the Pope.”14 But liberal
opinion was not, ostensibly at least, subservient to some
higher authority—it purported to speak the truth to power
(that, in theory, was what made it liberal), which was why its
dishonesty was so hypocritical. The problem, Orwell believed,
was “that one cannot expect intelligent criticism or even plain
honesty from liberal writers and journalists who are under no
direct pressure to falsify their opinions.”15 It was subservient
opinion passed off as though it were independent-minded,
and dressed up in the trappings of intellectual probity (above
all the supposed probity of value-free jargon) that posed the
greatest threat to clear thinking about politics, because, Orwell
claimed, “it weakens the instinct by which free peoples can
tell what is and what is not dangerous.”16

Hypocrisy: an English vice
Nevertheless, when one turns away from the forms of political
expression that Orwell most despised to the forms of expression that he was willing to defend, it becomes clear that his
championing of transparency did not translate into a straightforward defence of political sincerity or openness. There were
various forms of political expression that Orwell was prepared
176

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

to countenance in which a kind of double standard, hypocrisy,
or deliberate concealment was being practiced, so long as that
concealment had an element of truthfulness about it. And by
this I do not mean the crudely honest dishonesty of selfprofessed Stalinists, to which I shall return later.17 Rather, I
am thinking of Orwell’s defence of the various, complicated
hypocrisies of being English. Take, for example, Orwell’s
treatment of two very English writers whose political views he
emphatically did not share: Rudyard Kipling and P. G. Wodehouse. Orwell was willing to stick up for both of them, and in
both cases it was because, whatever might be said against
them, they were at least less hypocritical than those who used
hypocrisy as a stick to beat them with.
Thus, while Kipling’s imperialism was repugnant to
Orwell—“it is no use pretending,” he wrote, “that Kipling’s
view of life, as a whole, can be accepted or even forgiven by
any civilised person”—Kipling himself was not, for a variety
of different reasons.18 First, Orwell felt that Kipling was at
least open about his prejudices. He had a worldview that he
was willing to defend for what it was, and as such he stood in
obvious contrast to those “humanitarian” hypocrites who
condemned empire while relying on its fruits to sustain their
comfortable lifestyles. As Orwell puts it, in a characteristically
belligerent (and over-the-top) passage from The Road to Wigan
Pier:
It is so easy to be witty about the British Empire. The White
Man’s Burden and “Rule Britannia” and Kipling’s novels and
Anglo-Indian bores—who could even mention such things
without a snigger? . . . That is the attitude of the typical leftwinger towards imperialism, and a thoroughly ﬂabby, boneless
attitude it is . . . For apart from any other consideration, the high
standard of life we enjoy in England depends upon our keeping
a tight hold on the Empire. Under the capitalist system, in order
that England may live in comparative comfort, a hundred million Indians must live on the verge of starvation—an evil state
177

CHAPTER SIX

of affairs, but you acquiesce in it every time you step into a taxi
or eat a plate of strawberries and cream.19

Second, Kipling’s prose chimed with a truth about the
world, despite the fact that it also represented a failure to face
up to certain truths: “He dealt largely in platitudes,” Orwell
says, “and since we live in a world of platitudes, much of what
he says sticks.”20 But perhaps most importantly, Orwell felt
that Kipling always kept something of his own personal character in reserve, and that there was therefore always more to
Kipling than the views with which he was associated. Orwell
described this extra something as his essential “personal decency,” and he said on Kipling’s death: “It is worth remembering that he was the most widely popular English writer of our
time, and yet that no one, perhaps, so consistently refrained
from making a vulgar show of his personality.”21 Kipling was
saved, in Orwell’s eyes, by the fact that his writing, for all its
robustness (and not least its robustness about power), was not
fully self-revealing, in that it did not allow one to see all the
way through to the man underneath.
Wodehouse, by contrast, was saved by the fact that the writing was the man—Orwell accepts that Wodehouse was “his
own Bertie Wooster.”22 This is why Orwell believed it was absurd to pillory Wodehouse for the mildly treacherous radio
broadcasts he made while interned by the Nazis during the
Second World War (treacherous not for their content but for
the fact he made them and allowed the Nazis to exploit the
connection). Wodehouse was what Orwell called “a political
innocent,” someone whose essential stupidity about politics—
“his mild facetiousness covering an unthinking acceptance [of
the world he inhabited]”—rescued him from the charge of the
worst sorts of hypocrisy.23 Instead, the worst of the hypocrites
were Wodehouse’s critics after the war, who saw in him “an
ideal whipping boy,” and used him as a distraction from any
attempt to expose the far more extensive collaborations and
deceptions that underpinned their own war efforts. “All kinds
178

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

of petty rats are hunted down,” Orwell wrote in his defence
of Wodehouse, “while almost without exception the big rats
escape.”24
One might say, therefore, that what Kipling and Wodehouse
had in common for Orwell was that there was a kind of integrity to their double standards, though of very different
kinds. Kipling deliberately concealed something of himself
but did not seek to conceal the truth about the nature of imperial power; Wodehouse exposed himself, and thereby inadvertently exposed something of the double standards of the
system of power in which he unthinkingly believed. Kipling,
in this sense, knew what he was about and Wodehouse did
not, and that was what served to rescue them respectively
from the more culpable hypocrisy of their “intellectual” critics. But it is also worth noting that what rescued Kipling and
Wodehouse in Orwell’s eyes was that each did not share the
other’s vice. The easiest way to illustrate this is to consider
what would have happened if their positions had been reversed. It is inconceivable that if Kipling had found himself in
Wodehouse’s position, broadcasting for the Nazis for the sake
of a quiet life, then Orwell would have defended him; there
was nothing innocent about Kipling, and therefore there was
no way of imagining that he might have been self-deceived in
such circumstances. Stupidity might just retain its integrity
in the face of totalitarianism, but knowingness never could.
Equally, it is impossible to imagine Orwell defending a P. G.
Wodehouse view of British imperialism, because there was
nothing innocent about imperialism, and political naivety in
that context was always culpable. Kipling could write about
empire because he was in no sense naive about it; what made
Orwell despair of British imperialism was that it was not on
the whole staffed by Kiplings, but by Bertie Woosters.
The hypocrisies of Englishness are therefore complicated:
they are various, and they have their various uses (not least to
expose the far worse hypocrisies of others), but they are also
extremely dangerous when let loose in the wrong context. And
179

CHAPTER SIX

it is this complicated attitude to hypocrisy that underpins Orwell’s most famous discussion of what it means to be English,
in the essays published in 1941 as The Lion and the Unicorn, including the one entitled “England, Your England.” There are
two sorts of hypocrisy described in that essay. The ﬁrst is the
relatively innocent hypocrisy of democracy that is underpinned in the English case by the sentimentality of the working classes and the stupidity of those who rule them. This
innocent stupidity is exempliﬁed for Orwell by the “morally
sound” willingness of the English upper classes to get themselves killed in wartime. Even the Bertie Woosters of this
world, who can’t be relied on for much, can be relied on for
this: “Bertie, a sluggish Don Quixote, has no wish to tilt at
windmills, but he would hardly think of refusing to do so
when honour calls.”25 Democracy, for Orwell, is a charade, but
the innocence of the English version is what saves it from being a total fraud—that is, the play-acting is taken seriously,
and so helps to preserve the system from the degradation that
comes from merely going through the motions. “It follows,”
Orwell writes, “that British democracy is less of a fraud than it
sometimes appears. A foreign observer sees only the huge inequality of wealth, the unfair electoral system, the governingclass control over the press, radio and education, and concludes
that democracy is simply a polite name for dictatorship.”26 But
democracy is more than just a name in England, because the
hypocrisy is more pervasive than that would suggest. It
shapes and conditions the way that people behave. “Public life
in England,” Orwell declares, “has never been openly scandalous. It has not reached the pitch of disintegration at which
humbug can be dropped.”27 This, in large part, is what distinguishes English democracy from the continental versions that
collapsed into, or in the face of, fascism: it is saved by its unthinking hypocrisy.
The image Orwell uses to capture the essence of English
public life is as follows: it is “a society which is ruled by the

180

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

sword, no doubt, but a sword which must never be taken out of
its scabbard.”28 He goes on:
An illusion can become a half-truth, a mask can alter the expression of a face . . . The sword is still in the scabbard, and
while it stays there corruption cannot go beyond a certain
point . . . Even hypocrisy is a powerful safeguard . . . [It is] a
symbol of the strange mixture of reality and illusion, democracy and privilege, humbug and decency, the subtle network of
compromises, by which the nation keeps itself in familiar
shape.29

But this is not the whole story when it comes to the English
vice of hypocrisy, which turns out to be a kind of virtue only in
this particular context. There is another sort of hypocrisy at
work in English life, beyond that of democratic solidarity. That
is the hypocrisy of empire, and here Orwell tends to side with
the foreign observers who detect in English attitudes to their
empire a culpable double standard (it is no coincidence that
the one place where Orwell explicitly refers to hypocrisy as
“the British vice” is in his “Reﬂections on Gandhi”). In relation to their domestic affairs, Orwell believes that foreigners
are wrong to write off the English hatred of “militarism” as
merely a “decadent” form of hypocrisy. But it is impossible to
ignore the fact that in relation to the politics of empire, English
innocence cannot be what it appears. After all, it is in the
essence of imperial power that the sword does not remain in
the scabbard. The recurring images in Orwell’s work that seek
to capture the essence of the imperial experience are of the
weapon, however blunt and however crude, being unsheathed.
Orwell himself described his personal awakening to the
true nature of imperial power as occurring in Colombo harbour, during his trip out to Burma to begin his career as a military policeman. There, he witnessed a native servant, who
had dropped a trunk that was being taken on board the ship,

181

CHAPTER SIX

being viciously kicked on the backside by a white police sergeant, to the obvious approval of the other passengers.30 This,
for Orwell, was in essence what empire meant: inescapable
brutality. But the most memorable of all Orwell’s images of imperialism in action comes in perhaps the most celebrated of all
his shorter pieces of writing, “Shooting an Elephant.” (There
is considerable controversy among Orwell’s biographers about
whether the event described in the essay actually happened,
and therefore whether it should be classiﬁed as ﬁction or nonﬁction; for my purposes here, I don’t think it matters.) Orwell,
in Burma, is called upon to shoot an elephant that is said to
have killed a man, before a crowd of eager Burmese onlookers.
This event, Orwell says, offers a glimpse of “the dirty work of
Empire at close quarters.”31 And what it shows is that the
agents of imperial authority don’t know what they are doing;
they are merely acting out a part over which they have lost
control. “I was seemingly the leading actor in the piece,” Orwell writes, “but in reality I was only an absurd puppet
pushed to and fro by the will of those yellow faces behind.”32
Orwell did not wish to shoot the elephant, but he felt he had
no choice. The white man on imperial duty “wears a mask and
his face grows to ﬁt it. I had got to shoot the elephant.”33 The
hypocrisy of empire is revealed here as the unsheathing of the
weapon by someone who does not wish to use it, and has lost
all control of what can be done with it, or even of what it is for,
but must go through with his part anyway.
In “Shooting an Elephant,” Orwell (that is, the “Orwell” of
the piece) doesn’t exactly come across as Bertie Wooster—he is
far too reﬂective for that—but he is not a million miles away
from the world of P. G. Wodehouse either. Bertie Wooster
would also shoot the elephant, and though in his case it might
not cause him any great pangs of conscience, it would also be
because he was the puppet, not the puppeteer. The stupidity of
the British ruling class, which was their saving grace so far as
democracy was concerned, was catastrophic in the context of

182

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

empire. Kipling, who was neither stupid, nor strictly speaking
a member of the British ruling class (he was, essentially, a journalist), at least did not try to pretend that the empire was
something it was not. But not even Kipling was able to tell the
basic truth about the British Empire: that democratic hypocrisy
and imperial hypocrisy simply do not mix. Democratic
hypocrisy, in Orwell’s terms, is saved by the element of selfdeception on which it rests, which is what turns the illusion
into a half-truth, and keeps the sword in its scabbard. Imperial
hypocrisy is rendered self-defeating by that very same selfdeception, since the sword cannot remain in the scabbard, and
will be deployed for the supposed beneﬁt of the people it is being used to coerce, by people who are unable to be honest
with themselves about the nature of that coercion.
In a way, it is easy to see what the solution is to this clash of
hypocrisies: democracy needs to abandon imperialism, as Orwell was convinced that Britain needed to divest itself of its
empire, and to face up to the sacriﬁces that that would involve.
But it is important to recognise that the democracy that abandons imperialism does not abandon hypocrisy: rather, it preserves its own sustainable hypocrisy by ditching the form of
power that makes a mockery of it. There is an alternative remedy, of course, which is to abandon hypocrisy altogether. This
is what would happen if imperialism jettisoned democracy,
rather than the other way around. An imperial order unconstrained by democratic or liberal hypocrisies, in which power
can be called by its proper name, in which the sword is always
unsheathed because there is never any need to conceal it, is
certainly possible. Indeed, Orwell believed, it was not just possible but prevalent in the world he had come to know, and
would be all-pervasive in one possible future world that he
was to imagine. Imperialism without hypocrisy is called fascism, and it is one of the distinguishing marks of fascism, as of
various other totalitarian regimes, that it does not need to be
hypocritical.34 Totalitarians can afford to be sincere about

183

CHAPTER SIX

power. Or, as Orwell put it in his essay on Kipling: “The modern totalitarians know what they are doing and the nineteenthcentury English did not know what they were doing.”35 It is
out of this sincerity that we get a third quintessentially
Orwellian image, to place alongside that of the unsheathed
sword, and that of the young military policeman stumbling
along a road in Burma, armed only with his elephant gun. The
third image is of a boot, stamping on a human face forever.

Hypocrisy and total power
This brings me to the novels, to which I cannot do justice here,
but which I want to use to illustrate some of the themes that
come out of Orwell’s nonﬁction. The ﬁrst is that the sincerity,
or anti-hypocrisy, of fascism has its counterpart in the sincerity, or anti-hypocrisy, of anti-fascism. Orwell gives an extended glimpse of what this sincerity might look like in a
passage in the novel Coming Up for Air, in which the hero
George Bowling attends a political meeting, in the period before the outbreak of hostilities between England and Germany,
and listens to a speech. Here is the passage in full:
You know the line of talk. These chaps can churn it out by the
hour. Just like a gramophone. Turn the handle, press the button, and it starts. Democracy, Fascism, Democracy. But somehow it interested me to watch him. A rather mean little man,
with a white face and a bald head, standing on a platform,
shooting out slogans. What’s he doing? Quite deliberately, and
quite openly, stirring up hatred. Doing his damnedest to make
you hate certain foreigners called Fascists. It’s a queer thing, I
thought, to be known as “Mr So-and-so, the well-known antiFascist.” A queer trade, anti-Fascism. This fellow, I suppose,
makes his living writing books against Hitler. But what did he
do before Hitler came along? And what’ll he do if Hitler ever
disappears? Same question applies to doctors, detectives, rat184

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

catchers and so forth, of course. But the grating voice went on
and on, and another thing struck me. He means it. Not faking at
all—feels every word he is saying. He’s trying to work up hatred in his audience, but that is nothing compared to the hatred
he feels himself. Every slogan’s gospel truth to him. If you cut
him open all you’d ﬁnd inside would be Democracy-FascismDemocracy. Interesting to know a chap like that in private life.
But does he have a private life? Or does he only go round from
platform to platform, working up hatred? Perhaps even his
dreams are slogans.36

This scene foreshadows a better-known scene in a betterknown book: the hate session in Nineteen Eighty-Four, in which
the crowd is required to vent its fury at the hate-ﬁgure of Emmanuel Goldstein, and does so in all sincerity, even Winston
Smith, who feels the hatred wash through him (“the horrible
thing about the Two Minutes Hate was not that one was
obliged to act a part, but that it was impossible to avoid joining
in. Within thirty seconds any pretence was always unnecessary”).37 The scene from Coming Up for Air also foreshadows a
theme of that later book, which is what it might mean not to
have a private life, not to have anything held back or reserved,
but simply to be the slogans that one is forced to spout
through and through. In such a world, hypocrisy would not
simply be valuable, it would in a sense represent the ultimate
value, because its precondition is having something to hide.
Nineteen Eighty-Four is a description of a world in which
hypocrisy has become impossible. And this applies to the language of Nineteen Eighty-Four as well. Just as “Machiavellian”
has become a facile term for any kind of political deception or
double-dealing, so “double-think” (which is routinely transcribed into “double-speak”) has itself become a cliché to describe any form of political expression that is not what it seems.
But in Orwell’s own terms, “double-think” constituted a very
particular form of linguistic abuse, through which language is
emptied out of all meaning, so that it becomes impossible for
185

CHAPTER SIX

language to hide anything. The hypocrisies that Orwell attacks in “Politics and the English Language” are not the forerunners of “double-think”; instead that essay is about the
deliberate concealment of the truth behind a mask of verbiage
(which is what connects it to the arguments of Hobbes and
Bentham). That is not what is going on in Nineteen Eighty-Four.
Take the purest, most terrifying manifestation of doublethink, the slogans that sit on top of the Ministry of Truth:
war is peace
freedom is slavery
ignorance is strength

There is nothing hypocritical about this message, because it
has nothing to hide. But nor is it a metaphor. It is a lie so large
and so open that it makes the terms of hypocrisy obsolete.
Let me return at this point to the author with whom I began
this book, Judith Shklar. In a commemorative lecture she delivered to the American Political Studies Association in 1984
(the year she also published Ordinary Vices), Shklar argues that
Orwell goes too far in his Nineteen Eighty-Four—it is a book, in
her terms, without a moral centre, and so it lacks a sense of the
cruelties of everyday life, and therefore of the ways cruelty
can insinuate itself as a vice.38 But Richard Rorty, in Contingency, Irony and Solidarity, suggests that Orwell’s book offers
an exempliﬁcation of the liberal understanding that, in his
words (but also Shklar’s), “cruelty is the worst thing we do.”
For Rorty, it does not matter that Orwell’s account appears to
stand at one remove from the world we actually inhabit, in the
intensity and remorselessness of its ﬁxation on cruelty. Rather
it is to be understood as a kind of rhetorical redescription of
that world, “a redescription,” Rorty writes, “of what may happen or has been happening—to be compared, not with reality,
but with alternative descriptions of the same events.”39 But I
would go further—what Orwell is offering us is a rhetorical
redescription of totalitarianism as a world in which rhetorical
redescription has become impossible. The existence described
186

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

in Nineteen Eighty-Four is not simply colourless, though it is
certainly that, in all its drab, grey remorselessness; it is also
one in which language has been denuded of its ability to
colour reality, or indeed to cloak it as something it is not. Vices
are not dressed up as virtues in Nineteen Eighty-Four. They are
simply not dressed up at all.
What, though, of Orwell’s greatest book, Animal Farm, of
which Rorty also says: “It was not its relation to reality, but its
relation to the most popular alternative description of recent
events, that gave it its power”?40 Isn’t the rhetorical redescription being practiced here an exercise in the exposure of
hypocrisy, rather than the exposure of a world where hypocrisy
is impossible? Certainly, Animal Farm seems, at its most literal,
to be a litany of hypocrisies: from the double standards of the
pigs (changing the commandment from “No animal shall
drink alcohol” to “No animal shall drink alcohol to excess,” the
day after they have discovered the joys of whisky), to the false
promises of Napoleon, their Stalin-like leader, and the sanctimony of his speechifying. It is certainly not a colourless world
(even at the end of the book, the animals can still be moved by
the sight of the green ﬂag of Animal Farm ﬂying high), nor
one in which language lacks the ability to colour reality ( just
think of the rousing terms of the song, “Beasts of England”—
“Beasts of England, beasts of Ireland / Beasts of every land
and clime, / Hearken well and spread my tidings / Of the
golden future time”).41 But at its end, Animal Farm also points
towards the end of hypocrisy, as the criteria by which
hypocrisy might be judged themselves become unsustainable.
Animal Farm is renamed Manor Farm, and it was only while it
was Animal Farm that it made sense to see it as a place in
which hypocrisy was being practiced. The seven commandments (including “No animal shall drink alcohol to excess,”
which is hypocritical, now that many of the pigs are alcoholics) are replaced by a single commandment (“All animals
are equal, but some animals are more equal than others,”
which is not hypocritical, because it is an open and cynical
187

CHAPTER SIX

absurdity). The ﬁnal scene in the book describes the moment
when the leading pigs are glimpsed playing cards with the
humans, with whom they are now happy to do business, and
drink whisky, and ﬁght. Their faces, Orwell says, began “melting and changing.” He goes on:
Twelve voices were shouting in anger and they were all alike.
No question, now, what had happened to the faces of the pigs.
The creatures outside looked from pig to man, and from man to
pig, and from pig to man again: but already it was impossible to
say which was which.42

Throughout his life, Orwell, like Bentham, was obsessed
with masks, including the various masks of power, and the
masks worn by those who sought to hide the truth about
power. It was his preoccupation with masks that makes sense
of one of Orwell’s most famous lines, and one of his most misunderstood. In perhaps the last thing he ever wrote, Orwell
declared: “At ﬁfty, every man has the face he deserves.”43 This
does not mean, as it is so often mistakenly taken to mean, that
we deserve our physical appearance; what it means is that we
deserve our mask, the face we choose to show to the world, because having lived with it for so long we can no longer claim
that it is merely a façade. Here, though, at the end of Animal
Farm, is a scene in which no one is wearing a mask, because it
is no longer possible to see what there is to mask. Once again,
no one has anything to hide, and that is where the terror lies.

Hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy
Orwell, therefore, was an anti-hypocrite for whom there were
worse things than hypocrisy, which is why Rorty is right to
see him as a liberal in the Shklar mould. He was also an antihypocrite who understood how anti-hypocrisy could itself
become the vice it was supposed to be rescuing us from.
Democrats who sought to confront fascism on its own terms,
188

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

like “Mr So-and-So the well-known anti-Fascist” in Coming Up
for Air, were succumbing to the temptations of sincerity that
ideological conﬂict offers to all its participants. These are the
temptations that it continues to offer to this day—Christopher
Hitchens is undoubtedly sincere in his personal crusade
against Islamofascism, which is what makes his attempt to
corral Orwell into that all-or-nothing struggle so unconvincing. As Orwell said in March 1940 of the war then only just begun: “For Heaven’s sake, let us not suppose we go into this
war with clean hands. It is only while we cling to the consciousness that our hands are not clean that we retain the right
to defend ourselves.”44 And as he said in February 1944 of the
war whose end was still nowhere in sight: “In the last analysis,
our only claim to victory is that if we win the war, we shall tell
fewer lies about it than our adversaries.”45 This is not truth
versus lies; it is fewer lies versus more lies, or democratic
hypocrisy versus the total lie. Indeed, for Orwell, it was the
hypocrisy of the English that served to ensure that they were
not entirely self-deceived about the moral compromises entailed in confronting a totalitarian ideology; they at least still
knew what it meant to have something to hide.
Orwell himself was not immune to the temptations of sincerity. Unlike Christopher Hitchens, I cannot claim to have
read through everything Orwell wrote and found nothing of
which the Orwell admirer need be embarrassed: ﬁrst, because
it would be hypocritical of me to claim that I have read everything, and second, because in what I have read I repeatedly
found Orwell’s naive faith in the “truth” of the socialist alternative to capitalism to be, at times, toe-curlingly misplaced
(the most inaccurate of Orwell’s predictions about the inevitable coming of socialism tend to be prefaced with the
words “Everyone knows . . .”). Equally hard to take is Orwell’s
insistence on a kind of honest proletarian consciousness to set
against the corruptions of the intellectual mind, ranging from
the crass simplicities expressed in the second half of the Road
to Wigan Pier (“A generation ago every intelligent person was
189

CHAPTER SIX

in some sense a revolutionary; nowadays it would be nearer
the mark to say that every intelligent person is a reactionary,”
etc.46) through to his hints in Nineteen Eighty-Four that the
only prospect of future salvation lies with the “proles.” Orwell was also wrong about the fascist tendencies of British
ruling classes, in part because he appears to have ignored his
own lessons about the pervasiveness of English hypocrisy. He
seemed to think that there was a serious prospect that the
British would divest themselves of democracy before they
would divest themselves of empire, and that when it came to
the crunch English blimpishness might reveal itself to have a
fascist heart. P. G. Wodehouse was closer to the truth with his
portrayal of the true face of English fascism, in the gimlet-eyed,
palpably absurd ﬁgure of Sir Roderick Spode, the underwear
tycoon. The unthinking compromises of democratic life
served in the end to render homegrown fascism a kind of
joke.
There is little doubt that Orwell really believed in what he
said about the possibilities for a kind of “honest” socialism
and about the threat posed to it by the fascist tendencies inherent in all forms of capitalism. In this respect, he was least
convincing in his writing about politics when he was at his
most sincere, just as his current champions are at their least
convincing when they are most sincere. But he was most convincing when he was describing the perils of political sincerity, and how closely they were related to the worst sorts of
hypocrisy. He understood that hypocrisy cannot simply be
opposed with anti-hypocrisy; sometimes anti-hypocrisy needs
to be opposed with hypocrisy instead. There are no ﬁxed lines
to be drawn in this battle. Orwell always keeps sight of the fact
that hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy are not discrete entities,
and they have the potential to leak into each other. So, for example, it is not true that there are no hypocrites in Nineteen
Eighty-Four. There is at least one—one of the few historical ﬁgures to make an appearance in that novel—glimpsed ﬂeetingly, and at more than one remove: in Victory Square, Winston
190

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

Smith wanders past “the statue of a man on horseback which
was supposed to represent Oliver Cromwell.”47 Orwell believed that Cromwell was a forerunner of the dictators of the
twentieth century, in his ruthlessness and his unashamed embrace of cruelty.48 But he also knew that Cromwell, in all his
hypocrisy, stood somewhere at the foundations of English
democracy as well.
His place there is symbolised by the real statue of Cromwell
that still stands outside the Houses of Parliament. In his book
Roundhead Reputations, Blair Worden devotes a chapter to the
controversy surrounding this statue, which was put up in
1899. There was much party political manoeuvring before it ﬁnally received parliamentary approval (its champion on the
government benches in these debates was John Morley). In the
end, the project was only approved when Rosebery’s government secured tacit Tory support (the Tories’ tactics appear to
have been not to block it so that they could subsequently mock
it; they also insisted that Rosebery pay for it himself, personally). Nevertheless, the Liberals were long since out of ofﬁce
by the time the project was completed. Rosebery, no longer
prime minister, gave a commemorative address on the day the
statue was ﬁnally unveiled, the central thrust of which was to
defend Cromwell against the charge of hypocrisy. It is a wonderfully disingenuous speech, and it includes this magniﬁcent
non sequitur: “We who are here tonight do not believe he was
a hypocrite, or we would not be here.”49 What Rosebery might
more truthfully have said is that they would not have been
there had they not been hypocrites themselves, since many,
including Rosebery himself (for whom the whole business
had become somewhat distasteful), held deeply ambivalent
views about Cromwell, which they were doing their best to
conceal.
Among the subjects of dispute that delayed the completion
of the statue had been the appropriate pose for its subject.
Cromwell’s strongest supporters wanted him in full martial
pose, on horseback, as Orwell was later to imagine him in
191

CHAPTER SIX

Photo © copyright Jim Batty

Victory Square. His opponents didn’t want him there at all. In
the end, a compromise was reached. Cromwell is depicted not
on horseback but standing on the ground, looking modestly
downwards. In one hand he holds a Bible (the original plan
had been for the Bible to be open but in another classic piece of
English hypocrisy it was decided that it would be better if it
was closed). In the other hand he holds a sword. The sword
has been removed from its scabbard, which hangs behind him,
but it is posed deliberately pointing downwards, with its tip
192

THE HYPOCRISY OF IDEOLOGY

touching the ground. Cromwell rests his hand lightly on the
top. It is a deeply compromised image, but it is also an appropriate one. It foreshadows Orwell’s understanding of the
unavoidable hypocrisies of democratic power, but it echoes
Hobbes as well. Here is Hobbes in Behemoth, describing the
moment when Cromwell ﬁnally asserted the authority of Parliament to defend the people, and asserted his own authority
over Parliament at the same time:
Last of all, Cromwell himself told them, it was now expected
that Parliament should govern and defend the kingdom, and
not any longer let the people expect their safety from a man
whose heart God had hardened; nor let those, that had so well
defended the Parliament, be left hereafter to the rage of an irreconcilable enemy, lest they seek their safety in some other
way. This again was threatening; as also his laying his hand
upon his sword when he spake it.50

193

CONCLUSION
SINCERITY AND HYPOCRISY
IN DEMOCRATIC POLITICS

The story I have tried to tell in this book is of an ongoing
struggle within the English-speaking tradition of liberal political thought to escape some of the traps that the problem of
hypocrisy poses for anyone who takes it seriously. All of the
writers I have discussed did take the problem of hypocrisy seriously, and they all wanted to ﬁnd some way round or out of
it. In their attempts to do so, they encountered certain persistent difﬁculties but also pointed the way towards some important general lessons about how to deal with hypocrisy in
politics—including the crucial question of when it’s worth
worrying about, and when it isn’t. A number of these lessons,
I believe, still hold for the politics of today. In this ﬁnal chapter, I want to try to make this connection explicit, and to see
what contemporary politics might learn from a history of this
kind. Above all, I want to explore whether we might get a
sense of perspective on our own problems by looking to the
past.
If nothing else, I hope that this book has made clear some
of the ways in which our current anxieties about sincerity,
hypocrisy, and lies in politics have deep roots in the liberal tradition, and why therefore we do not necessarily have to step
outside that tradition to gain some insight into them. We don’t
have to go all the way back to Machiavelli and a pre-liberal
194

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

perspective, nor do we have to go all the way with Nietzsche
towards an anti-liberal one. However, I would not wish to
claim that the tradition of thought described in this book can
be automatically assumed to run on from the book’s endpoint
with Orwell through to the present. It may be that we are further away from the 1940s than the 1940s were from the 1640s
in relation to some of the central concerns of the authors under
review. To take just one example: does anyone still really care
about Oliver Cromwell’s hypocrisy, apart from historians?
Perhaps the last place where Cromwell’s perceived defects of
character might still have had the capacity to shape political
argument and fashion political enmities is Northern Ireland,
but even in Northern Ireland this issue is not what it was. A
political climate that permits Ian Paisley and Martin McGuinness to sit down together in the same government is not one in
which the question of Cromwell’s hypocrisy is going to retain
much heat, for a whole range of fairly obvious reasons. In this
respect, as in many others, the world has moved on. Oliver
Cromwell’s statue outside the British Parliament is just another statue—as indeed the Parliament is now just another
parliament—and its modest pose seems well suited to its status as one more piece of ceremonial stonework for people to
ignore.
But it is important to resist the temptation to seek to bypass
history altogether by reverting back to the genre that I warned
against at the start of this book—that of maxims, with their seductive little truths about politics and character, that can be
turned to any situation and made to ﬁt any problem. One of
the distinctive features of the tradition I have been discussing
is that it suggests there are no easy, catch-all solutions to the
difﬁculties we still face in deciding how to handle deceitful or
dissembling politicians. At best, there are some patterns that
repeat themselves in the complex weave of the past and the
present, ones that we might miss if we just focussed on the
small patch of political detail in front of our eyes. In what follows I will try to highlight these patterns as I see them, and to
195

CONCLUSION

ask what they tell us about our own predicament. What is certain, though, is that it does not pay to be too dogmatic about
any lessons that can be drawn here. Indeed, that is the lesson
that underlies any others to follow—that there are no simple
solutions to the problem of hypocrisy in politics, that it is pervasive and complex, and that the same difﬁculties recur in different settings.

The temptations of anti-hypocrisy
The pervasiveness of the problem of political hypocrisy, and
its ability to ensnare almost any political argument, means
that people will always be looking for some way to break free
from it. The thinkers that I have discussed here are, in their
different ways, no exception. There comes a point when almost any political thinker is liable to succumb to the temptation to seek an escape from the hypocrisy of political life by
demanding a clean-up, or a clean-out, or at the very least some
sort of permanent insulation from its more corrosive effects,
rather than simply carrying on going round in circles. The desire to wriggle free from the hold hypocrisy has on us all is a
recurring feature of even the most sophisticated discussions
of its role in liberal politics. And this longing for some sort of
escape is something that unquestionably still exerts its pull
today. Commentators on contemporary politics can often be
heard demanding that we confront the problem of political
hypocrisy once and for all. However, the fact remains that this
demand is incoherent, because it is self-defeating. This is the
ﬁrst lesson of the story I have been trying to tell: there is no
way of breaking out from the hypocrisy of political life, and all
attempts to ﬁnd such an escape route are a delusion.
Many contemporary expressions of disgust at the slipperiness of politicians could come directly out of the pages of the
past, and recognising their essential familiarity is one way of
appreciating just how futile such protests really are. There is
196

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

always a temptation to believe that the problem of politicians
who neither say what they mean nor mean what they say
keeps getting worse, and that it does so because no one has
been willing to take a ﬁrm enough stand against it. But plenty
of people have tried to take a ﬁrm stand against it, which is
a large part of the reason why it seems to keep getting worse.
Here, for example, is the political commentator Peter Oborne
writing in his book The Rise of Political Lying (2005) about what
he sees as the degradation of British public life under the government of Tony Blair, with its obsession with news management and spin:
What Britain really needs is not just a change in the law but a
change of heart. We face a choice. We can do nothing, and carry
on cheating, and deceiving each other, and wait for the public
anger, alienation and disgust that will follow. We can watch the
gradual debasement of decent democratic politics, and the
rapid rise of the shysters and the frauds and—before very long
perhaps—something more sinister by far. Or we can try and
act once more as moral human beings. It’s a common effort. It
affects us all, politicians, journalists, citizens. But there is hope.
Britain has a magniﬁcent tradition of public integrity and civic
engagement, which can be reclaimed. It could even be better
than before.1

This could come, practically word for word, from Trollope’s
social criticism of the 1850s. And as in Trollope’s case, it is little more than a reﬂex cry of pain; as a line of argument about
how to deal with duplicity in politics, it is going nowhere.
There are two basic problems with the case Oborne makes.
First, we never do face a fundamental choice of this kind.
Hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy are joined together, as Shklar
said, to form a discrete system, so that it is never a question of
truth versus lies; it is, at best, a choice between different kinds
of truth and different kinds of lies. All-or-nothing choices are
in this context always an illusion. Second, Oborne himself exempliﬁes the impossibility of drawing a line anywhere in this
197

CONCLUSION

shifting heap of sand. Oborne is, among other things, a wellrewarded journalist for Associated Newspapers, in which capacity he hounds the political class from morning to night
about their perceived moral turpitude, thereby making the
problem he describes worse, by inﬂating the cycle of recrimination and counter-recrimination that produces it.
In this role, Oborne has occasionally made the news as well as
simply reporting it. For instance, during the cash-for-honours
affair that dogged the last days of Tony Blair’s premiership,
Oborne accused the prime minister’s ofﬁcial spokesman (Tom
Kelly) of lying to the press. (The point at issue was whether the
police had required one of Blair’s police interviews to be kept
secret, and for how long—as is the way with these sorts of arguments, it is hard with the beneﬁt of even a little bit of hindsight to see why anyone should have cared.) Oborne made his
accusation against Kelly at a lobby brieﬁng, ensuring that it
was given a wide public airing. The transcript of the exchange
between them shows it descending into a miserable round of
hectoring, denial, accusation, counter-denial, and counteraccusation, as Oborne accuses Kelly of being a serial liar, and
Kelly accuses Oborne of trading in innuendo. The exchange
ends with Kelly telling Oborne that if he carries on calling him
a liar, he will see him in court.2 And as Trollope said in 1855,
“the world looks on, believing none of them.”
The absurdity of scavenging journalists like Oborne demanding moral renewal in public life tends to produce another, countervailing rallying cry, which is to take the side of
the political classes against the journalists, and to say that the
collapse of standards is the latter’s fault, for making impossible demands. Trollope himself underwent a shift of this
kind—from blaming the Disraelis to blaming the Quintus
Slides—over the course of his own political career. The same
move is visible today. It is the line taken, for instance, by John
Lloyd in his self-explanatorily titled book What the Media Are
Doing to Our Politics (2004). Lloyd’s account, unlike Oborne’s,
is not absurd, and his argument has a good deal to be said for
198

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

it—in an age of an almost limitless capacity for scrutiny of the
political class, beyond anything Bentham could have dreamed
of and beyond what even he might have wished for, it is reasonable to hope for some restraint from the scrutineers, in
their own interests as well as ours, to prevent the cycle of
masking and unmasking from collapsing into farce. But the
problem with a book like Lloyd’s is that it does nonetheless
constitute a taking of sides, which is another of the perennial
temptations when confronted by political hypocrisy.
Lloyd is not demanding a fresh start. He is acknowledging
that things are never going to be perfect, and that to expect
complete sincerity and honesty of politicians or journalists is a
pipedream. But for that very reason he believes that it remains
possible to identify some people—journalists—as clearly
worse than others—politicians—because of their inability to
recognise this limitation on what they do. Yet what Lloyd cannot escape from is the fact that the politicians and the journalists are locked in this together. Each side believes that they are
more sinned against than sinning. So seeking to separate
them out by apportioning the blame, however well intentioned the endeavour, will inevitably stoke the problem that it
is designed to resolve, because the journalists will ask: why
should the politicians be the ones who are allowed to get away
with it?
This is a theme that has recurred throughout this book: the
futility of trying to resolve the problem of political hypocrisy
by taking sides, in order to say that though we may all be hypocrites, at least our hypocrisy isn’t as bad as theirs (or in
Lloyd’s case, because he is himself a journalist, at least their
hypocrisy isn’t as bad as ours). Taking sides in this way requires the deployment of a kind of knowingness about politics
to draw the line between the people who are in control of what
they are doing and those who are not. It is a line of thought
that we have seen in Mandeville, who used it to defend his
own particular brand of Whiggism—Mandevillian Whigs truly
understand the problem of hypocrisy, which is what makes
199

CONCLUSION

theirs less culpable than that of their opponents. It’s there, too,
in Morley, who used it to defend his brand of liberalism—
Morley’s liberals understand the nature of political compromise, which is what makes their compromises more tolerable
than those of the Tories. And it’s there in a politician like Tony
Blair, who has used it to defend his brand of progressivism
against all those cynics and sneerers who have failed to understand just how hard it is to do good in the morally compromised world of politics. In each case, the attempt to hold this
line is underpinned by a distinction between ﬁrst- and secondorder hypocrisy, between those whose hypocrisy is bounded
by an understanding that hypocrisy is unavoidable and those
whose hypocrisy has tipped over into self-deception. But the
recurring problem is that to profess that one is oneself merely
a ﬁrst-order hypocrite is in the context of political disagreement a form of second-order hypocrisy, because it is selfexculpatory, and threatens to tip over into its own kind of
self-deception. Laying out the inner dynamics of this argument can be complicated, as we have seen in Mandeville’s
case. So let me try to summarise the difﬁculty as simply as
possible. In politics, saying “Well, at least I’m not as hypocritical as you” always leaves one open to the riposte “Well, you
are if you really believe that” (and, of course, if you don’t really believe it, then you’re a hypocrite too).
In this context, it is hardly surprising that there is another
perennial temptation, which is to seek to escape from the
endless cycle of accusation and counter-accusation that is
democratic politics by transplanting the problem of political
hypocrisy into some higher realm, where it becomes manageable again. We saw something like this with Orwell, who
sought an escape in his own brand of common-sense socialism, through which the basic decency of working people
would be allowed to come through; with Sidgwick, who
sought it in what I called “the cleaner and crisper compromises of liberal imperialism,” where a philosophical approach
to politics might be protected from the vagaries of politicians
200

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

endlessly pandering to public opinion; and with Bentham,
who sought it in his own closed world of neologism and jargon, in a ﬁnal attempt to keep the ﬁctions of political life at
bay. But again, as I have sought to indicate throughout this
book, in the end there is no escape. These are themselves
forms of second-order hypocrisy, because they seek to overlay
democratic hypocrisy with something that conceals its essential qualities. And like all forms of second-order hypocrisy,
either they are evidence of the thing they are designed to
counter, which makes them self-defeating, or they are evidence of self-deception, which is often worse.
All of these avenues of escape still exert their pull today,
though perhaps Orwell’s common-sense socialism only does
so very faintly (it is striking that the current generation of neoOrwellians have ditched the socialism in favour of a form of
liberal imperialism, dressed up as democratic internationalism). Contemporary politicians have shown themselves much
more prone to the last two of these temptations: seeking an escape from the messiness of democratic hypocrisy in the warm
embrace of liberal imperialism, and an escape from the constant name-calling of democratic argument in the calmer waters of technocratic jargon. The attraction lies in the illusion of
control—freed from the imperatives of democratic hypocrisy,
politicians ought to be in a position to set their own terms for
any necessary compromises with the truth. But this remains
an illusion. Liberal imperialists are no more in control of what
they are doing than any other kinds of democratic politicians,
and the need to retain the appearance of control is liable to
leave them looking more hypocritical than ever. Likewise,
politicians who construe politics in terms of agendas, roll-outs,
initiatives, consultations, partnerships, mechanisms, targets,
performance indicators, and so on, are not insulating themselves from the name-calling of party politics; they are simply
inviting more of it, because politicians who use jargon always
look like they have something to hide. Politicians who try to
ﬁnd a way out from the horrible compromises and contortions
201

CONCLUSION

that democratic politics demands of its practitioners simply
end up looking like hypocrites to everyone that they have
tried to leave behind.

The real choices
So in the tradition I have been discussing, there is one set of lessons, deriving from the persistence of the desire to cut oneself
off from political hypocrisy—by denouncing it, or taking sides,
or seeking some sort of personal insulation from it—and from
the certainty with which democratic politics will suck anyone
who attempts this way out back into its sticky embrace. These
are essentially negative lessons, and they remind us not to approach the problem of hypocrisy with false expectations about
what can be achieved. But there is another set of lessons, too,
and these are the ones that offer something more positive. All
the authors I have been talking about in this book, as well as
sometimes succumbing to the temptations of an illusory escape from political hypocrisy, have also attempted to make
sense of the discrete system of hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy in
its own terms, and rather than taking sides, to understand
when and why it might become self-defeating. In this way, they
have sought to distinguish between different kinds of
hypocrisy, rather than simply between hypocrisy and sincerity,
or between your hypocrisy and my hypocrisy. In making these
distinctions, they offer some insight into many of the real
choices we do in fact face. In what follows, I will attempt to
highlight these choices as I see them, and to identify what they
might have to do with politics as it is currently practiced. I will
do so by working backwards, from Orwell to Hobbes.
Orwell
What Orwell shows us is that democratic hypocrisy and imperial hypocrisy do not mix. The reason is that they are not
202

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

simply different, but opposed sorts of hypocrisy. Democratic
hypocrisy involves a kind of benign self-deception—its stability depends upon people growing comfortable with the mask
that conceals some of the brute facts about power, and thereby
moderating the ways that those facts play themselves out. But
this benign hypocrisy becomes malign in the context of imperialism, because empires cannot in the end conceal the brute
coercion on which they depend. Imperial hypocrisy is the attempt to dress up coercion as something it is not, but if they
are to be sustained, empires have in the end to drop their pretences about the nature of their power. In this respect, imperial
power politics tends towards sincerity. But democratic politics
tends towards the continuance of hypocrisy as the basis of its
own sustainability. Therefore, democracy tends to make a
mockery of empire, and empires tend to make a mockery of
democracies.
In so far as this dilemma presents us with a choice, it ought
to be no choice—we must plump for democracy over empire.
But what is most striking about this way of putting the matter
is that in doing so, we choose hypocrisy over sincerity. This
suggests, if nothing else, that pleas of democratic sincerity in
the context of early-twenty-ﬁrst century liberal imperialism
should set us on our guard. Democracies cannot be honest
with themselves about imperial projects—about what is
needed to sustain them, about what they cost in ﬁnancial and
moral terms—so democratic leaders who plead a sincere faith
in democracy to justify their imperial adventures have justiﬁed nothing. At the same time, the more pragmatic political
thinkers who have argued that democracies will only be
equipped to sustain the politics of liberal empire if they accustom themselves to “double standards” need to recognised that
even double standards have their own double standards. The
double standards of empire are very different from the double
standards of democracy.3 If we accustom ourselves to the former, we will ﬁnd it very hard to continue with the latter, and
vice versa.
203

CONCLUSION

Of course, this is not the only way to think about the dilemmas of liberal power at the beginning of the twenty-ﬁrst century. Other, practical considerations may trump the question
of sincerity and hypocrisy, and there may well be better arguments both for and against liberal empire.4 Nor would I wish
to claim that this clash of democratic and imperial hypocrisy
explains the immediate difﬁculties encountered by the neoconservative project to export democracy to Iraq by force of
arms. Some may say it is too soon to judge whether that project will end in ultimate failure, and anyway, earlier empires
took a long time to get going, and a long time to fall apart.
Even the British Empire, whose internal contradictions Orwell
dissected, did not implode, but only gradually faded away.
Perhaps the clash between democratic hypocrisy and imperial
hypocrisy does not necessarily spell disaster in the short-tomedium term. But Orwell at least gives us reasons to see why
it might, and given that Orwell himself is so often cited in
anger on the other side of these arguments, that is something
worth bearing in mind.
The Victorians
Of the three writers I looked at, Trollope, the least philosophical and in his way the least consistent, understood political
hypocrisy best. In Phineas Redux he offers us two types of political deceivers, drawn on the classic templates of Disraeli
(Daubeny) and Gladstone (Gresham). One is the incautious
conjurer, who is always trying to make things happen, even if
that means turning reality on its head; the other is the more
cautious hypocrite, who sticks to limits of the possible but in
so doing sublimates many of his own personal principles. The
conjurer is often sincere, but is liable to stretch the truth (as
Disraeli did); the hypocrite may be honest, but is prone to dissemble about his own character (as Gladstone did). These
types are still visible in politics today. Bill Clinton and Tony
Blair, perhaps, are both examples of sincere conjurers who
204

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

have had difﬁculty with the truth; Al Gore and Gordon Brown
are upright hypocrites, who prefer the facts but can have difﬁculty persuading the public that they are what they seem. The
Conservative leader David Cameron is clearly, and selfconsciously, in the Blair/Clinton/Disraeli mould; Hillary Clinton, perhaps surprisingly, may be more of a Brown/Gore/
Gladstone.5 I will go further into the case of Hillary Clinton in
the next section, when I consider some possible futures for
American politics. The point I want to make here is that democratic politics appears to have a tendency to produce complicated, and compromised, choices of this kind—not between
truth and lies, or sincerity and hypocrisy, but between politicians who are sincere but untruthful and those who are honest
but hypocritical.6
Inevitably, some people will prefer one type and some the
other—we have varying levels of tolerance for these different
kinds of political deception. For some of us sincerity trumps
honesty and for others honesty trumps sincerity. Equally,
fashions change, and the preference for sincere liars (which
has been the dominant trend in the politics of the last decade
or more) may eventually produce its own reaction in favour of
the upright hypocrites. But if we resist the temptation to take
sides, as Trollope did, what we can learn is how much these
different political types depend on each other (and it is fun to
imagine what Trollope might have done with a relationship
like that between the Clintons, which literally marries the two
together). These types are a permanent part of the discrete system of hypocrisy and anti-hypocrisy that allows democratic
politics to function. It is a false choice if we think that we need
ultimately to decide between them. The real choice is between
a system that can accommodate both, and one that allows either the sincere liars or the honest hypocrites to have it all
their own way. So what we should be on the lookout for is not
dishonesty or insincerity as such, but instead any signs that
our politics have become excessively intolerant of one or the
other. The real danger arises if sincerity never has to answer
205

CONCLUSION

for itself in the face of a crabbed and hypocritical insistence
on the evidence, just as it would be dangerous if reticent and
secretive politicians never had to confront publicly the question of what they really believe. A politics consisting just of
Daubenys would be intolerable, as would a politics consisting
just of Greshams. On their own they are insufferable. We need
them both as much as they each need the other.
Bentham
The political theorist John Dunn once described democracy as
“the cant of the modern world.”7 What Bentham shows is that
there is more than one way to cant about democracy. On the
one hand, the high-ﬂown language of democratic principle
can be a mask for the power relations that lie behind it, and
Bentham was always on the lookout for words that masked
the workings of power. But attempts to pin democracy down,
and to capture its workings in ﬁne detail, can also constitute a
kind of masking, because they conceal the extent to which
democracy relies on a set of ﬁctions about its own essential
character. The way we talk about democracy can be too elevated—as when we used the word as a term of approval
regardless of the desirability of the practices to which it is attached—but it can also be too ﬁne-grained in its attempts to
capture the essence of those practices, and thereby miss the
bigger picture. Highfaluting cant tends to be the province of
politicians; technical cant tends to the province of political scientists. In the hands of the former, democracy becomes just
another “colour” term to gloss over the details of political
power struggles. In the hands of the latter, it becomes distinctly colourless, but that too is a kind of gloss that serves to
cover up the impossibility of denuding democracy of all ambiguity.
If the language of democracy can be either too colourful,
or too colourless, is there any way of getting it just right? My
reading of Bentham suggests that there is not. Attempts to
206

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

retain the ﬁctional character of democracy are always vulnerable to detailed exposure of what is really going on behind the
scenes, but equally, such detailed accounts are always vulnerable to the charge that they miss what is distinctive about
democracy, which is its ability to confront power in its own
terms, with words that capture the sweeping claims of popular rule. Another way to put this is to say that the pursuit of
the true essence of democracy is always liable to result in a
form of insincerity. But it does not follow that therefore all talk
about democracy is cant. Instead, we need to distinguish the
purposes to which this talk is put, and it is here that Bentham
provides an excellent guide. Technical language and ﬁctional
language are each capable of masking the truth about democracy, but each is also capable of exposing the other as simply a
gloss on that truth. The question is not whether politicians or
political thinkers are sincere in their accounts of democracy,
but rather what their purpose is in using the language of
democracy—are they trying to hide something, or are they
trying to expose something about the inadequacies of a competing set of terms?
This connects to one of the central themes of this book: the
fact that something is a mask does not mean it cannot be used
to unmask something else. To talk of democracy in very general and elevated terms—to seek to confront dry and empty
jargon with the unarguable claims of the people to assert
themselves against their rulers—can be a means of exposing
one of the masks of power. But the same language, deployed
to cover up the detailed difﬁculties of enabling democracies to
function as structures of power in a given situation, can itself
be one of the masks of power that needs to be exposed.
Grandiose claims for democracy have been a consistent feature of political life for much of modern history. That they are
grandiose does not make them illegitimate. Sometimes—and
the later years of the Cold War might have been one such
time—such language is needed to remind us of the possibilities of popular rule, which the dusty terminology of political
207

CONCLUSION

science has tended to obscure. But at other times—and the aftermath of the Cold War might be another such time—
grandiose claims need to be punctured with a more considered
treatment of what democracy actually means on the ground.8
These considerations might seem to take us a long way from
Bentham. Nonetheless, they relate to Bentham’s insights into
the choices we face, given that democratic language can be
both a mask for power, and a means of removing the mask.
There is no point in looking to get rid of the mask altogether.
What we need to decide is what we can best use it for.
The American founders
Between them, Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and Thomas
Jefferson give us a wide panorama of the interacting dynamics
of political hypocrisy and political sincerity. Of course, this is
not the whole story of the American founding period, and
there are other players—Washington, Hamilton, Madison—
who could be added to this picture, and who would thereby
introduce themes—military, economic, constitutional—that it
ignores. Nevertheless, I hope that the account I have given is
sufﬁcient to indicate a few things: ﬁrst, how important luck is
in determining whether the appearance of sincerity can be
maintained; second, how quickly contingent political arguments can spill over into more general or abstract arguments
about the nature of political hypocrisy, and vice versa; and
third, just how difﬁcult it can be, for even the most seasoned
political practitioners, to know where the limits of political
hypocrisy should lie. The ongoing politics of hypocrisy, with
all its own uncertainties and unpredictable shifts in fortune,
makes it very hard to ﬁx any durable bounds for hypocrisy in
politics.
Underlying this, however, is a further consideration that I
tried to bring out at the end of the chapter. The moments when
politicians gain clearest insight into the limits of political
hypocrisy tend to coincide with their own moments of political
208

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

weakness. Adams often, Jefferson rarely, and Franklin perhaps never, came to see how important it is to separate out the
kind of unavoidable hypocrisy that exists within any political
system from the holding of hypocritical views about that system (and all its hypocrisies), which is much more damaging.
There is a line to be drawn between ﬁrst-order and secondorder hypocrisy in this respect. But drawing that line can be
politically incapacitating, whereas Jefferson in particular, whenever he blithely ignored it or trampled over it, found himself
politically freer. This freedom connects to a certain lack of selfconsciousness, and does not simply hold for politics: the best
way to keep a mask in place can be to forget that one is wearing a mask. What politics brings out is the difference between
living by this principle, and coming to understand it intellectually. An intellectual perspective on the problem of political
hypocrisy allows the politician to see many things, but not to
dispense with that degree of self-consciousness that can render the deepest insights self-defeating. Genuine freedom from
the problem of hypocrisy is perhaps only to be achieved with
the aid of self-deception. So there may be a hard lesson here:
when it comes to sincerity and hypocrisy in politics, one can
have intellectual insight, or one can have practical ﬂexibility,
but one cannot have both.
Mandeville
There is a lot to learn from Mandeville, not least how to write
about political hypocrisy with humour, which is a great counsel against despair. Mandeville is one of the funniest of all serious writers about politics, and it is impossible to read him
without gaining a sense of perspective on our endless anxieties about political insincerity. Laughter may really be one of
the best medicines here. But Mandeville’s purpose remains a
serious one, and though he does not resolve the problem of
political hypocrisy, he does provide us with some important
considerations when trying to achieve our own accommodation
209

CONCLUSION

with it. The ﬁrst is the importance of understanding how contingent the standards of hypocrisy and sincerity are. Dealing
with political hypocrisy is a question not just of recognising
that politicians wear masks, but of recognising that the masks
they wear must suit the age in which they ﬁnd themselves.
Politicians can ﬁnd themselves in an age in which it is best
to put on the mask of sincerity, in order to appear as though
they are not wearing a mask at all; for Mandeville it was part
of Cromwell’s genius to understand this so clearly. It may be
that we too have been living through such an age—not a
Cromwellian age of enthusiasm, but rather a period of what
might be called semi-confessional or faux-confessional politics (the confessional here being the daytime-TV studio). This
is a world in which personal revelation is valued, reticence is
derided, and openness, ease, comfort in one’s own skin is
what gives politicians a hold over their audiences. Any successful politician will need to adapt to this. But no politician
should assume that there is anything immutable about the
claims of political sincerity. There is a big difference between
adapting to the demands of a faux-confessional age, and coming to believe in them—that is, believing that sincerity and
openness have an independent value in justifying political action. That would be second-order hypocrisy.
In this respect, the double standards of modern politics are
better understood in Mandevillian than Machiavellian terms.
Mandeville highlights the contingency of all standards of political morality, and the extent to which even the most skilful
politicians must be slaves to the fashions of the times. There is
no scope in the Mandevillian worldview for the prince whose
mastery of the secret arts of government allows him to transcend the morality of the age. Instead, even princes and prime
ministers must recognise the extent to which they are not in
full control of the part they are playing, and it is that recognition that can provide security against misrule. But it is not
easy to achieve this sort of self-knowledge, and almost impossible to retain it—politicians who come to believe that they are
210

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

self-aware about the hold that hypocrisy exercises in politics
are liable to use that knowledge to make an exception for
themselves. Given this inherent tendency for self-knowledge
to translate into self-justiﬁcation, Mandeville offers two pieces
of advice that remain pertinent. The ﬁrst is not to rely too
much on the self-knowledge of politicians. We are used to the
idea that individual politicians cannot be trusted to set the
limits to their own power, and must be subject to institutional
constraints. The same ought to be true of their sincerity. Even
the ablest politicians—even the Cromwells, even the Jeffersons—are not in complete control of the part they have to play.
So no politician’s pleas of sincerity, no matter how seemingly
self-aware, should be taken at face value. Much better, as
Mandeville says, to assume that ﬁfty different people could
play the part of prime minister, than to assume that some are
uniquely qualiﬁed for that role by dint of their self-awareness.
In Mandeville’s words, “a prime minister has a vast, an unspeakable advantage, barely by being so [i.e., by simply happening to be prime minister].” That ought to be enough to set
us on our guard against incumbents who wish to add to their
advantages by insisting on their own good faith.
Mandeville’s second lesson is the closest thing there is in
this tradition to a workable maxim. The worst hypocrisy arises
when politicians pretend that easy things are difﬁcult, and difﬁcult things are easy. However, this is second-order, not ﬁrstorder, advice. It is not hard to imagine circumstances in which
it makes sense for politicians to misrepresent the ease or the
difﬁculty of what they are up to: a leader whose party is cruising to election victory might do well to insist to his or her followers that every vote still remains to be fought for, in order to
guard against complacency; likewise, a leader heading for
crushing defeat might wish to pretend victory is still there for
the taking, in order to guard against despair. But what no
politicians should do is misrepresent to themselves or anyone
else the ease or difﬁculty of taking decisions like these. It is
easy to lie when you have to; much harder to judge when the
211

CONCLUSION

lying should stop. It is hypocrisy for politicians to pretend
that decisions taken out of political necessity are difﬁcult for
them personally, just as it is hypocrisy for them to pretend
that knowing what counts as political necessity is ever easy for
anyone.
In a faux-confessional age, politicians who go to war like to
remind us that they too are human, and any decision that results in loss of life is taken with deep reluctance. That is what
they mean when they talk about these as “difﬁcult decisions.”
At the same time, they prefer to explain the rationale behind
such decisions in terms that leave no room for doubt. That is
what they mean when they talk about these as “decisions that
had to be taken.” But this is the wrong way around. Pangs of
conscience are easy for politicians to handle; ﬁnding room for
rational doubt is much harder. By putting the premium on personal sincerity, political leaders make it too easy for themselves to ignore the difﬁcult facts.
Hobbes
Finally, underlying all of this is Hobbes’s view, as I reconstructed it, that most forms of what is conventionally understood as hypocrisy don’t matter, but hypocrisy about power
does. One possible form of hypocrisy about power is to overstate the signiﬁcance of personal sincerity—to seek to ground
one’s politics on the fact that one happens genuinely to believe
what one says one believes. For Hobbes, modern politics is
grounded on the set of institutional arrangements that can
generate security in a situation in which one can never be certain what anyone really believes, though one can be certain
some people will place undue weight on their personal beliefs.
To over-personalise politics, to collapse the distinction between the mask and the person behind the mask, is either culpable hypocrisy, or self-delusion. And, as Hobbes suggests,
one of the marks of the culpable forms of hypocrisy is how
closely related they are to self-delusion, which is one of the
212

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

reasons why hypocrisy and self-delusion can feed off each
other.
In these circumstances, we need politicians who are sincere,
but that does not mean we should wish them to be sincere believers in everything they do. Instead, we need them to be sincere about the system of power in which they ﬁnd themselves,
and sincere in their desire to maintain the stability and durability of that system, even if it comes at the cost of their own
ability to say what they mean and mean what they say. This is
as true of democratic politics as of any other kind. Democratic
politicians should be sincere about maintaining the conditions
under which democracy is possible, and should place a higher
premium on that than on any other sort of sincerity. The system of democratic politics will require them to play a part, but
they should play their part in a way that is truthful to the demands of the system itself. Their individual hypocrisy—that
is, their hypocrisy judged as individuals—does not matter.
Indeed, some personal hypocrisy will be inevitable for any
democratic politician. What matters is whether they can be
truthful, with themselves and with others, about that.

Choosing the right hypocrite
Thus far, I have addressed the various questions relating to
sincerity, hypocrisy, and lies in modern politics by looking
back, to the somewhat distant past and also, in this chapter, to
the more immediate past. But I want to ﬁnish by attempting to
illustrate some of these themes by looking at an event that is
unfolding as I write—the 2008 U.S. presidential election. This
election, like any election, raises the question of whether political hypocrisy matters, and if so, of what kind. At the time of
writing, it is far from clear who will be the candidates, never
mind who will be the next president. Nonetheless, the perceived hypocrisy of all the possible candidates, and how they
handle it, is likely to play some role in determining the outcome
213

CONCLUSION

(it would hardly be a democratic election if this were not the
case). And in that context, I want to contrast four different
kinds of hypocrisy that have the potential to ﬁgure in the politics of the election, and to connect them to wider issues that I
have discussed so far in this book. This is not by way of predicting the outcome of the election, nor of saying which kinds
of hypocrisy are going to prove decisive with the American
electorate. Rather, it is an attempt to identify, as the authors I
have been discussing in this book were attempting to identify,
which kinds of hypocrisy are worth worrying about.
Hypocrisy and religion
First, there is the question of religion and personal sincerity:
how much does it matter if those running for president actually believe in the “faith-based” positions any plausible candidate is required to adopt in order to win over crucial segments
of the electorate? The condition of American politics means
that it is difﬁcult for candidates to be entirely sincere on questions of religion, particularly as they tack back and forth between the stance they need to adopt to secure their party’s
nomination, and the stance they need to adopt to win a general election. But for some, the issue of religious hypocrisy is
more acute than for others, because it connects to the wider
question of whether anything about their public persona is
what it seems. This, for example, is Gerard Baker, the U.S. editor of the London Times, writing about Hillary Clinton early in
2007:
Here is ﬁnally someone who has taken the black arts of the
politician’s trade, the dissembling, the trimming, the pandering, all the way to their logical conclusion. [Baker bases this
claim on a contrast between the Hillary Clinton of 15 years ago—
whom he calls “a principled, if somewhat rebarbative and unelectable
politician”—and the Clinton of today.—D.R.] Now, you might say,
hold on. Aren’t all politicians veined with an opportunistic
214

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

streak? Why is she any different? The difference is that Mrs.
Clinton has raised that opportunism to an animating philosophy, a P.T. Barnum approach to the political marketplace. All
politicians, sadly, lie. We can often forgive the lies as the necessary price paid to win popularity for a noble cause. But the
Clinton candidacy is a Grand Deceit, an entirely artiﬁcial construct built around a person who, stripped bare of the cynicism, calculation and manipulation, is nothing more than an
enormous, overpowering and rather terrifying ego.9

Or, as media mogul and one-time Clinton fundraiser David
Geffen said to explain his defection to the Barack Obama
camp at around the same time: “Everybody in politics lies, but
they [the Clintons] do it with such ease it is troubling.”
There are two things to be said about this: ﬁrst, what Baker
says shows why it is probably wrong to run the two Clintons
together as Geffen does. All politicians lie, but some, like Bill
Clinton, are able to lie easily because they are able to persuade
others, and themselves, of their underlying sincerity. Bill Clinton was a faith-based politician, his faith being limitless faith
in his own goodness of heart. Hillary Clinton is nothing like
this; her public persona is too obviously an artiﬁcial construct,
designed to protect her from her own weaknesses as a politician and a human being (notably a lack of warmth), of which
she is clearly all too aware. This is why, in a semi-confessional
age, it will be considerably harder for her than for her husband to get elected. But it also means that there is less danger
in her case than there was in her husband’s of becoming selfdeceived. With Hillary Clinton there seems little possibility
that she, any more than anyone else, will lose sight of the fact
that she is a hypocrite. Hillary Clinton appears to be a mixture of what Mandeville calls “malicious” and “fashionable”
hypocrisy, of personal ambition and a desire to pander to
the electorate. Baker, like all of her opponents, would have us
take it for granted that these are inherently bad things. But are
they? Mandeville certainly wouldn’t think so. And following
215

CONCLUSION

Mandeville, we might say that politicians who are forced to
combine these different forms of hypocrisy are less likely to be
deceived about their own characters, or at least about the character of political hypocrisy, than politicians who believe themselves to be sincere.
This leads to the second point: what is Hillary’s insincerity
being contrasted with? The underlying contrast in Baker’s attack is not with her husband, but with George W. Bush, a man
who may have had his own problems with the truth, but
whose underlying personality, and indeed underlying faith, is
at least consistent and sincere in Baker’s terms. However, as I
have tried to argue throughout this book, sincerity of personal
faith or belief is an overrated virtue in politics, for the reasons
Hobbes makes clear. The Bush doctrine in international politics has sometimes crudely and inaccurately been characterised as a Hobbesian one.10 Regardless of the ways in which
this misapprehends Hobbes’s own view of international relations, it also seems highly unlikely that Hobbes would approve of the way that Bush has allowed questions of sincerity
of faith to become entangled with power politics. Religion, for
Hobbes, should be at the service of politics; politics should
never be subservient to religious or even semi-religious instincts. Hobbes did not want his rulers to be true believers in
anything, except in the idea that politics could be organised
on a rational basis. So at the risk of stretching the evidence beyond anything a historian would be remotely comfortable
with, I would say that Hillary is much more obviously the
model of a Hobbesian politician than George W. Bush. She is
both skeptical and somewhat cynical, and therefore is bound
to wear a mask; she has constructed a persona for herself in order to negotiate the world of power politics as she understands
it. If that mask requires her to hide the true state of her religious
beliefs, so be it. If she is sincere about anything, she is sincere
about power. That at least means she is less likely than more
sincere politicians to be hypocritical about the things that really matter. None of this means Hillary Clinton is certain to be
216

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

elected; nor, if elected, that she is sure to be a success. But then
again, that was what Hobbes most mistrusted about democracy—that it had a tendency to reward those who made a
show of their personal sincerity over those who were sincere
about power itself.
Hypocrisy and war
The second area in which the question of hypocrisy has been
unavoidable for candidates for president in 2008 concerns
their attitude to the Iraq War, and their willingness or otherwise to defend their own voting record (if they have one).
Again, plausible candidates are vulnerable in one way or another here, either for having adopted positions in favour of the
war on which they have subsequently felt obliged to backtrack,
or for having adopted positions against the war that they have
nevertheless been forced to hedge, for fear of appearing unpatriotic. Looming over them all is the baleful example of John
Kerry, who was deeply compromised by his circumlocutory
explanations of his complicated voting position on this question in 2004. Flexibility seems to be called for, but sincerity and
integrity also appear to be required. It is nightmarishly difﬁcult to see how to get this balance right.
As a result, there will always be the temptation to take sides
on a question like this, and to say that some hypocrisies here
are clearly worse than others. But which? John Edwards apologised for his vote in the Senate in 2002 authorizing war,
whereas Hillary Clinton refused to apologise for hers. Barack
Obama sought to emphasise that he had nothing to apologise
for, glossing over the fact that he was not in the Senate in 2002,
and so got off lightly. John McCain sought to emphasise his
own distance from these Democratic contortions, by dint of
both his loyalty to the president and his constructive criticism
of the president’s policy. Rudolph Giuliani emphasised the
importance of personal heroism in determining integrity,
glossing over his personal good fortune (from this perspective)
217

CONCLUSION

in ﬁnding himself in charge of New York on the day the Twin
Towers fell. Many people will seek to present these competing
positions as fundamental moral differences, revealing of underlying differences of character: apologising for mistakes is
better than not apologising; having made mistakes is better
than pretending one is incapable of them; loyalty to country is
better than loyalty to party; having been tested in the line of
ﬁre is the only true test of character there is; and so on. Of
course, character matters, and the voters will need to decide
which sort of character they prefer. But it is equally true that
the attempt to portray failings of character as the worst sort of
hypocrisy is simply an extension of politics, part of the endless round of constructing and deconstructing political personae that is the price that liberal democratic politics demands
of its practitioners. I would hope that if the history I have been
trying to tell suggests anything, it is that accusations and
counter-accusations of hypocrisy are not going to settle questions of character.
But there is an extension of this question of hypocrisy when
it comes to the Iraq War that poses a particular problem for
Democratic candidates. This is the question of whether they
really want America to win in Iraq. For example, did any of
the Democratic candidates really want George Bush’s 2007
troop surge in Baghdad to succeed, given that were it to do so,
it would inevitably damage their own chances of winning the
White House (though given the difﬁculty of reaching deﬁnitive agreement about such things, perhaps not irreparably)?
This is a theme that has come up again and again in recent iterations of American and British politics: can opponents of the
Iraq War defend themselves against the charge that deep
down they want the other side to win, in order to be proved
right; or, in the most toxic form of this charge, that they take
pleasure in the disaster? And it goes beyond the Iraq War—it
is in some ways a perennial theme of democratic politics: how
can you want things to go wrong for your political opponents
without appearing to want things to go wrong for the sake of
218

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

it? And the answer is that you must simply dissemble. No
Democratic candidate for president can ever afford to be
tarred with the brush that he or she wished to offer succour to
America’s enemies, so all of them must deny this charge at all
costs. But with some part of themselves, they are bound not to
want Bush’s Iraq strategy to succeed. You do not have to be a
Hobbesian to recognise that this is both human nature, and in
the nature of politics.
Politicians can try to justify these evasions to themselves in
broadly consequential terms, arguing that a temporary success here will blind the United States to deeper, underlying
problems that will bring greater difﬁculties down the line. But
in so doing, they will be concealing the part of themselves,
perhaps even from themselves, that simply wants to win
power, which means the other side must lose it. Moreover, because our politics is not Hobbesian all the way through, but
values contestation and dissent over straightforward obedience, this sort of concealment is the price we pay for that contestation and dissent. Here, again, is a place in our politics
where sincerity would be worse than hypocrisy, because sincerity, in ruling out ill-motivated opposition, would rule out
various forms of opposition altogether. There are, as Judith
Shklar says, and as any careful reading of George Orwell will
conﬁrm, various forms of democratic hypocrisy that we must
be sanguine about, for fear of ﬁnding something worse.
Hypocrisy and compromise
The poisonous nature of much partisan political argument
about the Iraq War, and the need for all parties to stake their
claim to one of the most enduringly potent colour terms of
modern politics—“patriot”—inevitably provokes its own kind
of backlash. There is always room in a rancorous political
landscape for a candidate who states what he or she believes in,
but nevertheless embodies the principles of compromise and
pragmatism, in some sense above or beyond party. Sometimes
219

CONCLUSION

these candidates literally stand outside the party system, as
with privately funded, independent campaigns of the kind
Michael Bloomberg would attempt were he to run in 2008 (and
again, at the time of writing, it is far from clear whether he
will). But such independent candidates do not have a good
record of effecting a permanent shift in political values in a
world that remains as dominated by party as it was in Trollope’s time. Much trickier than an independent run, but also
much more effective if it can succeed, is an appeal beyond the
narrow limitations of partisan politics launched from within
the party system itself. In their different ways, many candidates in 2008, including the Republicans McCain and Giuliani, have gestured towards such an appeal, with mixed
success. But the one candidate who has made it central to his
entire political persona is Barack Obama.
There is, of course, a tradition for the sort of candidature
that Obama has tried to embody: the principled, free-thinking
politician who nevertheless recognises that on any important
question there will be an equivalent strength of feeling on the
other side, and whose compromises are therefore not
hypocrisy but instead a form of principled pragmatism. A New
Yorker proﬁle of Obama from May 2007 made the connection
explicit, quoting Obama’s former University of Chicago colleague Cass Sunstein:
“Lincoln is a hero of his,” Sunstein says—Obama announced
his candidacy in front of the Old State Capitol in Springﬁeld in
order to draw a connection between himself and that other
skinny politician from Illinois—“and in the legal culture Lincoln is famous for believing that there are some principles that
you can’t compromise in terms of speaking, but, in terms of
what you do, there are pragmatic reasons and sometimes reasons of principle not to act on them. Alexander Bickel, in ‘The
Least Dangerous Branch,’ made this aspect of Lincoln famous,
and I don’t know if Obama has this directly from Bickel, but if
he doesn’t he has it from law school.” Lincoln, Bickel wrote,
220

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

“held ‘that free government was, in principle, incompatible
with chattel slavery.’ . . . Yet he was no abolitionist.” Should
freed slaves become the equals of white men? “The feelings of
‘the great mass of white people’ would not admit of this,”
Bickel described Lincoln as thinking, “and hence here also
principle would have to yield to necessity.” Lincoln wrote,
“Whether this feeling accords with justice and sound judgment, is not the sole question, if indeed, it is any part of it. A
universal feeling, whether well or ill-founded, can not be safely
disregarded.”11

But, though Lincoln’s is the most ringing example of this
form of politics, the underlying idea that politicians can distinguish between compromising on their principles and compromising in their actions is one we have encountered before,
in other contexts. Lincoln’s own version of it, as well as having
its roots in his legal experiences, was a deliberate refashioning
of what he understood as the Jeffersonian legacy for American
politics. This legacy has its own roots in a set of rationalist arguments about sincerity and compromise that reaches back
into eighteenth- and seventeenth-century English political
thought, all the way to Francis Bacon. As such, it is a tradition
that has another, quite separate branch, running forward into
the English liberal tradition, and given most prominent expression in the high Victorian period, by writers like John Morley.
Obama, as Sunstein says, has his understanding of this tradition from law school, and from the trials and tribulations of
American history, not from Victorian liberal philosophy. The
idiom of Obama’s rhetoric is very different from anything that
might come from the likes of Morley, but some of the core concerns are not. Obama has a thorough distaste for inauthentic
expressions of religious faith—“the politician who shows up
at a black church around election time and claps (off rhythm)
to the gospel choir or sprinkles in a few biblical citations to
spice up a thoroughly dry policy speech”—and a matching
belief that it is only the politician who is able to speak his
221

CONCLUSION

mind freely who knows when to compromise.12 This is, as we
have seen, a deeply attractive message for a certain type of liberal politician, allowing him to retain a partisan sense of purpose while reaching out beyond the hypocrisy of mere
partisanship to embrace a spirit of principled compromise as
well. But it is worth mentioning John Morley in this context,
and the generation of deeply compromised liberal imperialists
who fell under his spell, simply to remind us that this line of
thought does not only produce Lincolns. It can also generate a
form of self-deception that derives from the desire of the
democratic politician to seek a form of insulation from
hypocrisy in some realm that transcends it. Of course, it does
not have to produce self-deception: in rare hands, like those of
Lincoln, principled compromise can emerge as a form of selfknowledge. But because the problem of hypocrisy produces a
series of enduring temptations that entice politicians away
from a sense of their own limitations and towards a sense of
their own sufﬁciency, such self-knowledge remains rare.
Hypocrisy and the environment
Finally, let me move away from questions of personality politics to a more global theme. An issue that is certain to dog all
present and future presidential candidates in the United States
and elsewhere is their approach to the problem of global
warming. In the immediate context of the 2008 U.S. election,
the potential candidate who had been both best placed to exploit the issue and also most vulnerable to the charge of personal hypocrisy was Al Gore. Early in 2007 newspapers on
both sides of the Atlantic were full of either deeply critical or
sympathetically agonised articles about whether Gore’s personal hypocrisy mattered, once it was discovered that the energy needs of his private home produced a carbon footprint
many times the size of others in his neighborhood. Clearly, for
any possible Gore candidature this was bad politics—blatant
hypocrisy of this sort always gives your enemies a stick to beat
222

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

you with. On the other hand, it is not clear that this kind of
hypocrisy is the obstacle it sometimes appears, because there
seems to be quite wide acceptance that some personal
hypocrisy of this kind (not always practicing in the private
sphere what you preach in public) is unavoidable in those who
seek political power: they are like us, but they are not like us,
and in some aspect of their lives the gap will show.
This kind of mismatch between public pronouncements and
private practice is the hypocrisy we tend to hear most about,
because it is the easiest to ﬁnd, and the easiest to exploit to
provoke a reaction. In many settings, and above all in the more
censorious branches of the media (particularly online), not
practicing what you preach is what hypocrisy has come to
mean, though as we have seen throughout this book, it is far
from being the only way of understanding the term. But the
reaction to this sort of hypocrisy is often short-lived, and frequently surprisingly tolerant. Just as the explosion of information technology has made it easier to expose any slip in a
public individual’s private standards, so it has also reinforced
the extent to which private citizens also lead lives that require
them to enact many different roles, in many different settings.
Politicians are not the only ones who possess what social psychologists call “multiple selves.” Perhaps for this reason, voters
seem far more censorious about public inconsistencies—“ﬂipﬂopping” in the jargon—than they do about private lapses
from the highest public standards. So perhaps the more serious charge of hypocrisy to which a politician like Gore is vulnerable is that he didn’t do much about global warming when
he was in ofﬁce. But again, this hardly seems enough to preclude him from running for president (had he wanted to),
since he was only vice president at the time, and he might legitimately say that someone needs to elect him president before being able to judge what he is and isn’t capable of doing.
However, the real point I want to make is that the question
of hypocrisy and global warming cannot, and should not, simply be about the personal hypocrisy of politicians like Al Gore.
223

CONCLUSION

Electoral politics can almost certainly cope with the hypocrisy
of environmentalists who are not quite as good as they would
like the rest of us to be. And in this area, the distinction between ﬁrst- and second-order hypocrisy is both clear and
workable. There is a big difference between those who do not
live up to the standards they ask of others, and those who
make a parade of their own ability to set an example. An environmental campaigner who travels the world by jet to spread
the message that air travel is a signiﬁcant cause of global
warming is compromised, but such compromises may constitute the only efﬁcient way to spread the message. Such a case
is far removed from that of a politician like the British Conservative leader David Cameron, who has gone to great lengths
to “green” his own personal lifestyle, and to make political
capital out of that fact. When it emerged that Cameron’s much
publicised bicycle rides to the House of Commons involved
the use of a car to ferry his personal belongings behind him,
he revealed himself to be a second-order hypocrite. Secondorder hypocrisy, because it makes a mockery of the whole
business of public enactment, is corrosive in ways that ﬁrstorder hypocrisy is not.
But even this is in a sense trivial. Far more signiﬁcant than
the question of whether individual politicians are hypocrites
on environmental issues is the question of whether the most
advanced democracies can cope with the charge of hypocrisy
that is likely to be leveled against them by the rest of the
world, regardless of the immediate twists and turns of their
electoral politics. If global warming is as bad as most scientists
fear, it will require sacriﬁces of everyone. But it will be easy to
portray the demand by developed nations like the United
States or Britain for equivalent sacriﬁces by developing nations that have yet to enjoy the full beneﬁts of economic
growth as a kind of hypocrisy. How then will democratic
politicians in the most advanced countries be able to persuade
their own electorates of the sacriﬁces needed if the burdens of
those sacriﬁces are not more widely shared? It will be relatively
224

S I N C E R I T Y A N D H Y P O C R I S Y I N D E M O C R AT I C P O L I T I C S

easy for democratic politicians in the West to portray politicians elsewhere in the world (particularly in China) as hypocrites if they expect the West to take a lead in adopting
growth-restricting measures while the Chinese economy continues to grow apace. But it will be relatively easy for Chinese
politicians to portray democratic politicians as hypocrites if
they expect the rest of the world to follow their lead without
taking account of the unequal states of development of the
various economies. Equal sacriﬁces are hard to justify in an
unequal world. But unequal sacriﬁces will be hard to justify in
the democratic world. And there lies the problem.
Of course global warming is about much more than this.
Aspects of the predicament we face, particularly the problem
of the commons—“that which is common to the greatest number has the least care bestowed on it”—are as old as politics itself.13 Resolving these difﬁculties in the future may demand
substantial technological innovations, and draw on the intellectual resources of disciplines that did not exist for much of
the period covered by this book, including game theory and
risk assessment. Nevertheless, at the heart of this issue lies a
dilemma that the prevalence of hypocrisy poses for all forms
of modern politics. Some hypocrisy seems unavoidable when
it comes to environmental politics—in relation both to personal conduct, and to the behaviour of different regimes that
will seek to hold each other to standards that they cannot
readily meet themselves—and it would be a mistake to imagine that hypocrisy must cease before any real progress can be
made. Equally, however, it would be a mistake to be too sanguine about hypocrisy in this context, given its capacity to
generate political conﬂict, and to spill over into the most destructive forms of self-deception. So we must try to distinguish
between different kinds of hypocrisy, and to decide which
ones are worth worrying about.
It will not be easy—nothing about political hypocrisy ever
is. But a sense of historical perspective can help. Liberal societies have always attracted accusations of hypocrisy from the
225

CONCLUSION

outside, because of their failure to live up to their own standards. But seen from the inside, it is clear that the problem of
hypocrisy in liberal politics is a good deal more complicated
than this. What matters is not whether liberals are worse than
they would like to appear, but whether they can be honest
with themselves about the gaps that are bound to exist between the masks of politics and what lies behind those masks.
This honesty cannot be taken as a given—liberal societies, particularly once they have become bound up with the requirements of democratic politics, are as capable as any others of
self-deception. But liberal politics, and liberal political theory,
have the advantage that they are able to probe the gaps between political appearance and political reality without either
overstating them, or seeking to deny them altogether. This
then is one of the resources that a history of liberal political
thought has to offer. Armed with a sense of historical perspective, we can see that many forms of political hypocrisy are unavoidable, and therefore not worth worrying about, and that
some others are even desirable in a democratic setting, and
therefore worth encouraging. But, as Hobbes says, when
hypocrisy deprives us of our ability to see what is at stake in
our political life, then it still has the capacity to ruin everything for everyone.

226

Notes

Introduction

1. Shklar 1984: 47.
2. Ibid.: 66.
3. Ibid.: 77.
4. Grant 1997: 177.
5. Ibid.
6. For a history of the role of pretence and dissimulation in early
modern religious thought and practice, see Zagorin 1990.
7. For an excellent contemporary account of the relationship between politeness and hypocrisy, see Miller 2003.
8. The open letters that President Ahmadinejad has occasionally
written to President Bush are long, but can be brieﬂy summarized—
they say, “You call yourself a man of faith, but your politics of aggression make you a hypocrite” (or, as the letter of May 7, 2006 puts
it: “Will you accept this invitation? That is, a genuine return to the
teachings of the prophet, to monotheism and justice, to preserve human dignity and obedience to the Almighty and his prophets?”).
And President Bush’s unspoken responses to such invitations are
easily summarised too—to be accused of hypocrisy by the president
of Iran just about takes the biscuit.
9. This is a central theme of the writings of Quentin Skinner,
which have profoundly inﬂuenced the way that the history of political thought has been studied for the past generation (see Skinner
2002; Brett and Tully 2006). Another consistent theme in Skinner’s
writing is the role played by what he calls “rhetorical redescription”
in shaping political reality, and I make extensive use of this idea in
what follows.
10. For an account of some of the conceptual issues surrounding
current perceptions of U.S. hypocrisy in international relations, see
Glazer 2006. For what has become the classic recent statement of the
view that attacks on American hypocrisy are themselves hypocritical

227

NOTES TO CHAPTER ONE

(though the argument is not put in precisely these terms), see Kagan
2003; and for a response, see Runciman 2006a.
Chapter One
Hobbes and the Mask of Power

1. Hobbes’s known writing career spanned roughly half a century: from his translation of Thucydides in 1628 through to his last
piece of writing, a manuscript on the Exclusion Crisis produced
shortly before his death in 1679. There is controversy about whether
Hobbes was the author of some earlier pieces of writing during the
1620s—most notably a “Discourse on Tacitus” that some have attributed to him (see Hobbes 1995; Malcolm 2007).
2. On Hobbes and rhetoric, see Skinner 1996; on Hobbes’s Erastianism, see Collins 2005; on Hobbes and representation, see Skinner
2005.
3. Pirated editions ﬁrst started appearing in 1679, but it was only
in 1682 that a version was published by William Crooke, Hobbes’s
usual publisher.
4. The opening paragraph of Behemoth is as follows: “A: If in
time, as in place, there were degrees of high and low, I verily believe
that the highest of time would be that which passed between the
years 1640 and 1660. For he that hence, as from the Devil’s Mountain, should have looked upon the world and observed the actions of
men, especially in England, might have had a prospect of all kinds of
injustice, and all kinds of folly, that the world could afford, and how
they were produced by their dams hypocrisy and self-conceit,
whereof one is double iniquity, and the other double folly.” (Hobbes
1969: 1.)
5. Hume once wrote to a young friend advising him to become
an Anglican clergyman notwithstanding his doubts about the articles of his faith:
It is putting too great a respect on the vulgar and their superstitions to pique oneself on sincerity with regard to them . . . I
wish it were still in my power to be a hypocrite in this particular. The common duties of society usually require it, and the ecclesiastical profession only adds a little more to an innocent
dissimulation, or rather simulation, without which it is impossible to pass through the world. [Quoted in Morley 1997: 89]
6. When Cromwell makes his ﬁrst appearance in the History,
during a parliamentary debate on Popery, Hume writes: “It is amus228

NOTES TO CHAPTER ONE

ing to observe the ﬁrst words of this fanatical hypocrite correspond
so exactly to his character.” (Hume 1983 vol. 5: 214.) Later, when
Cromwell has made himself master of Parliament, Hume writes
with a mixture of repulsion and admiration: “This artful and audacious conspirator conducted himself in the parliament with such
profound dissimulation, with such reﬁned hypocrisy, that he had
long deceived those who, being themselves dextrous practitioners of
the same arts, should naturally have entertained the more suspicions
against others.” (Ibid.: 335.)
7. Hobbes 1998: 54.
8. Ibid.: 48.
9. Ibid.: 54.
10. The clearest statement of this comes in Leviathan: “Every
Soveraign hath the same Right, in procuring the safety of his People,
that any particular man can have in procuring his own safety. And
the same Law, that dictateth to men that have no Civil Government,
what they ought to do, and what to avoid in regard of one another,
dictateth the same to Common-wealths, that is, to the Consciences
of Sovereign Princes.” (Hobbes 1996: 244.)
11. See Hoekstra 2006b: 201. For more on Hobbes’s views about
democratic rhetoric and dissimulation, see Garsten 2006.
12. Much more common, as Hobbes famously puts it in Leviathan,
is that they should adopt “the state and posture of Gladiators, having their weapons pointing, and their eyes ﬁxed on one another.”
(Hobbes 1996: 90.)
13. Hobbes puts this view most bluntly in his ﬁrst major statement of his political theory, The Elements of Law (1640): “The conscience being nothing else but a man’s settled judgment and
opinion, when he hath once transferred his right of judging to another, that which shall be commanded, is not less his judgment, than
the judgment of that other; so that in obedience to the laws, a man
doth still according to his conscience.” As Richard Tuck puts it, this
means “citizens have to be ready to accept the irrelevancy of their
own views.” (Tuck 2006: 175.)
14. Hobbes 1998: 133.
15. Ibid.
16. Ibid.: 165.
17. Hobbes 1969: 27.
18. Ibid.: 26.
19. Hobbes 1996: 72.
20. Hobbes 1969: 27. Hobbes is punning on the word “sufﬁciency” here, which meant both to have enough of something and
229

NOTES TO CHAPTER ONE

also to be well qualiﬁed for something. The parliamentarians
thought that their qualiﬁcations for power were not getting enough
attention from the king.
21. Ibid.: 61.
22. Though, as Maurice Goldsmith points out in his introduction
to Behemoth, “The elder man A was mature during the Civil Wars; he
undertakes to explain them to B. B mainly asks A for fuller explanations. Both A and B express Hobbesian opinions; as Wallis said of
Hobbes’s scientiﬁc dialogues, Behemoth is a conversation between
Thomas and Hobbes.” (Hobbes 1969: xi.)
23. Hoekstra 2006a: 49.
24. Hoekstra makes this point: “There can be a kind of practical
inconsistency in publicly proclaiming the need for silence, and especially in trying to convince readers of a set of positions that includes
a defence of dissimulation and deceit.” (Ibid.: 46.) Hoekstra also discusses the writing of a contemporary of Hobbes, Torquato Accetto,
who said something similar about his own work, admitting that
“writing of dissimulation required that I dissimulate.” (Ibid.: 47.)
25. Hobbes 1969: 61.
26. Ibid.: 48.
27. Ibid.
28. Ibid.: 25.
29. Ibid.: 26.
30. Quoted in Skinner 2002 vol. 2: 276.
31. Hobbes 1996: 31.
32. Its contested nature is the subject of one of Skinner’s earliest
accounts of the role of “evaluative-descriptive” terms in shaping political reality (see Skinner 1973).
33. See Tuck 2006; and for the response on which I draw here, see
Hoekstra 2006b; Skinner 2006.
34. Hobbes 1998: 137.
35. In fact, there is some controversy as to whether “paradiastole”
originally referred to the practice of redescription, or to the rhetorical device of exposing this practice i.e. of showing that a term was
merely being used to redescribe the character of an underlying action (see Tuck 1996). Though Skinner uses it in the ﬁrst sense, there
is good reason to suppose that Hobbes would have understood it in
the second.
36. Hobbes 1969: 2.
37. Ibid.
38. Ibid.: 104.

230

NOTES TO CHAPTER TWO

39. Ibid.: 103.
40. Hobbes 1996: 353.
41. See Collins 2005.
42. Hobbes 1996: 480.
43. Ibid.
44. Ibid.: 82.
45. Ibid.
46. See Hoekstra 2006a.
47. See Hobbes 1995.
48. Hobbes 1996: 112.
49. Ibid.: 62.
50. Ibid.: 418–19.
51. Mandeville gives a wonderful example of this sort of double
bluff in The Fable of the Bees, Part II, when describing the voting in
enclaves of cardinals: “Nothing is carried on without tricks and intrigues, and in them the Heart of Man is so deep and so dark an
Abyss that the ﬁnest air of Dissimulation is sometimes found to have
been insincere, and men often deceive one another by counterfeiting
Hypocrisy.” (Mandeville 1733: 35.)
52. Noel Malcolm makes this point when discussing Hobbes’s
distance from the prevailing currents of much reason of state theory
(see introduction to Malcolm 2007).
Chapter Two
Mandeville and the Virtues of Vice

1. Quoted in introduction to Mandeville 1970: 8.
2. Mandeville 1969: 332. For an extended discussion of the inﬂuences on Mandeville’s work, and also on the role of theatre in his
conception of society, see Hundert 1994.
3. Mandeville 1970: 98.
4. Ibid.: 88.
5. Ibid.: 107.
6. Ibid.: 106.
7. Ibid.: 76.
8. See Hont 2006.
9. Mandeville 1970: 202.
10. Ibid.: 158.
11. Ibid.: 168.
12. Ibid.: 351.
13. Ibid.: 335.

231

NOTES TO CHAPTER TWO

14. Mandeville 1733: 119.
15. Mandeville was also making a more narrowly political point
here about what he saw as Shaftesbury’s lack of political principle:
why, he asks, does a man “who believes himself virtuous [not]
Labour to retrieve National Losses . . . [and] make use of all his
Friends and Interests to be a Lord Treasurer, that by his Integrity and
Wise Management he might restore the Public Credit?” He goes on:
“Virtue consists in Action, and whoever is possest of this Social Love
and kind Affection to his Species, and by his Birth or Quality can
claim any Post in the Publick Management, ought not to sit still
when he can be Serviceable, but exert himself to the utmost for the
good of his Fellow Subjects.” (Ibid.: 336.) This is an attack both on
John Locke, who was Shaftesbury’s tutor, and also on Shaftesbury’s
brand of high-minded Whiggism.
16. Ibid.: 336.
17. See, for example, Davidson 2004.
18. Mandeville 1970: 256.
19. Ibid.: 296.
20. Ibid.: 155–56.
21. These characters also appear in The Fable of the Bees Part II,
where they are described as follows: Horatio is “one of the modish
People I have been speaking of but rather of the better sort of them as
to morality”; Cleomenes, by contrast, is a more serious thinker, and
“has been dipping into Anatomy and several parts of Natural Philosophy”; he has read a notoriously wicked book called The Fable of the
Bees, and, determined to put its claims to the test, has found “the
Insincerity of Men fully as universal as it was there represented”;
Cleomenes is also described as someone who “understood perfectly
well the difﬁculty of the task required in the Gospel.” In other
words, Cleomenes is Mandeville, and Mandeville writes in his introduction “that no man in his senses would think that I ought to be
equally responsible for everything that Horatio says.” (Mandeville
1733: xvii–xviii.)
22. Mandeville 1971: 201–2.
23. Hobbes 1969: 119.
24. Though for the view that Hobbes’s light treatment of Cromwell
does not reﬂect Hobbes’s preference for Independency, see Sommerville 2003. Sommerville points out that at the end of Behemoth
Hobbes echoes the saying that “presbyterians held him by the hayr,
till the independents cut off his head” when he writes that the Presbyterians “sought only the subjection of the King, not his destruction directly,” whereas the Independents “sought directly his
232

NOTES TO CHAPTER TWO

destruction” (Hobbes 1969: 195). Sommerville takes this as evidence that Hobbes saw both parties as equally hypocritical, but for
the reasons given in the previous chapter I do not entirely share this
view.
25. Hobbes 1969: 136.
26. For others, a chameleon was the deﬁnition of a hypocrite: see,
for example, Robert Burton’s Anatomy of Melancholy (1621), where he
complains about seeing “a man turn himself into all shapes like a
chameleon . . . to act twenty parts and persons at once for his own
advantage . . . having a several face, garb and character for every one
he meets” (Burton 1862: 89). This is perhaps the more conventional
view, reﬂecting the generalised suspicion of the habits of the “stage
actor” spilling over into everyday life.
27. Rousseau 1997a: 46.
28. Ibid.: 47.
29. Rousseau 1997b: 148.
30. Ibid.: 121.
31. Mandeville 1971: 162.
32. Ibid.: 230–31.
33. Ibid.: 164.
34. Ibid.
35. Ibid.: 231.
36. See Weber 1994.
37. Mandeville 1969: 384.
38. Ibid.
39. Ibid.: 376.
40. Ibid.: 390.
41. Ibid.: 408.
42. Ibid.: 382.
43. Ibid.: 386–87.
44. Mandeville 1733: 411.
45. Ibid.
46. Ibid.: 390.
47. Ibid.: 410.
48. For the details of Mandeville’s personal antipathy to Walpole,
which led him to greatly moderate his defence of the integrity of
Whigs in government during the 1720s, see Mitchell 2003.
49. On the rhetorical redescriptions of “patriotism” in this period,
see Skinner 2002: 344–67.
50. Quoted in Davis 2001: 146.
51. Mandeville 1733: 385.
52. See Hont 2006.
233

NOTES TO CHAPTER THREE

Chapter Three
The American Revolution and the Art of Sincerity

1. Quoted in Schama 2005: 28.
2. Jefferson 1999: 99.
3. Wills 2002: 74.
4. This is the theme of Shklar 1998b. See also Wilkins 2002.
5. See particularly Wood 1969; Pocock 1975; Pocock 1985; Kramnick 1990; Bailyn 1992.
6. American revolutionary thought was profoundly inﬂuenced
by Machiavelli, though primarily as refracted through the ideas of
the seventeenth-century English republican theorist, James Harrington (1611–1677). It is important to note that Harrington’s Machiavelli
was above all the author of the Discourses, not the more satirical and
cynical author of The Prince. Machiavellianism could therefore be
understood in two distinct senses in the context of American political thought: to denote a Harringtonian conception of republican
virtue, or alternatively to describe a form of cynical political manipulation. In so far as they approved the ﬁrst, it is by no means clear
that the American revolutionaries saw themselves as the inheritors
of the second (indeed, they were as ready to use the term “Machiavellian” in its pejorative sense as we are today).
7. Weinberger 2005: 287.
8. Franklin 1998: 45.
9. Ibid.: 99.
10. Ibid.: 59. Franklin misremembered the motto of his pamphlet
in the Autobiography, adding the line “Whatever is, is right” from
Pope to a passage from Dryden.
11. Thomas Hobbes, who had brieﬂy acted as Bacon’s amanuensis, may well have been the translator of at least one of them—“Of
Simulation and Dissimulation”—for a Latin edition of Bacon’s works
published in 1638 (see Malcolm 2007: 9–10).
12. Bacon 1996: 384.
13. Franklin 1998: 231.
14. Bacon 1996: 350.
15. Simulation leads to bad habits, Bacon says, “because . . . it
maketh him practise simulation in other things, lest his hand should
be out of [use]”; it leads to a bad reputation, because “it puzzleth and
perplexeth the conceits of many, that perhaps would otherwise cooperate with him.” (Ibid.: 351.)
16. Ibid.: 350.
17. Ibid.
234

NOTES TO CHAPTER THREE

18. Ibid.: 351.
19. Franklin 1998: 231.
20. In “Of Simulation and Dissimulation,” Bacon purposefully
does not describe dissimulation as a form of cunning. Instead, he argues that dissimulation is required because of the cunning of others,
“for men are too cunning to suffer a man to keep an indifferent carriage . . . and to be secret, without swaying the balance on either
side.” (Bacon 1996: 350.) Dissimulation is the rational response to
those who wish to pin us down in order to exploit our weaknesses;
hence it is a crucial part of the armoury of the politician.
21. Franklin 1998: 230.
22. Bolingbroke 1997: 256.
23. Ibid.: 286.
24. Franklin 1998: 229.
25. Ibid.: 232.
26. Bailyn 2003: 67.
27. See Wood 2004.
28. Quoted in McCullough 2001: 20.
29. Adams 2007: www.masshist.org/digitaladams/aea/cfm/doc
.cfm?id=D15.
30. Ibid.
31. Jefferson 1999: 447.
32. He also wanted these two forms of hollow distinction to be set
off against each other: “The wisdom of nations has endeavoured to
employ one prejudice to counteract the other: the prejudice in favour
of birth, to moderate, correct or restrain, the prejudice in favour of
wealth.” (Adams 2000: 350.)
33. Adams 2000: 302.
34. Quoted in Thompson 1998: 224.
35. See ibid.: 117–19.
36. Adams 2000: 357.
37. Ibid.: 356.
38. Ibid: 355.
39. See Wood 1969.
40. Ibid.: 322.
41. Quoted in Thompson 1998: 186.
42. Quoted in McCullough 2001: 432.
43. Jefferson 1999: 244.
44. Ibid.: 287.
45. Paine 2000: 268.
46. Jefferson 1999: 244.
47. Ibid.: 187.
235

NOTES TO CHAPTER FOUR

48. Ibid.: 174.
49. Ibid.: 422.
50. Ibid.: 418.
51. Ibid.: 424.
52. Ibid.: 449.
53. Ibid.: 452.
54. Ibid.: 464.
55. Ibid.: 275.
56. Quoted in McCullough 2001: 448.
57. Vidal 1973: 187.
58. Thompson 1998: 272.
59. Jefferson 1999: 420 (italics in the original). In a postscript to
this letter, Jefferson added: “It is hardly necessary to caution you to
let nothing of mine get before the public; a single sentence got hold
of by the Porcupines [meaning the Federalist propagandists] will
sufﬁce to abuse and persecute me in their papers for months.” (Ibid.)
60. Ibid.: 79.
61. Ibid.: 496.
Chapter Four
Bentham and the Utility of Fiction

1. Hart 1982.
2. Bentham 1988: 21.
3. Bentham 1996: 63–64.
4. Bentham 1843: 501.
5. Bentham 1983: 279.
6. Ibid.: 268.
7. Bentham 1983: 276.
8. See Chesterﬁeld 1992. For Bentham’s comparison between
Chesterﬁeld’s and his own work, see Bentham 1983: 276.
9. Ibid.: 357.
10. Ibid.
11. Burr came to know Bentham (and even brieﬂy lived in his
house) during his exile in London in 1808–09, following his acquittal
in the treason trial that had been initiated against him by Thomas
Jefferson.
12. Ibid.: 56.
13. Ibid.
14. Bentham 1843: 187.
15. Ibid.: 203.
16. Ibid.: 214.
236

NOTES TO CHAPTER FOUR

17. Ibid.: 219.
18. Bentham writes of this sacriﬁce as follows: “In an incident thus
tragical and impressive, the priesthood beheld an opportunity too
favourable to be suffered to pass: an opportunity of giving the utmost
possible degree of force and efﬁciency to an instrument, the management of which was in their hands . . . The time was a time of war. In
this state of things, the authority of Jephthah, did it stand in need of
check? The sort of check the priesthood were able and disposed to
apply? Both questions answered in the afﬁrmative, the price paid . . .
great as it was, was perhaps not too great. The individual—the
father—afﬂicted: another individual—the daughter—sent out of the
reach of afﬂiction—what are these evils in comparison of those of a
course of unbridled and tyrannically exercised despotism?” (Ibid.:
223.) This is the voice of utilitarianism, and in the phrase “sent out of
the reach of afﬂiction” it contains its own small measure of cant.
19. Ibid.: 222.
20. Hobbes 1996: 31.
21. Ibid.
22. See Skinner 1996.
23. Hobbes 1996: 31.
24. As Noel Malcolm has put it: “Hobbes was not trying to ban
metaphor as such: his warnings were chieﬂy against those metaphors
which conceal the fact that they are metaphors.” (Malcolm 2002: 227.)
25. See Bentham 2002.
26. A fuller account of the etymology of the term and its relation to
the thought of the period is given in Wilson 2007.
27. Hazlitt 1988: 185.
28. See Harrison 1983.
29. Bentham 1990: 121.
30. Ibid.
31. See in particular Harrison 1983; Schoﬁeld 2006.
32. Ibid.: 123.
33. Bentham 1932: 149.
34. Ibid.: 141.
35. Bentham 1988: 53.
36. Ibid.
37. Bentham 1999: 144.
38. “There seems to be no alternative mechanism by which exposure of the causes of the beliefs of the ruling classes . . . should serve
to change these beliefs, as by a kind of Freudian therapy; nor does the
exposure of the causes show them to be false.” (Harrison 1983: 217.)
39. See Schoﬁeld 2006: 267–68.
237

NOTES TO CHAPTER FIVE

40. See ibid.: 294–96 and 321–22. Bentham described these juries as
“Quasi-juries” in an attempt to pin down their distinctive role as mediators between real courts and the ﬁctitious court of public opinion.
41. See Mill 1992.
42. Mill 1992: 272.
Chapter Five
Victorian Democracy and Victorian Hypocrisy

1. Quoted in Schultz 2004: 4.
2. Phineas Redux was ﬁrst published in instalments in the Graphic
magazine beginning in 1873, before appearing as a book a year later.
3. Henry 2001.
4. In fact, by the 1860s this image had become such a cliché that
Punch issued a proclamation against it on 7 January 1865, as part of
a list banning the use of “certain persons, objects, and things, part
of the stock-in-trade of sundry literary chapmen,” as “used up, exhausted, threadbare, stale and hackneyed.” Henceforth “it shall not
be lawful for any journalist, essayist, magazine-writer, pennya-liner, poetaster, criticaster, public speaker, lecturer, Lord Rector,
Member of Parliament, novelist, or dramatist” to use any of the list,
which includes “The Bull that is always being taken by the horns . . .
The British Lion . . . the Black Sheep . . . The Dodo . . . the Thin End
of the Wedge,” and many others. First in the list comes “Macaulay’s
New Zealander,” and Mr. Punch remarks: “The retirement of this
veteran is indispensable. He can no longer be suffered to impede the
trafﬁc over London Bridge. Much wanted at the present time in his
own country. May return when London is in ruins.” Many of the
clichés listed in Punch, including that of the New Zealander, are now
obsolete, but not all. Compare this to Orwell’s list of “dying metaphors” in “Politics and the English Language”—“ring the changes
on, take up the cudgels for, toe the line, ride roughshod over, stand
shoulder to shoulder with, play into the hands of, no axe to grind,
grist to the mill, ﬁshing in troubled waters, on the order of the day,
Achilles’ heel, swan song, hotbed”—almost all of which are still current. Clearly, political clichés take a long time to die.
5. Trollope 1972: xii.
6. Ibid.: 20.
7. Ibid.: 130.
8. See Wilson 2008.
9. Trollope 1973.
10. Trollope 1972: 27.
238

NOTES TO CHAPTER FIVE

11. On Disraeli’s Machiavellianism, see Richmond and Smith 1998.
12. Trollope’s view of the magical qualities of Disraeli’s political
persona is in striking contrast to his view of Disraeli’s own ﬁction,
which he loathed and saw as lacking in all magic, its contrivances
and tricks being all too obvious—“the glory of the pasteboard, the
wealth of tinsel, the wit of hairdressers . . . paste diamonds,” as he
characterised it in his Autobiography (see Trollope 1999: 161).
13. Hobbes 1651: 77.
14. For the evolution of Trollope’s approach to utilitarianism, see
Nardin 1996.
15. Morley 1903 vol. 2: 444.
16. Morley 1997: 93.
17. Ibid.: 65.
18. This for example is the view of Maurice Cowling (see Morley
1997, appendix).
19. Ibid.: 66.
20. Ibid.: 31.
21. Ibid.: 58.
22. Ibid.: 104.
23. Ibid.
24. Ibid.: 105.
25. Bacon 1996: 351.
26. Hamer 1968: 51.
27. Quoted in Schultz 2004: 223.
28. Quoted in ibid.: 269.
29. Sidgwick 1996b: 170. It is interesting to compare Sidgwick on
this question with Thomas Paine’s discussion in The Age of Reason,
where he takes the opposite, more literal-minded view, that it is impossible to disprove a virgin conception, but literal ascension into
heaven is something that can be witnessed, and therefore disproved:
“The ascension of a dead person from the grave, and into heaven, is
a thing very different, as to the evidence it admits, to the invisible
conception of a child in the womb. The resurrection and ascension,
supposing them to have taken place, admitted of public and ocular
demonstration, like that of the ascension of a balloon, or the sun at
noonday, to all Jerusalem at least . . . The whole of it falls to the
ground because the evidence never was given.” (Paine 2000: 272.)
30. Sidgwick 1996a: 489–90.
31. See Smart & Williams 1973.
32. Ibid.: 318.
33. It should be noted that this is a distinctively British perspective:
in the United States judges tend to be more tolerant of grandstanding
239

NOTES TO CHAPTER SIX

by advocates; meanwhile in the European civil law tradition the relationship between magistrates and advocates is very different.
34. Sidgwick 1891: 598–99.
35. Ibid.
36. “A sincere utilitarian is likely to be an eager politician.” (Sidgwick 1996a: 495.) This is a “politician” in the Bentham sense—a
reformer—not the Morley sense—a compromiser.
37. Sidgwick 1996b: 81.
38. Quoted in Schultz 2004: 567.
39. Quoted in Hamer 1968: 347.
Chapter Six
Orwell and the Hypocrisy of Ideology

1. On some of the historical double standards of the medical profession, see Wootton 2006.
2. Orwell 1968 vol. 4.
3. Orwell 1968 vol.1: 2.
4. Orwell 1998a: 190–91.
5. Orwell 2006: 96.
6. See Blackburn 2005: 4–5.
7. Collini 2006: 372.
8. Hitchens 2003: 4.
9. The others include David Aaronovitch (The Times), Nick Cohen (The Observer), and John Lloyd (The Financial Times).
10. Orwell 1998f: 74.
11. Orwell 1984: 357.
12. Ibid.: 363.
13. Orwell 1998g: 256.
14. Ibid.
15. Ibid.
16. Ibid.: 258.
17. Orwell was very sensitive to what he saw as the varieties of
dishonesty among British fellow travellers. His notorious “list” of
“crypto-Communists” that he supplied to British intelligence in 1949
contained this sketch of Richard Crossman: “Political climber. Zionist (appears sincere about this). Too dishonest to be an outright F.T.
[fellow traveller].” As Christopher Hitchens remarks: “Orwell had a
respect for honest Leninists.” (Hitchens 2003: 146.)
18. Orwell 1984: 271.
19. Orwell 1989: 147–48. As well as being over the top, this is also
extremely simple-minded in economic terms (economics, as Orwell
240

NOTES TO CHAPTER SIX

admitted, was never his strong point). It leaves open the possibility
for those Orwell accuses of hypocrisy here of responding that they
only appear to be hypocritical from Orwell’s blinkered and
question-begging perspective. This is one of the weaknesses of The
Road to Wigan Pier’s air of empirical and predictive as well as moral
certainty.
20. Orwell 1984: 283.
21. Orwell 1968 vol. 1: 160.
22. Orwell 1984: 318.
23. Ibid.: 323.
24. Ibid.: 327.
25. Ibid.: 322.
26. Orwell 1982: 51.
27. Ibid.: 53.
28. Ibid.: 44.
29. Ibid.: 45–46. The speciﬁc reference here is to the quintessentially English institution of the “hanging judge.”
30. For a description of this incident, see Orwell 1998c: 121.
31. Orwell 1968 vol. 1: 236.
32. Ibid.: 239.
33. Ibid.
34. The cases of fascism and communism are somewhat different
in this respect, particularly in relation to the postwar communism of
Eastern Europe, which had to pretend to be something it was not:
indigenous and popular. “There was a distinctly cynical quality to
Communist misrule: old-fashioned abuses were now laboriously
embedded in a rhetorical cant of equality and social progress, a
hypocrisy for which neither the interwar oligarchs nor the Nazi occupiers had felt the need.” (Judt 2007: 194.)
35. Orwell 1984: 273.
36. Orwell 2000: 516–17.
37. Ibid.: 750.
38. In her lecture, Shklar suggests that much of the hold of Orwell’s book rests with its title: there would have been no commemorative conference had the book retained its original name, The Last
Man in Europe; it would then have had a status somewhere on a par
with Arthur Koestler’s Darkness at Noon, a book hardly anyone reads
now. (See Shklar, 1998a.)
39. Rorty 1989: 173.
40. Ibid.: 174.
41. Orwell 2000: 17.
42. Ibid.: 66.
241

CONCLUSION

43. Orwell 1968 vol. 4: 515.
44. Orwell 1998c: 124.
45. Orwell 1998f: 89.
46. Orwell 1989: 189.
47. Orwell 2000: 810.
48. In a book review of 1944 he wrote that the “debunking of
Cromwell, though probably it is not fair either, is a good antidote to
the usual middle-class worship of this prototype of all the modern
dictators.” (Orwell 1998f: 168.)
49. Rosebery 1900: 45.
50. Hobbes 1969: 146.
Conclusion

Sincerity and Hypocrisy in Democratic Politics
1. Oborne 2005: 264.
2. See “Mr Oborne v the PMOS. Anatomy of a Westminster altercation” (February 3, 2007, www.guardian.co.uk).
3. For an account of the need for “double standards” that fails to
appreciate that double standards have their own double standards,
see Cooper 2003. For an extended discussion of this failure, see
Runciman 2006a.
4. For, see Ferguson 2005; against, see Shapiro 2007.
5. In the early, heady days of Cameron’s leadership of the Tory
party, a number of commentators made the comparison with Disraeli explicit. Here, for example, is Peter Oborne, writing in The Spectator early in 2006: “It is not absurd or premature to start to make this
comparison with Disraeli, the greatest of Tory politicians. In a very
short space of time David Cameron has demonstrated the same
poise, scope and towering ambition. He too is set on taking the Tory
party back to Middle Britain and making it once again the natural
party of government. He too is determined to recreate the political
landscape. He has taken massive risks and, of course, in the end he
may fail. But he will not fail for lack of courage, martial spirit or a
true Conservative vision. He is a joy to behold.” (“David Cameron
follows in the footsteps of Benjamin Disraeli,” The Spectator, January
7, 2006.)
6. This distinction is set out in more detail in Runciman 2006b.
7. Dunn 1979.
8. This is one possible way of thinking about the story of neoconservatism, its recent disasters, and the inability of some of its
champions to make the move from the grand vision of Cold War
242

CONCLUSION

confrontation to the more detailed visions required for post–Cold
War reconstruction. Francis Fukuyama is the shining exception to
this. See Fukuyama 2005.
9. Baker 2007.
10. See Kagan 2003. For an account of what Hobbes actually
thought about international relations, see Malcolm 2002; Runciman
2006a.
11. MacFarquhar 2007.
12. Obama 2007: 216.
13. Aristotle 1996: 33.

243

This page intentionally left blank

Bibliography

Adams, John, 2000: The political writings, ed. George W. Carey (Washington, DC: Regnery Publishing)
Adams, John, 2007: The diary of John Adams (Massachusetts Historical
Society, www.masshist.org/digitaladams/aea/diary/)
Arendt, Hannah, 1972: Crises of the Republic (New York: Harcourt,
Brace, Jovanovich)
Aristotle, 1996: The politics and the constitution of Athens, ed. Stephen
Everson (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Bacon, Francis, 1996: The major works, ed. Brian Vickers (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Bailyn, Bernard, 1992: The ideological origins of the American Revolution
(Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, revised ed.)
Bailyn, Bernard, 2003: To begin the world anew. The genius and ambiguities of the American Founders (New York: Alfred A. Knopf )
Baker, Gerard, 2007: “The vaulting ambition of America’s Lady Macbeth,” The Times (January 26, www.timesonline.co.uk/comment)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1843: Swear not at all! in The works of Jeremy Bentham, vol. 5, ed. John Bowring (Edinburgh: William Tait)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1907: An introduction to the principles of morals and
legislation (Oxford: Clarendon)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1932: Theory of ﬁctions, ed. C. K. Ogden (London:
Kegan Paul)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1952: Handbook of political fallacies, ed. Harold
A. Larrabee (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins Press)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1983: Deontology together with A table of the springs
of action and The article of utilitarianism, ed. Amnon Goldsmith (Oxford: Clarendon)

245

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Bentham, Jeremy, 1988: A fragment on government, ed. Ross Harrison
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1990: Securities against misrule and other constitutional writings, ed. Philip Schoﬁeld (Oxford: Clarendon Press)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1996: An introduction to the principles of morals and
legislation, ed. J. H. Burns and H.L.A. Hart (Oxford: Clarendon)
Bentham, Jeremy, 1999: Political tactics, ed. Michael Jones, Cyprian
Blamires, and Catherine Pease-Watkin (Oxford: Clarendon)
Bentham, Jeremy, 2002: Rights, representation and reform. Nonsense
upon stilts and other writings on the French Revolution, ed. Michael
Jones, Cyprian Blamires, and Catherine Pease-Watkin (Oxford:
Clarendon)
Bernstein, R. B., 2003: Thomas Jefferson (Oxford: Oxford University
Press)
Blackburn, Simon, 2005: Truth. A guide for the perplexed (London:
Allen Lane)
Bok, Sissela, 1980: Lying: moral choice in public and private life (London: Quartet)
Bolingbroke, Henry, 1997: Political writings, ed. David Armitage
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Braudy, Leo, 1970: Narrative form in history and ﬁction (Princeton:
Princeton University Press)
Brett, Annabel, and James Tully (eds.), 2006: Rethinking the foundations of modern political thought (Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press)
Burt, Shelley, 1992: Virtue transformed. Political argument in England
1688–1740 (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Burton, Robert, 1862: The anatomy of melancholy (New York: Sheldon
and Company)
Chesterﬁeld, Philip Dormer Stanhope, Earl of, 1992: Letters, ed.
David Roberts (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Claeys, Gregory, 1985: “ ‘The Lion and the Unicorn,’ patriotism and
Orwell’s politics,” Journal of Politics, 47, 186–211
Clero, Jean-Pierre, 2004: “Le personage de Cromwell dans l’Histoire
d’Angleterre de Hume,” Cercles, 11, 15–31

246

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Collini, Stefan, 1991: Public moralists. Political thought and intellectual
life in Britain, 1850–1930 (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Collini, Stefan, Donald Winch, and John Burrow, 1993: That noble
science of politics. A study in nineteenth century intellectual history
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Collini, Stefan, 2006: Absent minds. Intellectuals in Britain (Oxford:
Oxford University Press)
Collins, Jeffrey R., 2005: The allegiance of Thomas Hobbes (Oxford:
Oxford University Press)
Cook, Harold, 1999: “Bernard de Mandeville and the therapy of the
‘clever politician,’ ” Journal of the History of Ideas, 60, 101–24
Cooper, Robert, 2003: The breaking of nations. Order and chaos in the
twenty-ﬁrst century (London: Atlantic Books)
Creppell, Ingrid, 2003: “The democratic element in Hobbes’s Behemoth,” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 7–36
Crosby, Travis, 1997: The two Mr Gladstones. A study in psychology and
history (New Haven: Yale University Press)
Davidson, Jenny, 2004: Hypocrisy and the politics of politeness. Manners
and morals from Locke to Austen (Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press)
Davis, J. C., 2001: Oliver Cromwell (London: Hodder Arnold)
Dienstag, Joshua Foa, 2006: Pessimism. Philosophy, ethic, spirit (Princeton: Princeton University Press)
Dunn, John, 1979: Western political theory in the face of the future (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Elster, Jon (ed.), 1996: The multiple self (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Fénelon, François de, 1994: Telemachus, ed. Patrick Riley (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Ferguson, Niall, 2005: Colossus. The rise and fall of the American empire
(London: Penguin)
Forbes, Duncan, 1975: Hume’s philosophical politics (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Frankfurt, Harry, 2005: On bullshit (Princeton: Princeton University
Press)

247

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Franklin, Benjamin, 1998: Autobiography and other writings (Oxford:
Oxford University Press)
Frost, Samantha, 2001: “Hobbes’s thinking-bodies and the ethics
of dissimulation,” Political Theory, 29, 30–57
Fukuyama, Francis, 2005: State building. Governance and world order in
the twenty-ﬁrst century (London: Proﬁle Books)
Galston, William A., 2005: The practice of liberal pluralism (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Garsten, Bryan, 2006: Saving persuasion. A defence of rhetoric and judgment (Harvard: Harvard University Press)
Ginzburg, Benjamin, 1922: “Hypocrisy as a pathological symptom,”
International Journal of Ethics, 32, 160–66
Glazer, Daryl, 2006: “Does hypocrisy matter? The case of U.S. foreign
policy,” Review of International Studies, 32, 251–68
Glover, Jonathan (ed.), 1990: Utilitarianism and its critics (New York:
Macmillan)
Goodin, Robert E., 1980, Manipulatory politics (New Haven: Yale University Press)
Goodin, Robert E., 1991: “Government House utilitarianism,” in The
utilitarian response. The contemporary viability of utilitarian political
philosophy, ed. Lincoln Allison (London: Sage)
Grant, Ruth W., 1997: Hypocrisy and integrity. Machiavelli, Rousseau,
and the ethics of politics (Chicago: Chicago University Press)
Green, T. H., 1883: Prolegomena to ethics, ed. A. C. Bradley (Oxford:
Clarendon Press)
Green, T. H., 1895: Lectures on the principles of political obligation (London: Longmans)
Green, T. H., 1912: Four lectures on the English Revolution (London:
Longmans)
Greenblatt, Stephen, 1973: Sir Walter Ralegh. The Renaissance man and
his roles (New Haven, Yale University Press)
Greenblatt, Stephen, 1980: Renaissance self-fashioning. From More to
Shakespeare (Chicago: Chicago University Press)
Halperin, John, 1977: Trollope and politics (London: Macmillan)
Hamer, D. A., 1968: John Morley. Liberal intellectual in politics (Oxford:
Clarendon)
248

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Hamilton, Alexander, James Madison, and John Jay, 2003: The Federalist. With Letters of “Brutus,” ed. Terence Ball (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Hampshire, Stuart, 1989: Innocence and experience (Harvard: Harvard
University Press)
Harrison, Ross, 1983: Bentham (London: Routledge)
Harrison, Ross, 2004: Hobbes, Locke, and confusion’s masterpiece (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Hart, H.L.A., 1982: Essays on Bentham: philosophy and jurisprudence
(Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Hazlitt, William, 1988: The selected writings of William Hazlitt, vol. 9
(Uncollected essays), ed. Duncan Wu (London: Pickering and Chatto)
Henry, Nancy, 2001: “George Eliot and politics,” in Cambridge companion to George Eliot, ed. George Levine (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press)
Herzog, Don, 2006: Cunning (Princeton: Princeton University Press)
Himmelfarb, Gertrude, 1968: Victorian minds (New York: Knopf )
Hitchens, Christopher, 2003: Orwell’s victory (London: Penguin Press)
Hobbes, Thomas, 1651: “The answer of Mr. Hobbes to Sir Will.
D’Avenant’s Preface before Gondibert,” in Sir William D’Avenant,
Gondibert (London: Thomas Newcomb)
Hobbes, Thomas, 1969: Behemoth, ed. Ferdinand Tönnies (London:
Frank Cass)
Hobbes, Thomas, 1995: Three discourses. A critical modern edition of
newly identiﬁed work of the young Hobbes, ed. Noel B. Reynolds and
Arlene W. Saxonhouse (Chicago: Chicago University Press)
Hobbes, Thomas, 1996: Leviathan, ed. Richard Tuck (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Hobbes, Thomas, 1998: On the citizen, ed. Richard Tuck and Michael
Silverthorne (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Hoekstra, Kinch, 2006a: “The end of philosophy. The case of
Hobbes,” Proceedings of the Aristotelian Society, 106, 23–60
Hoekstra, Kinch, 2006b: “A lion in the house. Hobbes and democracy,” in Rethinking the foundations of modern political thought, ed.
Annabel Brett and James Tully (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
249

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Hollis, Martin, 1982: “Dirty hands,” British Journal of Political Science,
12, 385–98.
Hont, Istvan, 2006: “The early Enlightenment debate on commerce
and luxury,” in The Cambridge history of eighteenth-century political
thought, ed. Mark Goldie and Robert Wokler (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Hume, David, 1975: Enquiries concerning human understanding and
concerning the principles of morals, ed. L. A. Selby-Bigge (Oxford:
Clarendon)
Hume, David, 1983: The history of England from the invasion of Julius
Caesar to the Revolution in 1688, vols. 5 and 6 (Liberty Classics:
Indianapolis)
Hume, L. J., 1981: Bentham and bureaucracy (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press)
Hundert, E. J., 1994: The Enlightenment’s fable. Bernard de Mandeville
and the discovery of society (Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press)
Hundert, E. J., 1995: “Bernard de Mandeville and the Enlightenment
maxims of modernity,” Journal of the History of Ideas, 56, 577–93
Hundert, E. J., 2000: “Sociability and self-love in the theatre of the
moral sentiments: Mandeville to Adam Smith,” in Economy, polity,
and society, ed. Stefan Collini, Richard Whatmore, and Brian
Young (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Isaacson, Walter, 2003: Benjamin Franklin. An American life (New
York: Simon & Schuster)
James, Susan, 1997: Passion and action. The emotions in seventeenthcentury philosophy (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Jefferson, Thomas, 1999: Political writings, ed. Joyce Appleby and
Terence Ball (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Jenkins, Roy, 1995: Gladstone (London: Macmillan)
Johnson, Peter, 1988: Politics, innocence and the limits of goodness (London: Routledge)
Judt, Tony, 2007: Postwar. A history of Europe since 1945 (London: Pimlico)
Kagan, Robert, 2003: Paradise and power. America and Europe in the new
world order (London: Atlantic Books)
250

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Klein, Lawrence E., 1994: Shaftesbury and the culture of politeness.
Moral discourse and cultural politics in early eighteenth-century England (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Kramnick, Isaac, 1990: Republicanism and bourgeois radicalism. Political
ideology in late eighteenth-century England and America (New York:
Cornell University Press)
Laache, R., 1917: “A letter by Holberg concerning Cromwell,” English
Historical Review, 32, 412–15
Lieberman, David, 2000: “Economy and polity in Bentham’s science
of legislation,” in Economy, polity, society, ed. Stefan Collini,
Richard Whatmore, and Brian Young (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press)
Lloyd, John, 2004: What the media are doing to our politics (London:
Constable & Robinson)
Lucas, Philip, and Anne Sheeran, 2006: “Asperger’s Syndrome and
the eccentricity and genius of Jeremy Bentham,” Journal of Bentham Studies, 8 (www.ucl.ac.uk/Bentham-Project/journal/jnl
_2006.htm)
Lund, William, 2003: “Neither Behemoth nor Leviathan. Explaining
Hobbes’s illiberal politics,” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 59–84
MacFarquhar, Larissa, 2007: “The conciliator. Where is Barack
Obama coming from?” The New Yorker, May 7 (www.newyorker
.com/reporting/2007/05/07/07050fa_fact_macfarquahr)
Machiavelli, Niccolo, 1988: The prince, ed. Quentin Skinner and
Russell Price (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Malcolm, Noel, 2002: Aspects of Hobbes (Oxford: Clarendon)
Malcolm, Noel, 2003: “Behemoth latinus. Adam Ebert, Tacitism and
Hobbes,” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 85–120
Malcolm, Noel, 2007: Reason of state, propaganda and the Thirty Years’
War. An unknown translation by Thomas Hobbes (Oxford: Oxford
University Press)
Mandeville, Bernard de (Anonymous), 1733: The fable of the bees,
part II (London: J. Roberts)
Mandeville, Bernard de, 1969: Free thoughts on religion, the Church and
national happiness (facsimile edition, Stuttgart: Friedrich Frommann Verlag)
251

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Mandeville, Bernard de, 1970: The fable of the bees, ed. Philip Harth
(Harmondsworth: Penguin)
Mandeville, Bernardde, 1971: An enquiry into the origin of honour and
the usefulness of Christianity in war, ed. M. M. Goldsmith (London:
Frank Cass)
Manin, Bernard de, 1997: The principles of representative government
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
McCullough, David, 2001: John Adams (New York: Simon & Schuster)
Mill, James, 1992: Political writings, ed. Terence Ball (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Mill, John Stuart, 1989: Autobiography, ed. John M. Robson (Harmondsworth: Penguin)
Miller, William Ian, 2003: Faking it (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Mitchell, Annie, 2003: “Character of an Independent Whig—‘Cato’
and Bernard Mandeville,” History of European Ideas, 29, 291–311
Morley, John, 1900: Oliver Cromwell (London: Macmillan)
Morley, John, 1903: The life of William Ewart Gladstone, 3 vols.
(London: Macmillan)
Morley, John, 1997: On compromise, ed. John Powell (Edinburgh:
Keele University Press)
“Mr Oborne v the PMOS. Anatomy of a Westminster altercation,”
2007: Guardian Unlimited, February 3 (www.guardian.co.uk)
Nardin, Jane, 1996: Trollope and Victorian moral philosophy (Athens,
OH: Ohio University Press)
Obama, Barack, 2007: The audacity of hope. Thoughts on recapturing the
American dream (Edinburgh: Canongate)
Oborne, Peter, 2005: The rise of political lying (London: The Free Press)
Oborne, Peter, 2006: “David Cameron follows in the footsteps of
Benjamin Disraeli,” The Spectator, January 7
Orwell, George, 1968: The collected essays, journalism and letters, 4
vols., ed. Sonia Orwell and Ian Angus (London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1982: The lion and the unicorn. Socialism and the English genius (London: Penguin Books)

252

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Orwell, George, 1984: The Orwell reader. Fiction, essays, and reportage
(San Diego: Harcourt)
Orwell, George, 1989: The Road to Wigan Pier (London: Penguin Books)
Orwell, George, 1998a: A kind of compulsion 1903–36, ed. Peter Davison (London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998b: Facing unpleasant facts 1937–39, ed. Peter
Davison (London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998c: A patriot after all 1940–41, ed. Peter Davison
(London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998d: All propaganda is lies 1941–42, ed. Peter Davison (London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998e: Two wasted years 1943, ed. Peter Davison
(London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998f: I have tried to tell the truth 1943–44, ed. Peter
Davison (London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 1998g: I belong to the left 1945, ed. Peter Davison
(London: Secker & Warburg)
Orwell, George, 2000: The complete novels (London: Penguin Books)
Orwell, George, 2006: The lost Orwell, ed. Peter Davison (London:
Timewell Press)
Paine, Thomas, 2000: Political writings, ed. Bruce Kucklick (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Pettit, Philip, 2008: Made with words. Hobbes on language, mind and politics (Princeton: Princeton University Press)
Plato, 2003: The republic, ed. G.R.F. Ferrari (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press)
Pocock, J.G.A., 1975: The Machiavellian moment. Florentine thought and
the Atlantic republican tradition (Princeton: Princeton University
Press)
Pocock, J.G.A., 1985: Virtue, commerce and history (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Priestley, Joseph, 1993: Political writings, ed. Peter Miller (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Randall, William Sterne, 1994: Thomas Jefferson. A life (London:
HarperPerennial)

253

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Richmond, Charles, and Paul Smith (eds.), 1998: The self-fashioning of
Disraeli, 1818–1851 (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Rochefoucauld, François, Duc de la, 1959: Maxims, ed. Leonard Tancock (Harmondsworth: Penguin)
Rodden, John (ed.), 2007: The Cambridge companion to George Orwell
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Rorty, Richard, 1989: Contingency, irony and solidarity (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Rosebery, Archibald, Philip, Primrose, Earl of, 1900: “On Cromwell,”
The Critic, 36, 43–51
Rosen, Frederick, 1983: Jeremy Bentham and representative democracy.
A study of the Constitutional Code (Oxford: Clarendon)
Rousseau, Jean-Jacques, 1997a: The discourses and other early political
writings, ed. Victor Gourevitch (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Rousseau, Jean-Jacques, 1997b: “The social contract” and other later
political writings, ed. Victor Gourevitch (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press, 1997)
Runciman, David, 2006a: The politics of good intentions. History, fear
and hypocrisy in the new world order (Princeton: Princeton University Press)
Runciman, David, 2006b: “Liars, hypocrites and crybabies,” London
Review of Books, 28:21, November 2 (www.lrb.co.uk/v28/n21/
runc01)
Ryerson, Richard Alan (ed.), 2001: John Adams and the founding of the
Republic (Boston: Massachusetts Historical Society)
Schama, Simon, 2005: Rough crossings. Britain, the slaves and the American Revolution (London: BBC Books)
Schoﬁeld, Philip, 2006: Utility and democracy.: The political thought of
Jeremy Bentham (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Schultz, Bart, 2002: “Eye of the universe. Henry Sidgwick and the
problem public,” Utilitas, 14, 155–88
Schultz, Bart, 2004: Henry Sidgwick. Eye of the universe (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Scott, Jonathan, 2004: Commonwealth principles. Republican writing of
the English Revolution (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
254

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Searle, G. R., 2004: A new England? Peace and war 1886–1918 (Oxford:
Clarendon)
Shaftesbury, Anthony Ashley Cooper, Earl of, 1999: Characteristicks
of men, manners, opinions, times, ed. Philip Ayres, 2 vols. (Oxford:
Clarendon)
Shannon, Richard, 1999: Gladstone. Heroic minister 1865–1898 (London: Allen Lane)
Shapiro, Ian, 2007: Containment. Rebuilding a strategy against global
terror (Princeton: Princeton University Press)
Shklar, Judith, 1984: Ordinary vices (Cambridge, MA: Bellknap Press)
Shklar, Judith, 1998a: Political thought and political thinkers, ed. Stanley Hoffmann (Chicago: University of Chicago Press)
Shklar, Judith, 1998b: Redeeming American political thought, ed. Stanley Hoffmann and Dennis F. Thompson (Chicago: University of
Chicago Press)
Sidgwick, Henry, 1891: Elements of politics (London: Macmillan)
Sidgwick, Henry, 1996a: Methods of ethics (Bristol: Thommies Press)
Sidgwick, Henry, 1996b: Practical ethics. A collection of addresses and
essays (Bristol: Thoemmes)
Sidgwick, Henry, 1996c: Miscellaneous essays 1870–1899 (Bristol:
Thoemmes)
Silver, Victoria, 1996: “Hobbes on rhetoric,” in The Cambridge companion
to Hobbes, ed. Tom Sorrell (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Skinner, Quentin, 1973: “The empirical theorists of democracy and
their critics: A plague on both their houses,” Political Theory, 1,
287–305
Skinner, Quentin, 1996: Reason and rhetoric in the philosophy of Thomas
Hobbes (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Skinner, Quentin, 2002: Visions of politics, 3 vols. (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Skinner, Quentin, 2005: “Hobbes on representation,” European Journal of Philosophy, 13, 155–84
Skinner, Quentin, 2006: “Surveying The Foundations. A retrospect and
reassessment,” in Rethinking the foundations of modern political
thought, ed. Annabel Brett and James Tully (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
255

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Slomp, Gabriella, 2003: “Hobbes’s Behemoth on ambition, greed and
fear,” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 189–204
Smart, J.J.C., and Bernard Williams, 1973: Utilitarianism. For and
against (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Smith, Adam, 1976: The theory of moral sentiments, ed. D. D. Raphael
and A. L. Macﬁe (Oxford: Clarendon)
Sommerville, Johann P., 2003: “Hobbes, Behemoth, church-state relations and political obligation,” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 205–22
Springborg, Patricia, 2003: “Behemoth and Hobbes’s ‘science of just
and unjust,’ ” Filozofski Vestnik, 24, 243–66
Strachey, Lytton, 2003: Eminent Victorians (Oxford: Oxford University
Press)
Strauss, Leo, 1959: What is political philosophy? And other studies
(Glencoe: Free Press)
Taylor, D. J., 2003: Orwell. The life (London: Chatto & Windus)
Thompson, C. Bradley, 1998: John Adams and the spirit of liberty
(Lawrence: University of Kansas Press)
Thompson, Dennis F., 2005: ‘Hypocrisy and democracy’ in Restoring
responsibility. Ethics in business, healthcare and government (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Trollope, Anthony, 1972: The New Zealander (Oxford: Clarendon)
Trollope, Anthony, 1973: Phineas Redux (Oxford: Oxford University
Press)
Trollope, Anthony, 1983: The letters of Anthony Trollope, 2 vols., ed.
N. John Hall (Stanford: Stanford University Press)
Trollope, Anthony, 1994: The way we live now, ed. Frank Kermode
(Harmondsworth: Penguin)
Trollope, Anthony, 1999: Autobiography (Bath: Trollope Society)
Tuck, Richard, 1993: Philosophy and government 1572–1651 (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Tuck, Richard, 1996: “Hobbes’s moral philosophy,” in The Cambridge
companion to Hobbes, ed. Tom Sorrell (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Tuck, Richard, 2000: “Hobbes and Tacitus,” in Hobbes and history,
ed. G.A.J. Rogers and T. Sorrell (London: Routledge)

256

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Tuck, Richard, 2006: “Hobbes and democracy,” in Rethinking the
foundations of modern political thought, ed. Annabel Brett and James
Tully (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Vidal, Gore, 1973: Burr (New York: Random House)
Wall, Stephen, 1988: Trollope and character (London: Faber and Faber)
Weber, Max, 1994: Political writings, ed. Peter Lassman and Ronald
Speirs (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press)
Weinberger, Jerry, 2005: Benjamin Franklin unmasked. On the unity of
his moral, religious and political thought (Lawrence: University Press
of Kansas)
Wilkins, Roger, 2002: Jefferson’s pillow. The founding fathers and the
dilemma of black patriotism (Boston: Beacon Press)
Williams, Bernard, 2002: Truth and truthfulness (Princeton: Princeton
University Press)
Williams, Bernard, 2005: In the beginning was the deed. Realism and
moralism in political argument, ed. Geoffrey Hawthorn (Princeton:
Princeton University Press)
Williamson, Chilton, 1955: “Bentham looks at America,” Political Science Quarterly, 70, 543–51
Wills, Garry, 2002: Inventing America. Jefferson’s Declaration of Independence (New York: Houghton Mifﬂin)
Wilson, Bee, 2008: Swindled. From poison sweets to counterfeit coffee—
the dark history of the food cheats (London: John Murray)
Wilson, Ben, 2007: Decency and disorder. The age of cant 1789–1837
(London: Faber & Faber)
Wolin, Sheldon, 2004: Politics and vision. Continuity and innovation in
Western political thought (expanded edition, Princeton: Princeton
University Press)
Wood, Gordon S., 1969: The creation of the American Republic
1776–1787 (Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina Press)
Wood, Gordon S., 2004: The Americanization of Benjamin Franklin
(London: Penguin)
Wootton, David, 1986: Introduction to Divine right and democracy. An
anthology of political writing in Stuart England, ed. David Wootton
(Harmondsworth: Penguin)

257

BIBLIOGRAPHY

Wootton, David, 1993: “David Hume ‘the historian,’ ” in The Cambridge companion to Hume, ed. David Fate Norton (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press)
Wootton, David, 2006: Bad medicine. Doctors doing harm since Hippocrates (Oxford: Oxford University Press)
Worden, Blair, 2001: Roundhead reputations. The English Civil War and
the passions of posterity (London: Penguin)
Zagorin, Perez, 1990: Ways of lying. Dissimulation, persecution and conformity in early modern Europe (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press)
Zagorin, Perez, 1998: The English Revolution. Politics, events, ideas
(Aldershot: Ashgate)

258

Index

Absent Minds: Intellectuals in Britain
(Collini), 171
actors, 7–9, 23, 38. See also persona
Adams, Abigail, 74
Adams, John, 74, 78; American
Revolution and, 95–96; aristocracy
and, 96–97, 100–103, 110; background of, 81; Bacon and, 95;
Bolingbroke and, 98; democracy
and, 102–3, 208–9; Discourse on
Davila and, 98–103; dissimulation
and, 94–95; Franklin and, 94–95,
97; French and, 98–102; Jefferson
and, 103–4, 107–13, 115, 120;
Mandeville and, 94–96; man’s
superﬁciality and, 95–96; philosophy of, 94–102; politics of, 79,
81–82, 94–103; Publicola and,
103–4; republic and, 102; secrecy
and, 94; sincerity and, 94–103;
spectemur agendo and, 96
Adams, John Quincy, 103, 111
Adams, Samuel, 94
Age of Reason, The (Paine), 106–7,
239n29
Ahmadinejad, Mahmoud, 12, 227n8
American Revolution: Adams and,
95–96; Atlantic political thought
and, 77; Congress and, 75;
Declaration of Independence and,
75; dissembling issues and,
77–78; double standard of, 74;
freedom claims and, 74; Hobbes
and, 79, 82; liberty and, 74–75;
Machiavelli and, 234n6; Mande-

ville and, 79–80, 82; piety and, 78;
republican thought and, 79;
Scottish Enlightenment and,
78–80; simplicity and, 92–93; sincerity and, 74–82, 92; slavery and,
74–77; virtue and, 78–79
Anatomy of Melancholy (Burton),
233n26
Anglican Church, 153
Animal Farm (Orwell), 187–88
anti-hypocrisy, 205; freedom and,
196; futility of protest and,
196–202; ideology and, 184–93;
Orwell and, 184–93; temptations
of, 196–202
aristocracy: Adams and, 96–97,
100–103, 110; Jefferson and, 108,
110
Aristotle, 95, 127
Art of War (Sun Tzu), 15
Asquith, H. H., 156
Atlantic political thought, 77
Auden, W. H., 171
Austen, Jane, 144
Autobiography (Franklin), 82–84, 92
Bacon, Francis, 79, 221; Adams and,
94–95; concealment and, 84–87;
dissimulation and, 84–90;
Franklin and, 84–85; humanism
of, 92; lies and, 104–6; Morley
and, 153, 155; philosophy of,
84–92; political deception and,
84–85; simulation and, 84–90,
104–5, 234nn11,15, 236n20

259

INDEX

Bailyn, Bernard, 93
Baker, Gerard, 214–16
Behemoth (Hobbes), 17–19; concealment and, 34–35; Cromwell and,
59; disobedience and, 23–30;
opening paragraph of, 228n4;
Orwell and, 193
Bentham, Jeremy, 6, 173, 199, 201;
Burr and, 236n11; ceremony and,
121–25; Chesterﬁeld and, 119;
concealment and, 116–25;
Cromwell and, 117–18; democracy
and, 137–41, 206–8; empty words
and, 121–25; ﬁctions and, 131–41;
Hobbes and, 124–32, 135–38, 141;
human passions and, 118; inconstancy and, 125–31; Jefferson and,
120–21; language and, 121–41;
Mandeville and, 120; morals and,
116; oaths and, 121–25; Orwell
and, 174–76; politeness and,
119–20; popular representation
and, 140–41; religion and,
237n18; self–denial and, 120–21;
sentimentalism and, 120–21;
Sidgwick and, 157, 162; social
contract and, 136–37; style of,
118–19, 121–22; Trollope and,
149–50; United States and, 117;
unmasking and, 116–17; useful
ﬁctions and, 131–37; utilitarianism and, 116–21, 140–41, 237n18
Bible, 39, 123–24, 193
Blackburn, Simon, 172
Blair, Tony, 143, 148, 174, 197, 200,
204–5
Bloomberg, Michael, 220
Boer War, 166
Bolingbroke, Henry: Adams and, 95,
98; Jefferson and, 114; persona and,
91–92; sincerity and, 78–79, 89–91
Book of Fictions (Bentham), 133–34
book reviewers, 168–73
Brown, Gordon, 205
Burke, Edmund, 26–27

Burr, Aaron, 120, 236n11
Burr (Vidal), 112
Burton, Robert, 233n26
Bush, George W., 12, 126, 131, 174,
216, 227n8
Cambridge University, 121–25, 153,
157
Cameron, David, 148, 205, 224,
242n5
cant, 130, 206–8
Carlyle, Thomas, 144, 151–52
Catholic Church, 25–26, 28, 36, 144,
151–52, 159, 176
Catholic Herald, 176
Chamberlain, Neville, 21
character assassination, 3
charity, 29, 54–55
Charles I, King of England, 25–26,
133–36
Charles II, King of England, 27
Chesterﬁeld, Lord, 119
China, 225
Christianity, 83–84, 88–89, 158–59
Churchill, Winston, 174
Church of England, 148
Cive, De (Hobbes), 17–22, 33, 36, 138
Clinton, Bill, 66, 204–5, 215
Clinton, Hillary, 14, 205; Bush and,
216; Hobbes and, 216; Iraq War
and, 217; lack of warmth of, 215;
Mandeville and, 215–16; persona
and, 214–17; religion and, 214–17
cloaking, 30–35. See also concealment
Cold War, 207–8, 242n8
Coleridge, Samuel Taylor, 130
Collected Writings (Orwell), 170–71
Collini, Stefan, 171–74
Coming Up for Air (Orwell), 184–85,
189
compromise: Cromwell statue and,
192–93; Morley and, 143, 151–56;
Orwell and, 181, 189–90; politics
and, 151–56, 201, 205, 217,

260

INDEX

219–22; religion and, 157–59;
Sidgwick and, 156–59, 164–66
concealment, 10, 166; Adams and,
94–95; Bacon and, 84–87;
Bentham and, 116–25; cant and,
130; cunning and, 84–90, 93; disobedience and, 34–35; dissimulation and, 84–90, 234n11,
235n20; faux confessions and,
210–12; ﬁctions and, 131–41;
Franklin and, 84–87, 92–93; gesture and, 70; inconstancy and,
125–31; Jefferson and, 112; language and, 121–41, 207–8;
Mandeville and, 53, 55–56;
Morley and, 166; oaths and,
121–25; Orwell and, 175–77;
politeness and, 119–20; pretended difﬁculties and, 211–12; simulation and, 84–90; vanity and,
24–25; Victorians and, 166
“Confessions of a Book Reviewer”
(Orwell), 170
conjurers, 148–49, 204–5
Connolly, Cyril, 170–71
conscience, 212; Hobbes and, 18–19,
22, 32–33, 39, 43, 229n13; law of
nature and, 18–19, 22; Orwell
and, 182; Victorians and, 157, 166
Conservative Party, 143, 151
Contingency, Irony and Solidarity
(Rorty), 186
Cromwell, Oliver, 111, 195, 232n24;
Bentham and, 117–18; fashionable hypocrisy and, 58–63; ﬁctions and, 134–35; Hobbes and,
18, 35, 59, 232n24; Hume and,
228n6; Jefferson and, 114;
Mandeville and, 58–63, 67, 69–70,
73, 114, 211; masks and, 117–18,
210; Morley and, 166; Orwell
and, 191–93; religion and, 60, 62;
Rousseau and, 59–60; tears of,
117–18
cunning, 84–90, 93

D’Avenant, William, 149
deception: effects of, 7–12; language
and, 121–41; Morley and, 154–55
Declaration of Independence, 75
Defence of the Constitutions of the
United States (Adams), 97
Deists, 82–83
democracy, ix, 1; Adams and,
102–3, 208–9; anti-hypocrisy
and, 184–93, 196–202; Bentham
and, 137–41, 206–8; as cant of
modern world, 130, 206–8; concealment and, 32–33; ﬁctions
and, 137–41; futility of protest
and, 197–200; grandiose claims
for, 207–8; imperialism and,
181–84, 202–4; impossible sincerity in, 20; Jefferson and,
107–11, 115, 208–9; liberalism
and, 2–3 (see also liberalism);
Morley and, 166; Orwell and,
180, 202–4, 219; persona and, 20,
38–39; purity and, 147; Shklar
and, 219; Sidgwick and, 162–66;
totalitarianism and, 183–88;
Trollope and, 204–6; Victorians
and, 142
Democrats, 217–19
Deontology (Bentham), 118–19
Dickens, Charles, 4, 144
Discourse on the Sciences and Arts
(Rousseau), 59–60
Discourses on Davila (Adams),
98–102, 103
disobedience, 42; actors and, 23;
Behemoth and, 23–30; concealment
and, 34–35; godliness and, 23;
vain-glory and, 24
Disraeli, Benjamin, 143, 204–5;
Catholic Church and, 151–52; as
Machiavellian, 148; Morley and,
151–52; Trollope and, 239n12;
Victorian hypocrisy and, 147–52
Dissertation on Liberty & Necessity,
Pleasure and pain, A (Franklin), 82

261

INDEX

dissimulation, 3; Adams and, 94–95;
American Revolution and, 84–95,
103–8; Bacon and, 85–87, 234n11,
235n20; Franklin and, 84–90;
Jefferson and, 103–8; Mandeville
and, 231n51; Morley and, 153;
Sidgwick and, 158; silence and,
158
double standards, 2–3, 74; modern
politics and, 210–11; Orwell and,
169–72, 177, 185–86; Sidgwick
and, 156–67
double-think, 185–86
Dunn, John, 206
Dutch Republic, 46–47
Edinburgh Review, 140
Edwards, John, 217
egoism, 47, 170–72
Elements of Law, The (Hobbes), 20,
229n13
Elements of Politics, The (Sidgwick),
160–62
Eliot, George, 144
Eminent Victorians (Strachey),
142–43
“England, Your England” (Orwell),
180
Enquiry into the Origins of Honour,
An (Mandeville), 56–62
“Essay on Charity and
Charity–Schools” (Mandeville),
54–55
“Ethics and Conformity of
Subscription, The” (Sidgwick), 157
“Ethics of Religious Conformity,
The” (Sidgwick), 157–58
excommunication, 36
Eye of the Universe (Schulz), 156
Fable of the Bees, The (Mandeville),
78, 82, 231nn51, 232n21; Adams
and, 94; Chesterﬁeld and, 119;
virtue of vice and, 45, 48–50, 52,
55, 67–68

faith, 3, 8, 203, 211, 221; Bentham
and, 141, good faith principle
and, 172; Hobbes and, 25–29, 40;
Mandeville and, 66, 68, 70; modern politicians and, 214–17;
Orwell and, 172, 189; sincerity
and, 92, 107, 111; Victorians and,
149–54, 157–60, 166
fascism, 183–84, 241n34; antihypocrisy and, 188–93; capitalism
and, 190–91; socialism and,
189–91
fashionable hypocrisy, 56–57, 64;
Cromwell and, 58–63
faux-confessions, 210–12
federalism, 109–10, 163
Felix Holt (Eliot), 144
Fénelon, François, 50
fictions: Cromwell and, 134–35;
dangerous, 132; democratic,
137–41; justice and, 133–37;
nugatory, 131–32; popular representation and, 140–41; social
contract and, 136–37; useful,
131–37
flattery, 24, 48–50
Fortnightly Review, 151, 157
France, 93; Adams and, 98–102;
useful ﬁctions and, 135
Franklin, Benjamin, 6, 78, 114,
208–9; Adams and, 94–95, 97;
Bacon and, 84–85; Bolingbroke
and, 89–91; concealment and,
84–87; Deism and, 82–83; dissimulation and, 84–90; Jefferson and,
105–6; London and, 82; Mandeville and, 82–84; Paine and, 80;
persona and, 91–92; philosophy
of, 82–93; politics of, 80–81,
92–93; Poor Richard maxims and,
92; secrecy and, 92–93; selfdenial and, 83–84; selﬁshness
and, 83–84; simplicity and, 84,
88–90, 92–93; sincerity and,
82–93

262

INDEX

Free Thoughts on Religion, the Church
and National Happiness (Mandeville), 64–65
French Revolution, 77, 101, 108
Gandhi, 181
Geffen, David, 215
Gentlemen, 55–56
Giuliani, Rudolph, 217–18, 220
Gladstone, William, 204–5; Disraeli
and, 151–52; Irish University Bill
and, 151; Morley and, 156;
Victorian democracy and, 142–43,
147–52, 156, 160
global warming, 222–26
God, 38, 122
godliness, 23
Goldsmith, Maurice, 230n22
Gondibert (D’Avenant), 149
good faith principle, 172
Gore, Al, 205, 222–23
Grant, Ruth, 4–5, 41
Green, T. H., 156
Grey, Edward, 156
“Grumbling Hive, The” (Mandeville), 49–50
guile, 51
Haldane, Richard, 156
Hamilton, Alexander, 208
Harrington, James, 234n6
Harrison, Ross, 237n38
Hart, H.L.A., 116
Hassall, Arthur Hill, 146
Hawthorne, Nathaniel, 4, 144
Hazlitt, William, 130
Henrietta Maria, Queen Consort of
England, 25–27
History of England (Hume), 18, 117
Hitchens, Christopher, 173–74, 189
Hitler, Adolph, 21–22, 184–85
Hobbes, Thomas, ix, 1, 5–6, 10,
14–15, 226, 243n10; Adams and,
95–96; American Revolution and,
79, 82; background of, 46–47,

228n1; Bentham and, 124–32,
135–38, 141; Bush and, 216; concealment and, 30–35; conscience
and, 18–19, 22, 32–33, 39, 43,
229n13; consistency of, 16–17;
Cromwell and, 18, 35, 59, 232n24;
democratic ﬁctions and, 137–41;
disobedience and, 23–30, 42; double folly and, 24; Hillary Clinton
and, 216; Hume and, 17–18;
inconstant language and, 125–31;
insigniﬁcant language and, 125,
127; intent and, 18–21; Jefferson
and, 106; Mandeville and, 45–49,
59, 79–80, 82; metaphor and, 127,
237n24; modern politics and,
41–44; natural law and, 16, 18–19,
39, 43–44; Orwell and, 173–76,
193; peace and, 21–22; persona
and, 19–20, 36–41; power and,
212–13; public reaction to, 45–46;
religion and, 25–30; Sidgwick
and, 151, 157; Trollope and, 149;
vanity and, 24–25
Hoekstra, Kinch, 27, 230n24
Home Rule, 165–66
humbug, 170
Hume, David, 5–6, 17–18, 117,
228nn5,6
humour, 209–10
Hussein, Saddam, 174
Hutcheson, Francis, 78–79
hypocrisy, ix–x; acting upon, 1–4;
American, 74–82, 213–26; antihypocrisy and, 184–93, 196–202;
book reviews and, 168–73;
British, 74–82; ceremony and,
121–25; class–based, 54–56; compromise and, 219–22; concealment and, 30–35 (see also concealment); deﬁning, 7–12; disobedience and, 23–30; double standards and, 74; as English vice,
176–84; environmental issues
and, 222–26; ﬁctions and, 131–41;

263

INDEX

hypocrisy (continued)
ﬁrst/second order, 51–56, 63–73,
200–201; futility of protest and,
197–202; good faith principle
and, 172; Greek theatre and, 7–9;
historical vs. contemporary view
of, 12–15; ideology and, 168–93;
imperial, 181–84, 202–4; intentions and, 10–11, 64–73 (see also
intentions); Iraq War and, 217–19;
language and, 121–41, 175–76;
malicious vs. fashionable, 56–64;
medical profession and, 168–69;
negative advertising and, 3–4;
oaths and, 121–25; as ordinary
vice, 2–7; patriotism and, 219–20;
persona and, 8–10, 36–41 (see also
persona); prevalence of, 1–3,
12–13; religion and, 23–28, 214–17
(see also religion); repulsive nature
of, 2; role of, 1–2; sexual, 29; slavery and, 74–77; total power and,
184–88; Trollope and, 142–51;
utilitarianism and, 116–21; vanity
and, 24–25; varieties of, 7–12;
Victorian, 142–67
Hypocrisy and Integrity (Grant), 4
ideology: anti-hypocrisy and,
188–93; book reviews and,
168–71; hypocrisy as English vice
and, 176–84; intellectualism and,
168–76; total power and, 184–88
immortality, 158
imperialism, 181–84, 202–4
imposture, 137
inconstancy: ﬁctions and, 131–41;
language and, 125–31
Independents, 59
Infallibility of Human Judgment, The
(Lyons), 82
insigniﬁcant language, 125–31
intellectualism: anti–intellectualism
and, 173; book reviews and,
168–73; egoism and, 170–72; ide-

ology and, 168–76; Kipling and,
177–79; pretension and, 175;
Wodehouse and, 177–79
intentions, 10–11, 18–20; Bacon and,
84–85; concealment and, 30–35;
cunning and, 84–85; disobedience
and, 23–30; Franklin and, 84–85;
good, 64–73; Hobbes and, 20–21;
lies and, 40 (see also lies); malicious
hypocrisy and, 56–64; Mandeville
and, 64–73; peace and, 21–22;
transparency and, 115, 175–77
Introduction to the Principles of
Morals and Legislation (Bentham),
117
Iran, 12
Iraq War, 173–74, 204, 217–19
Irish Church, 148
Irish University Bill, 151
Isherwood, Christopher, 171
Islamofascism, 189
Jebb, John, 97–98
Jefferson, Thomas, ix–x, 6, 211, 221,
236n59; Adams and, 103–4,
107–13, 115, 120; aristocracy and,
96–97, 108, 110; Bentham and,
120–21; Bolingbroke and, 114;
Burr and, 120, 236n11; concealment and, 112; Congress and, 75;
Declaration of Independence and,
75; democracy and, 107–11, 115,
208–9; dissimulation and, 103–8;
Federalists and, 109–10; Franklin
and, 105–6; Hobbes and, 106;
honesty and, 113–14; lies and,
104–7; Mandeville and, 106, 114;
Paine and, 80, 103, 106–7; persona and, 111–15; politics of,
76–81, 103–15; presidency of, 109;
press and, 111; Publicola and,
103–4; religion and, 107; republicanism and, 109–10; simulation
and, 104; slavery and, 75–77, 115;
virtue and, 108–11

264

INDEX

Jephthah, 124
journalists, 183, 238n4; futility of
protest and, 197–202; Victorians
and, 145–46, 149–50, 152
justice, 18–19, 22; concealment and,
30–35; useful ﬁctions and, 133–37
Kames, Lord, 78
Keep the Aspidistra Flying (Orwell),
171
Kelly, Tom, 198
Kerry, John, 217
Kipling, Rudyard, 177–79
bin Laden, Osama, 174
language, 176, 207–8; empty words
and, 121–25; ﬁctions and, 131–41;
inconstant, 125–31; insigniﬁcant,
125–31; meaningful discourse
and, 121; metaphor and, 175,
237n24; oaths and, 121–25;
Orwell and, 185–86
law of nature: conscience and,
18–19, 22; Hobbes and, 16–19, 22,
39, 43–44; inconstant language
and, 129
lawyers, 156–57, 161–62
Lenin, Vladimir, 134
Letters to His Son (Chesterﬁeld), 119
Leviathan (Hobbes), 15, 149; concealment and, 31–32; insigniﬁcant
language and, 125, 127; Mandeville and, 45; masks and, 17,
24–25, 31–32; persona and, 36–41;
sovereignty and, 229nn10,12
liberalism, 1, 194; character assassination and, 3; classic tradition
and, 4–5; environmental issues
and, 225–26; futility of protest
and, 197–202; Home Rule and,
165–66; negative advertising and,
3; Sidgwick and, 165–67; socialism and, 201–2; vice and, 2–7;
Victorians and, 143, 147–49,
153–54, 165–67

liberal rationalists, 5–6, 13, 10, 117,
175
Liberals, 153–56
liberty, 64, 74–75, 82
lies, 9, 12, 194, 197–98; Bacon and,
104–6; cant and, 130; Clintons
and, 215; democracy and, 137–41;
dissimulation and, 3 (see also dissimulation); faux confessions and,
210–12; ﬁctions and, 131–41;
Jefferson and, 104–7; language
and, 121–41; masks and, 37–40;
persona and, 37–38; politeness
and, 119–20; pretended difﬁculties and, 211–12; purity and,
145–47
Lincoln, Abraham, 220–21
Lion and the Unicorn, The (Orwell),
180
Lloyd, John, 198–200
Locke, John, 5, 78–79
Lost Orwell, The (Orwell), 171
luck, 93, 113, 208
Macaulay, Thomas, 140–41, 144
McCain, John, 217, 220
Macclesﬁeld, Lord, 69
McGuinness, Martin, 195
Machiavelli, Niccolò, 4, 6–7, 15, 41;
American Revolution and, 234n6;
Disraeli and, 148; morals and, 46,
210; Morley and, 156; neoMachiavellianism and, 163–64;
Orwell and, 175, 185–86; political
deception and, 84–85, 194–95;
public reaction to, 45–46; republican thought and, 79
Madison, James, 208
Malcolm, Noel, 237n24
malicious hypocrisy, 56–64
Mandeville, Bernard de, 5–6, 78,
173; Adams and, 94–96;
American Revolution and, 78–80,
82; background of, 168–69;
Bentham and, 120; charity and,

265

INDEX

Mandeville, Bernard de (continued)
54–55; Chesterﬁeld and, 119;
class-based hypocrisy and,
54–56; Cromwell and, 58–63, 67,
69–70, 73, 114, 211; dissimulation
and, 231n51; faking virtue and,
45–51; faux confessions and,
210–12; Fénelon and, 50;
ﬁrst/second order hypocrisy
and, 51–56, 63, 65, 70–73; ﬂattery
and, 48; Franklin and, 82–84;
good intentions and, 64–73;
Hillary Clinton and, 215–16;
Hobbes and, 45–49, 59, 79–80, 82;
humour and, 209–10; inﬂuences
of, 47; intentions and, 56–64;
Jefferson and, 106, 114;
Machiavelli and, 45–47; malicious vs. fashionable hypocrisy
and, 56–64; as “Man-devil,”
45–46; morals and, 210–11;
Morley and, 154; Orwell and,
168–69, 174–75; patriotism and,
69; persona and, 48; politeness
and, 50–51; politics and, 47–48,
56; pretended difﬁculties and,
211–12; public reaction to, 45–46;
religion and, 56–57, 60, 62,
64–65; self-deception and, 51–52;
self-denial and, 72–73, 83;
Shaftesbury and, 52–54, 58, 70,
78, 232n15; style of, 47–48; vanity
and, 48–49; Walpole and, 233n48;
Mansﬁeld Park (Austen), 144
Marie Antoinette, 26–27
masks, 43–44; Bentham and,
116–19; concealment and, 30–35
(see also concealment); Cromwell
and, 117–18, 210; disobedience
and, 23–30; effect of, 3–9, 15; faux
confessions and, 210; Federalists
and, 109–10; Mandeville and, 210;
Orwell and, 181–82; persona and,
35–41 (see also persona); piety
and, 23; power and, 16–44; reli-

gion and, 25–30; reputation and,
39; simplicity and, 91
maxims, 14–15, 92, 195, 211
Maxims (Rochefoucauld), 14–15
medicine, 168–69
metaphor, 127, 175, 237n24
Methods of Ethics, The (Sidgwick),
143, 156–64
Middlemarch (Eliot), 144
militarism, 181–82, 208
Mill, James, 140
Mill, John Stuart, 152, 165
Ministry of Truth, 186
Missouri Compromise, 115
Molière, 4
morals, 10; American Revolution
and, 78–79; Bentham and, 116;
book reviews and, 170; language
use and, 121–31; Machiavelli and,
46, 210; Mandeville and, 48–49,
210–11; Orwell and, 170–71, 180;
Sidgwick and, 157, 163–64;
Trollope and, 147
Morley, John, 167, 191, 200, 221;
background of, 151; Bacon and,
153, 155; concealment and, 166;
Cromwell and, 166; deception
and, 154–55; democracy and, 166;
Disraeli and, 151–52; dissimulation and, 153; Gladstone and,
142, 151, 156; Irish University Bill
and, 151; journalists and, 152;
Liberals and, 153–56; Machiavelli
and, 156; Mandeville and, 154;
Mill and, 152; ofﬁces of, 166; On
Compromise and, 143, 151–56; political spirit and, 151–56; religion
and, 153; Sidgwick and, 157–58,
165; Strachey and, 142–43; Tories
and, 153–54; Trollope and, 151–52;
words vs. actions and, 152–53
multiple selves, 223
Nazis, 178, 184–85, 241n34
negative advertising, 3–4

266

INDEX

neo-Machiavellianism, 163–64
New Labour, 156
New Zealander, The (Trollope), 144–51
Nietzsche, Friedrich, 4, 6, 195
Nineteen Eight-Four (Orwell),
185–87, 190–91
“ ‘No Bullshit’ Bullshit” (Collini),
174
Northern Ireland, 195
oaths, 121–25
Obama, Barack, 215, 217, 220–22
Oborne, Peter, 197–98
“Of Cunning” (Bacon), 84–85
“Of Simulation and Dissimulation”
(Bacon), 84–87
“On Cant and Hypocrisy”
(Coleridge), 130
On Compromise (Morley), 143, 151–56
“On Government” (Mill), 140
“On Simplicity” (Franklin), 84
Ordinary Vices (Shklar), 2, 4
Orwell, George, ix, 1, 6, 195, 200;
anti-hypocrisy and, 184–93; background of, 168; Bentham and,
174–76; book reviews and,
168–73; capitalism and, 190–91;
concealment and, 175–77;
Connolly and, 170–71; Cromwell
and, 191–93; democracy and, 180,
219; double-think and, 185–86;
egoism and, 170–72; fascism and,
183–84, 188–93; Hitchens and,
173–74, 189; Hobbes and, 174–76,
193; honesty and, 171; humbug
and, 170; hypocrisy as English
vice and, 176–84, 202–4, 240n17;
ideology and, 168–93; imperialism and, 181–84, 202–4; intellectualism and, 168–76; Kipling and,
177–79; language and, 175–76,
185–86; liberal rationalists and,
175; Machiavelli and, 175, 185–86;
Mandeville and, 168–69; metaphors and, 175; morals and,

170–71, 180; persona and, 181–82;
philosophy and, 168; politics and,
174–76, 180; Shklar and, 186,
241n38; socialism and, 189–91;
Spender and, 171–72; totalitarianism and, 183–88; total power and,
184–88; transparency and,
175–77; Trollope and, 168–70, 175;
vice and, 176–87; Wodehouse
and, 177–79, 182–83, 190
Oxford University, ix, 121–25, 153
Paine, Thomas, 80–81, 103, 106–7,
239n29
Paisley, Ian, 195
Pall Mall Gazette, 152
paradiastole, 30–35, 230n35
patriotism, 34–35, 219–20
peace, 40; concealment and, 34–35;
natural law and, 16, 19; persona
and, 37–38; politics and, 20–22
Pennsylvania Gazette, 84
persona, 8–10, 163–64; Adams and,
96–103; aristocracy and, 96–97,
100–103, 108, 110; Bolingbroke
and, 91–92; Cromwell and, 58–63;
democracy and, 20; fashionable
hypocrisy and, 56–64; faux confessions and, 210; ﬁctions and,
131–41; ﬂattery and, 48; Franklin
and, 91–92; good intentions and,
64–73; Hillary Clinton and,
214–17; Hobbes and, 19–20,
36–41; imperialism and, 181–82;
Jefferson and, 111–15; language
and, 121–41; lies and, 37–38, 40;
Mandeville and, 48; masks and,
210 (see also masks); patriotism
and, 219–20; politeness and,
50–51; religion and, 36–41; representation and, 38–39; selfdelusion and, 212–13; Sidgwick
and, 163–64; sincerity and, 208
(see also sincerity); vanity and,
24–25, 48–49

267

INDEX

philosophy: Bacon and, 84–92;
Blackburn and, 172; dissimulation
and, 84–90; Franklin and, 82–93;
Hobbes and, 15–44 (see also
Hobbes, Thomas); humanism and,
92; Mandeville and, 45–73 (see also
Mandeville, Bernard de); Orwell
and, 168; Scottish Enlightenment
and, 5–6, 78–80, 106; sentimentalism and, 120–21; Sidgwick and,
156–68; truth and, 172; utilitarianism and, 116–21, 140–41
Phineas Redux (Trollope), 143–51,
169–70, 204, 238n2
piety, 23, 78
politeness, 50–51, 119–20
Political Tactics (Bentham), 137
politics, ix–x, 172; Adams and,
79, 81–82, 94–103; American
Revolution and, 74–115 (see also
American Revolution); antihypocrisy and, 184–93, 196–202;
aristocracy and, 96–97, 100–103,
110; as art, 113–14; Atlantic
thought and, 77; Bentham and,
116–41; capitalism and, 190–91; as
card game, 112–13; character
assassination and, 3; “Christian,”
6; Cold War and, 207–8, 242n8;
colouring/cloaking and, 30–35;
compromise and, 151–56, 201,
205, 217, 219–22; concealment
and, 30–35, 84–87 (see also concealment); Cromwell and, 18, 35,
58–63, 67, 69–70, 73, 117–18,
191–93, 195, 228n6, 232n24;
deception and, 154–55; democracy
and, 137–41, 188–93 (see also
democracy); disobedience and,
23–30; Disraeli and, 143, 147–52,
204–5; dissimulation and, 84–90;
distrust and, 18; double standards and, 2–3; Elizabethan, 86;
environmental issues and,
222–26; fascism and, 183–84,

268

188–93; fashionable hypocrisy
and, 56–64; faux confessions and,
210–12; federalism and, 109–10,
163; ﬁctions and, 131–41;
Franklin and, 80–81; gesture and,
70; good faith principle and, 172;
good intentions and, 64–73;
Hobbes and, 41–44; Home Rule
and, 165–66; honesty and, 113–14;
humour and, 209–10; imperialism
and, 181–84, 202–4; Iraq War and,
217–19; Jacobean, 86; Jefferson
and, 76–81, 103–15; journalists
and, 145–46; language and,
175–76, 185–86; lawyers and,
156–57; Mandeville and, 47–48,
56; masks and, 6–7 (see also
masks); Morley and, 151–56; multiple selves and, 223; negative
advertising and, 3–4; oaths of
ofﬁce and, 121–25; Orwell and,
174–76, 180; party loyalty and,
217–18; patriotism and, 69,
219–20; persona and, 19–20,
35–41 (see also persona); popular
representation and, 140–41; pretended difﬁculties and, 211–12;
public judgement and, 65–67;
Reform Act of 1867 and, 143,
147–48; religion and, 25–30, 35,
60, 62, 156–57; representation
and, 38–39, 140; republicanism
and, 79, 109–10; Royalists and,
123; secrecy and, 89–95, 160, 198,
206, 210, 235n20; self-delusion
and, 212–13; Sidgwick and,
156–67; sincerity and, 20, 103–15;
slavery and, 74–76; socialism
and, 189–91, 201–2; survival of
state and, 22; Tories and, 66,
68–69, 88–89, 109, 143, 147–48,
153–54, 191, 200, 242n5; totalitarianism and, 183–88; Trollope and,
142–51; U.S. 2008 election and,
213–26; useful ﬁctions and,

INDEX

131–37; Victorian, 142–67;
Walpole and, 68–69, 88; Whigs
and, 66–67, 69, 78, 109, 199–200
“Politics and the English
Language” (Orwell), 175
Politik als Beruf (Weber), 64
power: democracy and, 206 (see also
democracy); imperialism and,
181–84, 202–4; mask of, 16–44;
sovereignty and, 19–44, 137–41;
229nn10,12; total, 183–88; totalitarianism and, 183–88
praise, 48–51
Pravda, 176
Presbyterians, 29–30, 35, 59, 232n24
pretence, 3, 8–9
Prince, The (Machiavelli), 15, 45,
156, 234n6
Private Eye magazine, 169
Protestants, 159
“Public Morality” (Sidgwick),
163–64
Publicola, 103–4
Punch magazine, 238n4
Puritans, 25–26
purity, 145–47
“Reﬂections on Gandhi” (Orwell),
181
Reform Act of 1867, 143, 147–48
Regicides, 23
religion, 145; American Revolution
and, 77; Anglican Church and,
153; Bentham and, 236n18;
Catholic Church and, 25–26, 28,
36, 144, 151–52, 159, 176;
Christianity and, 83–84, 88–89,
158–59; Church of England and,
148; Clinton and, 214–17; concealment and, 35; Cromwell and,
60, 62, 192–93; Deists and, 82–83;
excommunication and, 36; freedom of, 107; Hobbes and, 25–30;
immortality and, 158; Irish
Church and, 148; Jefferson and,

107; lawyers and, 156–57;
Mandeville and, 56–57, 60, 62,
64–65; Morley and, 153; Obama
and, 221–22; persona and, 36–41;
politics and, 25–30, 35, 60, 62,
156–57, 214–17; Pope and, 28,
151–52, 176; Presbyterians and,
29–30, 35, 59, 232n24; Protestants
and, 159; Puritans and, 25–26;
Sidgwick and, 157–60; Trollope
and, 148; virtue and, 83–84, 88–89
Renaissance, 30–31
representation, 38–39, 140
republicanism, 79, 109–10
rhetorical redescription, 30
Rights of Man, The (Paine), 80, 103
Rise of Political Lying, The (Oborne),
197
Road to Wigan Pier, The (Orwell),
177–78, 189–90, 240n19
Rochefoucauld, François, Duc de la,
14–15, 47, 60
Rock Pool, The (Connolly), 170
Roosevelt, Franklin D., 174
Rorty, Richard, 186, 188
Rosebery, Archibald, 191
Roundhead Reputations (Worden),
191
Rousseau, Jean-Jacques, 4, 6, 59–60,
80, 99
Royalists, 123
Sartre, Jean-Paul, 173
satire, 32, 146, 149, 169
scepticism, 47, 216
Schama, Simon, 74
Schulz, Bart, 156
Scottish Enlightenment, 5–6, 78–80,
106
“Search into the Nature of Society,
A” (Mandeville), 52
secrecy, 198, 206, 210; Adams and,
94–95; Bacon and, 86–89, 235n20;
Bolingbroke and, 89–90; Franklin
and, 91–93; Victorians and, 160

269

INDEX

security, 16, 212–13
self-conceit, 17
self-deception, 35, 51–52, 203,
212–13
self-denial: Bentham and, 120–21;
Franklin and, 83–84; Mandeville
and, 52–54, 72–73, 83
selﬁshness: Franklin and, 83–84;
neo–Machiavellianism and,
163–64; self–defeating nature of,
83–84; Sidgwick and, 157, 163–64;
Trollope and, 150
self-justiﬁcation, 211
self-love, 51
sentimentalism, 120–21
September 11 attacks, 218
sex, 26, 29, 143, 156
Shaftesbury, Anthony Ashley
Cooper, 52–54, 58, 70, 78, 232n15
Shklar, Judith, 197; democracy and,
219; Hobbes and, 41; hypocrisy
as vice and, 2–7; Orwell and, 186,
188, 241n38; Victorians and,
144–45, 149
“Shooting an Elephant” (Orwell),
182
Sidgwick, Henry, 153, 173, 200;
Bentham and, 157, 162; democracy
and, 162–66; dissembling politicians and, 160–61; dissimulation
and, 158; federalism and, 163;
Hobbes and, 151, 157; Home
Rule and, 165–66; lawyers and,
161–62; liberalism and, 165–67;
Method of Ethics and, 143, 156–64;
Mill and, 165; modern study of,
156; morals and, 157, 163–64;
Morley and, 157–58, 165; neoMachiavellianism and, 163–64;
Orwell and, 174–75; Paine and,
239n29; party politics and, 160;
persona and, 163–64; philosophy
and, 156–68; religion and, 157–60;
selﬁshness and, 157, 163–64;
Strachey and, 142–43; Thirty-

Nine Articles and, 158; utilitarianism and, 157, 160–67
simplicity, 84, 88–93
simulation: Bacon and, 84–90,
104–5, 234nn11,15, 233n20;
Bolingbroke and, 91; Hobbes
and, 27, 38; Jefferson and, 104–5;
Mandeville and, 49
sincerity, 20; Adams and, 94–103;
American hypocrisy and, 74–82,
92; Bacon and, 84–85; British
hypocrisy and, 74–82; Bush and,
126; conjurers and, 148–49, 204–5;
democracy and, 194–226 (see also
democracy); dissimulation and,
84–90; faux confessions and,
210–12; Franklin and, 82–93; good
faith principle and, 172; habit of,
82–93; inconstant language and,
125–31; Jefferson and, 103–15;
luck and, 93, 113, 208; manners
and, 51; Paine and, 80, 106–7; politics of, 103–15; science of, 94–103;
secrecy and, 89–95, 160, 198, 206,
210, 235n20; self-delusion and,
212–13; simulation and, 84–90;
transparency and, 175–77
Skinner, Quentin, 30–32, 227n9,
230n2
slavery, 74–77, 115
Smith, Adam, 5, 78–79
Smith, Winston, 185, 190–91
social contract, 60, 136–37
Social Contract, The (Rousseau), 60
socialism, 189–91, 201–2
Sommerville, Johann P., 232n24
South Sea Bubble, 65
sovereignty: concealment and,
30–35; democratic ﬁctions and,
137–41; disobedience and, 23–30;
Hobbes and, 229nn10,12; modern
politics and, 41–44 (see also politics); peace and, 21–22; persona
and, 19–20, 36–41; religion and,
25–30; vanity and, 24–25

270

INDEX

Spain, 66–68
spectemur agendo, 96
Spender, Stephen, 171–72
spin, 14, 197
Spode, Roderick, 190
Stalin, Joseph, 174, 176
stealing from thieves, 19, 21
Strachey, Lytton, 142–43
Strauss, Leo, 15
Summary View of the Rights of British
America, A (Jefferson), 113
Sunstein, Cass, 220–21
Sun Tzu, 15
Swear Not At All (Bentham), 121–25,
129
Table of the Springs of Action
(Bentham), 120
Tacitus, 79, 95
tartuffery, 4
Taylor, John, 113
Telemachus (Fénelon), 50
television, 210
terrorism, 218
theatre, 7–9
Thirty-Nine Articles, 158
Thompson, C. Bradley, 112
Thucydides, 20, 228n1
Times The (London), 214
Tories, 191, 200, 242n5; American
Revolution and, 88–89, 109;
Mandeville and, 66, 68–69;
Morley and, 153–54; Victorians
and, 143, 147–48, 153–54
totalitarianism, 183–88
transparency, 115, 175–77
Trinity College, 153
Trollope, Anthony, 167, 197–98, 206;
background of, 143; Bentham
and, 149–50; conjurers and,
148–49, 204–5; democracy and,
204–6; Disraeli and, 150, 204,
239n12; Gladstone and, 143, 147,
149, 160; Hobbes and, 149; journalists and, 149–50; Morley and,

151–52; The New Zealander and,
144–51; Orwell and, 168–70, 175;
Phineas Redux and, 143–51; purity
and, 145–47; religion and, 148;
Strachey and, 142–43; utilitarianism and, 150–51; virtue and, 144
Truth and Truthfulness (Williams), 4
Truth (Blackburn), 172
Twin Towers, 218
Two Minutes Hate, 185
unicameralism, 97
United Kingdom, x, 13, 239n33;
American Revolution and, 74–82;
Bentham and, 116–41; Blair and,
143, 148, 174, 197–98, 200, 204–5;
Boer War and, 165–66; British
hypocrisy and, 74–82; Brown
and, 205; Cameron and, 148, 205,
224, 242n5; civil war and, 17–18;
Cold War and, 207–8, 242n8;
Cromwell and, 18, 35, 58–63, 67,
69–70, 73, 117–18, 191–93, 195,
228n6, 232n24; democracy and,
180; Disraeli and, 143, 147–52,
204–5; environmental issues and,
224; food/drug adulterations
and, 145–46; Home Rule and,
165–66; hypocrisy as vice of,
176–84; imperialism and, 181–84,
202–4; Irish University Bill and,
151; militarism and, 181; Morley
and, 151–56; Northern Ireland
and, 195; Orwell and, 168–93,
202–4; patriotism and, 69; Reform
Act of 1867 and, 143, 147–48;
Sidgwick and, 156–67; slavery
and, 75–76; Tories and, 66, 68–69,
88–89, 109, 143, 147–48, 153–54,
191, 200, 242n5; Trollope and,
142–51; utilitarianism and,
150–51; Victorians and, 142–67;
Walpole and, 68–69; war with
Spain and, 66–68; Whigs and,
66–67, 69, 78, 109, 199–200

271

INDEX

United States, ix–x, 5–6, 13, 239n33;
Adams and, 94–103, 208–9;
American hypocrisy and, 74–82;
American Revolution and,
74–115 (see also American
Revolution); Bentham and, 117;
Cold War and, 207–8, 242n8;
Declaration of Independence
and, 75; Democrats and, 217–19;
environmental issues and,
222–26; Franklin and, 82–93,
208–9; Jefferson and, 208–9; 2008
election and, 213–26
U.S. Constitution, 100
utilitarianism: Bentham and,
116–21, 140–41, 236n18; sentimentalism and, 120; Sidgwick and,
157, 160–67; Trollope and, 150–51;
Victorians and, 150
vanity, 24–25; Mandeville and,
48–49; self-deception and, 35,
51–52, 203, 212–13
vice: concealment and, 30–35; dissimulation and, 84–90; double
standards and, 2–3; faking virtue
and, 45–51; ﬁrst/second order
hypocrisy and, 51–56, 63, 65,
70–73; liberal rationalism and,
5–6; malicious vs. fashionable
hypocrisy and, 56–64; masks and,
6–7 (see also masks); negative
advertising and, 3–4; persona
and, 8–10; politeness and, 50–51;
ranking of, 2; religion and, 25–30;
self-deception and, 51–52; Shklar
and, 2–7
Victorians, 221; Bentham and,
206–8; Boer War and, 165–66;
commercialism and, 169–70; concealment and, 166; democracy
and, 142; Disraeli and, 147–49;
food adulteration and, 145–47;
Home Rule and, 165–66; Irish
University Bill and, 151; journal-

ists and, 145–46, 149–50, 152; liberalism and, 143, 148–49, 153–56,
166–67; Morley and, 151–56; novelists and, 142–51; politics and,
142–67; Reform Act of 1867 and,
143, 147–48; Sidgwick and,
156–67; Tories and, 153–54;
Trollope and, 142–51, 204–6; utilitarianism and, 150–51
Vidal, Gore, 112
virtue: Adams and, 94–103;
American Revolution and, 78–79;
Christian, 83; dissimulation and,
84–90; Eliot and, 144; Franklin
and, 83; Jefferson and, 108–11;
Mandeville and, 45–51; national
prosperity and, 49–50; oaths and,
121–25; politeness and, 50–51;
private decency and, 90; religion
and, 83–84, 88–89; self-denial
and, 52–54, 72–73; simplicity and,
84; sincerity and, 84–93 (see also
sincerity); society and, 50–53;
Trollope and, 144; U.S.
Constitution and, 100; vanity
and, 48–49; vice and, 45–51
Voltaire, 99
vulgar class, 55–56
Walpole, Robert, 68–69, 88, 233n48
Washington, George, 100, 104, 208
Way We Live Now, The (Trollope),
169–70
Weber, Max, 64, 68
Wesley, John, 45
What the Media Are Doing to Our
Politics (Lloyd), 198–99
Whigs, 66–67, 69, 78, 109, 199–200
Williams, Bernard, 4
Wills, Garry, 75
Wodehouse, P. G., 177–83, 190
Wood, Gordon S., 99–100
Wooster, Bertie, 178–83
Worden, Blair, 191
World War II, 178, 189

272


